text,label,notes
"As an ascendant chamber main I think that Chamber's headhunter should really be added to deathmatch. While the sheriff and Guardian are definitely similar to the headhunter, the gun does feel like its own weapon, and has a different recoil/acuracy compared to sheriff/guardian. Adding chamber headhunter to DM will also let players practice swapping to headhunter if they miss an op shot, which is something you can only really practice in the range currently.",Insight,"Includes specific evidence why Chamber's headhunter should be added, which is why I labeled it as insight. "
"Especially in immortal, me and most of the players I have seen are losing more rr than they are winning for a similar performance and round differential game. Individual performance barely has any impact in this rank.
I think this is the main reason in decline of high rank players. At its peak (Episode 4 act 3) valorant had 5528 immortal 3 + radiants . But since last year, the number has fallen to an average of 1500 and this act there are only 635!
After last act’s soft reset, I started at around immortal 1 10 rr this act. Despite having a 800+ tracker score and almost 60% win rate, I am currently…ascendant 3, yes ASCENDANT 3. I calculated the win rate I need to hit immortal 3 according to my average rr gains/losses and its 67%! (the average win rate of top 100 players is 57% btw). Not even pros have this kind of win rate. If I hop on this game and play 2 matches, theres only a 33% chance I will be up in rr for the day. Even games at casino have higher chances of winning/being rewarded.
I feels like this game is not rewarding at all. Anyone else feel like that? Ranking up is the only rewarding thing this game has to offer other than that same gun buddy they have been giving for 6 years. I have been playing this game since beta and I think ranking up is mainly what makes a game fun for me and many others. However, now their mmr system being not rewarding at all is making me drift away just like many others. I have seen many pros and radiant streamers who haven’t been able to get back to radiant. They are stuck in immortal and are complaining about it as well.
The number keeps declining every act and its gonna keep declining until they do something about this.


",Insight,
"Only 0.02% of players are Radiant. That means if you're Diamond, you're already in the top 15% of all players.
Current distribution: Iron 6.84%, Bronze 18.81%, Silver 23.12%, Gold 20.97%, Platinum 14.56%, Diamond 9.13%, Ascendant 5.27%, Immortal 1.26%, Radiant 0.04%
Silver is the single most populated rank. If you're Gold, you're literally above average.
Most people spend years thinking they're ""hardstuck"" when they're actually performing better than the majority of the player base. The ladder feels brutal but the reality is most players never leave Silver-Gold.
Where do you sit?",Insight,
"I genuinely love VALORANT’s worldbuilding, lore, agents—pretty much everything about its universe. But looking at it now, I can’t help feeling like Riot just isn’t taking the story side of the game seriously enough.
The lore feels like it has so much depth on the surface, but once you really try to dig into it, there’s often not much there. It looks fascinating, but in the end it rarely goes anywhere meaningful.
And lately, it feels like more and more agents are being introduced as little more than plot devices—like Tejo, Waylay, and others. Back in the early days, almost every agent had their own unique reason and story for joining the VALORANT Protocol. Now it feels like half of them just get brought in through someone else’s recommendation.
I really hope every agent can have their own distinct story instead of just becoming background dust—filling plot holes or existing to support and highlight the more popular characters.
On top of that, the storytelling itself is starting to feel way too formulaic. It’s getting predictable, and honestly, less interesting.
And can we please talk about the way the story is delivered? The current narrative style is way too fragmented. Fragmented storytelling can work—but not when it feels this scattered and half-hearted all the time.
Please don’t forget about those of us who actually care about the lore.",Vent,"Label is a little unclear because the user names specific examples, but ultimately, they are not concrete examples (likely also because lore can be interpreted subjectively). This is why I classified it as vent."
"With the upcoming buffs to all of Killjoy’s basic utility, I’m fully expecting her to be meta once again, going back to her days in 2022 as the most played Sentinel, and because Riot seems to focus quite a bit on her post-plant power with the molly duration buffs, I’m expecting Veto to be quite a good counter to Killjoy.

First point: Killjoy’s ultimate is a 9 point ultimate which disables all players on a site, we all know that. And Veto’s ultimate which a 7 points ultimate making him immune to all utility other than bullets/knifes, meaning Veto will almost always have his ultimate when Killjoy has hers, which fully counters Killjoy’s plan to isolate sites.

Second point: Killjoy players tend to use their utility close to the entrance/on the spike for post-plants. With the upcoming cooldown buff for Veto’s Interceptor, he will almost always be able clear out all utility around the entrance/spike before Killjoys can activate it, unless it’s pre-activated.

Third point: Killjoy players are lurkers, a global trip that can only be avoided with a smoke, is usually terrible for Killjoy, she either needs to reveal her position by shooting it, or wait until Veto dies/is disabled for finding a timing. In the highest ranks it will also be noted that Killjoy might gotten past the trip if Veto’s dead/disabled.

The only Con, to Veto is that he has no proper way of avoiding killjoy Turrets without teleporting past it, and unless he knows Killjoy’s positioning, Killjoy will always hear the audio of the crosscut.

If you are worried about Killjoy becoming META, I highly suggest picking up Veto this act. It will very likely earn you some RR.
",Insight,
"Well sage can revive dead people to their max health .Lucia is dying so just kill her and revive her using sage's ability . Why the fuss about collecting soul to cyre her .

Are they dumb",Vent,
"Like I said, Sunset has so many bugs this new act. Here are all the things I've observed so far

The Minimap is entirely broken. You can't ping. You can't see anyone else on the map. This renders agents like cypher useless and also makes it impossible to see where teammates are. (No Spike on Map also)

No indications on where abilities reach or the site's planting zone. (KJ's ult, Reyna's Blind, etc.)

Gekko's planting indication cannot be seen (The purple spike)

NO SMOKES. Because the minimap is broken, smokes are useless, maybe you can get a lucky smoke at mid but that's it.

Tell me if you caught anything else!",Insight,"The user expresses frustration, but they are ultimately pointing out concrete examples that affect all players, not just themselves. This is why I classified the post as insight."
"Everyone in this match had it broken too. Nothing showing on minimap, smoking, missiles, ultimate, or ANYTHING. So many abilites are broken and if your team doesn't communicate well you're just screwed.",Vent,
"I feel like every game is just the same thing over and over again, and it never rewards you for anything outside of RR. I wish there was a way to get skins for free, or at least be like the Fortnite battlepass, where you can buy the battlepass and get more vbucks through it to get it again. Also, you have to rely soo much on your teammates and if they're bad, it's basically just instant RR loss. Anyone else feel this way?",Vent,
"Is anyone else bothered by how the game mode always resets to Unranked instead of staying on whatever you played last?

It feels like such a small quality-of-life change, but Riot never seems to address these little annoyances that would genuinely improve the experience for everyone. If I was playing Competitive, Swiftplay, or Deathmatch, why not just keep that selected the next time I queue up?

…and then you get a queue-dodge warning and a penalty because you accidentally queued Unrated.

A lot of issues just go unmentioned. Speak up! it's your game you’re playing. Hold the developers accountable.",Vent,
"D3 currently, peak asc 2, Solo queue idk why i can’t seem to climb up. Is it because of ping? I get like 70-80. But i’ve seen players with same ping climb up to immortal. I wonder how they did that.

Any tips?",Vent,
"Rank Distribution shows you how many people are in your specific bucket. Top% tells you your percentile aka how many players you’ve mathematically surpassed.

Top% in Valorant (EU):

Radiant Top 0.02%

Immortal 3 Top 0.14%

Immortal 2 Top 0.37%

Immortal 1 Top 1.49%

Ascendant Top 8.50%

Diamond Top 21.73%

Platinum Top 41.39%

Gold Top 63.44%

Silver Top 82.09%

Bronze Top 95.52%

Iron Top 100.00%

The Hierarchy (this is how I see it based on the stats):

Gold (The Median): If you are here, you are the statistical mirror of the server. Gameplay wise, Plat is not that far away.

Diamond (Competence): The first sign of non-randomness.

Ascendant (Grinder): High volume, high effort. You're decent.

Immortal 1 (Gatekeeper): The phase transition. You’ve mastered the fundamentals, but you remain the weakest of the best.

Immortal 2 - low Immo 3: The purification. You’ve moved past the gatekeepers and are now refining the micro details => a solid good player.

Immortal 3 400RR+: The elite.

It’s worth noting that Valorant’s ranking system feels significantly more 'inflated' compared to League of Legends.

Top% in LoL (EUW):

Challenger Top 0.01%

GrandMaster Top 0.036%

Master Top 0.896%

Diamond Top 4.90%

Emerald Top 16.90%

Valorant ranks are significantly more inclusive. An Ascendant in Valorant (Top 8.5%) is effectively an Emerald 1/2 player in LoL. A Diamond in Valorant (Top 21%) is common, whereas a Diamond in LoL is Top 5%. Immortal 1 (Top 1.5%) is very close to Diamond 1/2 in LoL (Top ~2-3%).

This doesn't mean Valorant players are 'worse,' but it does mean that Dia/Asc/Immo1 status in Valorant carries less statistical exclusivity than the equivalent tiers in LoL.

What do you guys think about it?",Insight,
"I no longer feel the spark to grind. It's been almost a year yet I'm still stuck in bronze. I've tried everything from focusing on crosshair placements to improving your game sense yet it's just wasn't enough for me. I peaked Bronze 3 and everytime I am few rr away from promoting to silver, I'll get pulled down by getting tilted, trolls and smurfs.

I'm just fucking tired of this cycle. Im already level 100+ yet I can't even reach silver. It's very hard for me to see that my friends is already reaching silver yet Im still stuck in rock bottom and people be making fun of you because I'm hardtuck in low elo. Even if I try to act ""serious"" or ""focused"" , I will just end up losing because I can't carry my own team despite if there are going to be trolls/thrower in the game. You may think that Valorant is my 1st fps pc game. Yes you are right but I don't use it as an excuse on why Im still hardstuck in low elo. It's unfair on how I can keep up playing with silver, gold and rarely plat but it in the end, Im just stuck here in the same cycle.",Vent,
"To start I'm awful at this game I'm in iron, any game mode other than ranked just isn't fun cause 90% of the time they're leagues ahead of me, so I play ranked for fun where I'm put against people my skill, issue is every 2/3 games there's a smurf on either team, it's not enjoyable for either team when someone is going 30/2 .

I don't care about ranking up I'm not trying to improve , just enjoy this game but smurfs are ruining it honestly when you're stuck in a 20-30min game you can't leave and know you can't win.",Vent,
"I was looking at old leaderboards in game, and I realized back in like Episode 5 and 6 the Top 1 player had 1300 rr and top 500 had 636, whereas Top 1 now has 650 rr and there aren’t even 500 radiants 😭 In my opinion it was harder to reach Immortal/Radiant back in Episode 5-6 than it is now (more impressive gun buddy)",Insight,
"With discussion around W/L RR gains I'd like to throw my current recent games into the mix as an example.

This has been the experience for about the last 3 acts. This act however, has been particularly egregious. If you check the IMGUR link you can see my most recent +14 and -20/-21 losses, and if you scroll to the next image you can see some of the MM.. Imm - Plat3 in the same game.

I love Val but since one of the act resets, and their gatekeeping IMM for there being too many Radiant contenders, it's been inconsistent.

I'm at 80W/67L right now, which is 54% win rate.",Vent,"The user states specific statistics, however, these stats belong to them and therefore seem to be an expression of their frustration. This is why it was classified as vent. "
"I used to make some of the most abhorrent fan-made maps known to man and post them here. 500 angles per site, 2 seperate mids, the size of china kind of bad and this subreddit dogged me for it deservedly. With that said, I think I out of all people can still recognize that this map is *riskilly* experimental and will not be taken well by the community. I dont want to be too judgemental because until its played I cant really say if its a good or bad map, but from what I can see right now ... its not looking too good ..

I know the closing doors mechanic probably permanently reduces 1 angle from every site, and I like the idea a lot (with the main problem being throwers) and it works on maps like Pearl, which is somewhat attacker sided but it still seems like attackers will struggle with holding unless they push a little bit farther into CT, or in A's case, in that little elbow corner in the top left.

After analyzing for a while, this map seems really thought out but it's core concept seems very.... strategically dangerous. I dunno. What do you guys think?",Insight,
"Can they decrease the trip activation time, I don't think I ever slowed anyone, it just gets destroyed. And if you're asking why, it's useful to combine it with mollies,

Second buff should be to his tp range, 20m would make it very good",Vent,
"Diamond lobbies have become unbearable. I'm in the top 4 rank in the game yet it feels like plat. The platnium players from last act have come in diamond and they do not deserve it. I regularly get ascendant lobbies and diamond due to mmr and the difference is insane between high diamond and low diamond.

Low diamond has no comms, teammates who throw and genuinely zero team work. When i get low diamond teammates, they have zero comms and ability to play with team which was not the case before in diamond ig 2-3 years ago. But when i get a player whos diamond 3 or ascendant 1 even; They're comming properly, helping teammates, trading.

This is due to many players who were in plat have sneeked into diamond 1 and it's very underwhelming to face these players even on opposite teams.",Vent,"User posted with very negative language, which is why it was classified as a vent. "
"Why blame me, call me stupid, and curse at me? I was doing fine most rounds and it was his friends throwing rounds. I understand that you want to play with your friends in lower rank but when you lose then dont start getting angry because you chose to do it. I just find this funny that he pointed fingers at me for losing when I was carrying rounds with him.",Vent,
"I spent hundreds of hours improving, learning the game, supporting teammates, keeping morale up, and grinding my way to Ascendant 1. Getting there felt rewarding.


The problem started after I reached that rank.


Since then, a significant portion of my matches seem to be decided by factors completely outside my control: AFKs, trolls, smurfs, and accounts that appear to be boosted or prepared for resale. I've dropped to the point where seeing Platinum 3 feels more common than maintaining my previous rank.


Some games feel unwinnable from the start. There are matches where three teammates finish with fewer than 8 kills each, leaving one or two players to carry. If we manage to win, great. If not, it's often a heavy RR loss.


What frustrates me even more is how cheating cases are handled. Losing RR because of a cheater feels bad enough, but when that player is eventually banned, the compensation often feels insignificant compared to the points that were lost.


I'm not posting this to complain about a single bad match. I'm genuinely curious:


Do other players feel that the current ranked experience is too heavily influenced by trolls, AFKs, smurfs, and cheaters? If so, what changes would you like Riot to make to improve competitive integrity?",Vent,
"I'm actually shocked at how much more difficult the game has become simply from Gold 3 to Platinum 1. Now I know what you're thinking, ""you're just bad""... and you're probably right.

After getting promoted to Plat, I began to notice how much better my opponents were to the point it started to feel a little weird. But before I took to Reddit, I played out about 10 games to see if there were any patterns, and here are my findings, and I promise you there are no exaggerations:

There are no longer gunfights

In Gold, I'd find myself often in some fun gun fights. Peeking and trading shots at each other for a few seconds before someone got the kill. In Plat, I'm finding nearly 80% of my deaths are from a Ferrari Peek 1 tap. Oftentimes, I get domed before I even know what I'm looking at. The level of aim mechanics players have now is unfathomable. I sometimes wonder what these people are eating for breakfast.

No one comms

This was the most noticeable. In Gold, I was getting teamed up with so many talkative people, having a good time. Sure, there were the odd toxic or annoying person, but honestly, about 75% of my games had a full team of people communicating. Out of the 10 games of Plat lobbies I played, I may have heard 2 voices. It's truly a bizarre phenomenon.

The lobbies are severely 1-sided

If you look at my career, I was chock-full of very close games, win or lose. Many, many games that go 20+ rounds, and those lobbies are full of even players, with everyone hitting double-digit kills, etc. Plat has been a completely different story. I thought Riot fixed the balancing issue, but I suppose they forgot to check on Plat lobbies. Out of the 10 games I played, we won 2 of them, and every single game, and I mean every single game, was a one-sided bloodbath, typically with 1 or 2 players going 20+ kills.

Overall, I'm really not having a good time in Platinum. Finally reaching the rank gave me a big feeling of accomplishment, and that feeling was quickly kicked in the nuts. Platinum is the least fun I've ever had playing ranked. I want to go back to Gold, where people are actually fun to play with.

It really is bizarre, the difference in gameplay I'm having. It's not like we're getting tactically outplayed; we are simply just getting run down and 1-tapped constantly. It doesn't matter what angle I hold; these players are able to react instantly and flick to my head. And don't get me wrong, I really enjoy running into a player like that here and there, it adds a challenge and forces me to play better, but this is every. damn. game. And it's a lobby full of them.

Has anyone else had an experience like this? Or am I just bad and should go back to Call of Duty?",Insight,"User seems frustrated. Despite this, they are relaying their observed experience with specific numbers, and are looking for advice, which is why I qualified it as insight. "
"There is nothing interesting about him, all he is, is a bunch of lazy reskinned abilities. In his character description, they say he uses sound energy, which is cool and can open up a lot of interesting ideas, but no, here's another lazy reskinned smoke, stim, and Brim ult.

None of his kit has ANYTHING to do with sound or sound type abilities, and we're supposed to accept that because the names of his abilities have sound themes, stupid.

What if his smokes we're purely offensive and disabled hearing while inside, or if his stim wasn't just a brimstone stim, but instead enhanced a players hearing radius or something I don't know just do something interesting for once.

And in my opinion, if Riot was going to go down the lazy reskin rout, at least choose abilities that actually could make sense. Like Sova's dart, he could go into like a focus mode and see (hear) enemies around him. Like come on, just make an interesting character.

And I know people will downvote because they are completely unable to accept that this game has truly fallen off and Riot is doing nothing to save it.",Vent,
"A lot of my issues with ranked are caused by Duos and Trios.

They hardly ever comm in-game.

They usually queue with with terrible friends and one of them is the smurf.

They are more likely to troll",Vent,
i am a returning player and here are my first five games why they do that do they want me quit or something and live a good life,Vent,
"This was my rank-up game, and I had good hopes for it because my team had good energy; however, this Brim (whose user I won't share) popped up and ruined it. Keep in mind that this is a mid-bronze lobby, and he managed to get 26 kills with only 7 deaths. Although I know there isn't much you can do to stop these kinds of players, it still gets annoying because they completely ruin the experience.",Vent,
"I used to play Valorant a lot and peaked at Immo 2. After grinding, I eventually lost passion for the game bc the only thing I get after every act is a dumb gun buddy. At least League gives me a free skin + chromas yk?

I had a friend who was like Gold 2 who wanted to play with me, and for once, I was down. As soon as we enter the lobby, I get absolutely stomped. I genuinely couldn't win an aim duel for my life. IIRC, I botfragged and profusely apologized to my team. I wanted to blame it on the fact that I went from a 1080p to a 1440p monitor but realistically, it was truly humbling.

Has anyone else had an experience like this?",Vent,
"Everyone keeps telling me I need to lower my sens and dpi if I want to get better. I play at 3200 dpi and 0.57 send in game, I only use my wrist and can fight neon and waylay pretty easily when they dash around. I used to be able to hit headahots but after vacation I can't anymore. I like current sens but if it's really holding me back then I might try changing it.",Vent,
"The Valiant Hero bundle, except for the slightly atrocious Ares skin, Is a VERY underrated bundle imo. The Vandal is a masterpiece of Riot design. It gives that 2021 Valorant aesthetic. The handpainted textures on this Vandal are astonishingly detailed, with grey fades around the curves of the model to emphasize wear and tear and add to the soft, cloudy aesthetic the rest of the skin has. The smoke momentarily pauses their flow as you fire your bullets and the mountains on the skin rise up as you pull out the gun and as you reload. When you take the magazine out, the details on the side of the gun disappears and reappears when you reinsert the magazine with its own rising animation, a very unique design among Valorant skins. It has its own custom reload animation thats basically the opposite if the Reaver reload. Reaver uses magic to move the mag into the chamber, then you use your hand to cock the gun. Valiant Hero uses normal movement to insert the mag, then uses magic to cock the gun. Thats something many exclusive or ultra bundles cant do. Personally, and I know this is a VERY hot take, It’s design is better than Kuronami’s. Kuronami’s design is simply flat geometric pieces of interwoven katana-like pieces and whatever the hell the gun is made of. It looks cool, but there’s not much going on except for the fact it looks cool. Sure, a really good reload, but thats basically it. Ok im done with my 10pm rant about how i would absolutely cop valiant hero if appeared in the night market kBai.",Insight,
"Current career history is 11 wins, 4 losses. Of those 4 losses, I was match or team MVP in 3 of them. And for all of those games I've just hovered in Ascendant 1. Are we just accepting that you have to do better than 11/4 to rank up? My winrate is over 54% right now and I'm in the exact same spot after over 70 games",Insight,"The user is frustrated, but they are making a comment about the competitive game mode in general and how losses are punished greater than wins are rewarded"
"The new map cinematic was just released, and I have to say, it was the best map reveal video they have ever put out. It was incredibly successful in terms of both lore and the references it contained. Seeing the snake try to strike Sage while she was at her weakest, only for her to shatter the snake as she healed, and then rise back up even stronger, really shows that Riot is making progress with their lore. ​However, there are two points regarding the story that I didn't understand or felt were missing.

Is Sage completely healed? In the cinematic, it appeared that the machine had largely healed her, yet she still has crystals on her neck and arms. If this machine isn't a complete cure, will she be forced to push her limits again? Or, if she reaches that point of no return, will the machine be able to work again? (For example, even though the limit had already been exceeded for Omega Sage). Yes, this machine heals her for a while (or for an unknown duration), but how long will this regression last? ​

Where is Omen? This is more specific, but where is Omen? In the story, the two of them have always been described as being very close and ""two broken souls."" Their pasts complemented each other. Apart from that, Riot released a message a few weeks ago that Omen sent to Brimstone, saying, ""How can I ignore his pain? After everything he has done for me, please tell me what I need to do."" It feels very strange to me that there hasn't been a word from him since that video. Either Riot is saving him for something bigger in the background, or they just released it for the hype and forgot about it later.",Insight,
"I know I'm part of the choir of the thousands of people complaining about this but out of all the time I've played this game, I've never seen an MMR system this bad in any game, and I've played League during the time where role-specific ranks were added.

I am a Diamond player. I've been Diamond ever since Ep5. While I will concede that I might just be bad at the game if I can't climb past Diamond, but this new MMR system has made that possibility all but impossible. In my past few games, I have been queued into high gold low plat lobbies as one of 2 sole D1s. Riot's new system basically forces those Diamond players to hard carry their games to climb.

My second most recent game, I was playing KJ on Ascent. I lost 7/13 going 22/16/4. Can't say I haven't tried, but I was paired against 2 P1s, 2 G2, and one D1. I had 1 P2, 2 G3s, and a G1. I lost 20 RR for that game.

My most recent game as KJ again, we won 13/6 going 12/9/3. I held my team, I played my role, even though i wasn't top frag, the rest of my team did well. Roughly same rank dispersal, and I only gained 13 RR.

Like, tell me why I'm punished for being queued with lower rank players, not being able to carry or perform like Chad Smith on the drums, and gain less and lose more for things that are well outside my control? I can't control who I'm paired with, I can't control how well my team will perform, I can only control how I perform, and in this system, if I don't perform like fucking Superman, I get punished.

Just pair me with high plats and low diamonds. Pair me with the actual rank I SHOULD be competing with, not those who I am performing above par with. All of this didn't even mention the argument of paring higher ranked players with lower ranked ones creates, which is the inability to actually learn and get better. I'm not going to get better playing against golds and plats. I will get better playing with higher skilled opponents, even if they kick my ass.

The old MMR system was fine. It truly was just fine. It was rough around the edges, sure, but it worked consistently.
",Vent,"While the user did state specific statistics and games, they also did pull from their latest two games, which tells us nothing about their actual gameplay and context. This is why I labeled this post as a vent. "
"I realise when it comes to ascent if my team do not destroy on defense, we are cooked . Or do valorant in general sucks at attacking on ascent? The two sites choke points can delay entry with just molly+ smoke. Mid control is important but that is only if smoker is willing to smoke mid or you are taking timing at mid.",Vent,
"I'm gonna be honest, ive been hardstuck in silver for about 5 years now. i believe i started playing mid 2021 and i improved a lot and reached silver 2-3 in about 3-4 months. ever since then i've been grinding to reach gold rank. I'm not even joking i still havent reached gold im still silver 3. I'm not blaming my teammates as well, if i gave u my footage i still do look like a silver its not like im held back by my teammates. I have a lot of patience and i geniuenly believed that i could reach gold in a matter of time. Seems like the time would never come. I wanna quit valo as well but i am not quiting it entirely idek why im playing this still man someone help give advice on comments pls",Vent,
"After seeing this short making the rounds, I thought I would make an explanation for some Valorant movement tech specifically related to jumping. As a quick preface, this stuff is NOT going to improve your ranked performance in any significant way. That's not to say there is no benefit -- successfully implementing this stuff could in theory provide a tiny advantage that could maybe lead to a won gunfight -- but personally I'm more into learning how the game works which is why I labbed how to do these things, and I'm less interested in whether or not they will actually get me unhardstuck.

I'm going to assume people are familiar with the basics of bhopping, air strafing, and silent jumps going up elevation (I will briefly touch on the last one later in this post though). If not, I'm down to make a beginner's guide to Valorant movement mechanics with those topics but for the purposes of this post and the short I referenced above, I'm just going to assume these are known.

Tech 1: Double Jump (linked short)
This isn't a new discovery, and you can find tiktoks about this from back in 2024 (perhaps earlier too). To briefly describe what is happening in the clip, you are essentially ""double jumping"" and appearing at the top of a stack of two half-height jumps a lot faster than normal. So what is really going on?

There are 2 things to note to understand what is happening. For starters, landing on top of a box is about as normal as it gets. You can continue to run off at full momentum, or jump again with full momentum. However, landing on the edge of a box, no matter how short, causes you to essentially bonk into the side of the hitbox, cutting your momentum entirely. Try it out: since the linked short takes us to Haven Grass, we only need to look a little to the left of where the short begins to see a tiny box right outside of Garage (next to some tall crates). Run at the box and land on it normally, then jump off it. Everything is as it should be. But then try landing on the front edge of the box. You may need to move back a bit and getting the distance right is a little finnicky. But if you do it successfully and then try to immediately jump again, you'll notice that you get sent straight up, losing all your speed.

What if we really want to land on the edge though (will be relevant soon)? There are two ways to do this. The first is what I outlined above: you simply space out far enough away from the first jump and land your parabolic jump at the very edge of the box. The second however is to clip into the ledge on the rising part of your jump before you ever even reach max height. To do the second method you need to be a lot closer to the box, just one step away (depending on your momentum approaching the jump). If you picture your jump as an arc, previously the edge would be all the way at the end of your jump. Now we are up against the box, your arc intersects the corner of the box right at the start. Keep this in mind since this means there are 2 ways to initiate the double jump.

The second thing to note is that your standing jump is higher than most jumpable objects littering the maps (on Haven you have the ledges going up Garage Window, Mid Window, behind Plat on C, outside A lobby by the T side, and inside A lobby just for a few examples). Going back to that small box we were looking at outside Garage, you'll notice that you can even hurdle the entire thing. Because the peak of your jump is higher than the height of the box, in order to land on the thing, you will need to spend time ""falling down."" This is a problem for the double jump tech: we want to be able to instantly get up these boxes.

The way around this ""falling"" problem is to start our jump from a crouched position and then stand up mid air. This lowers us enough so that our peak jump height is a little lower than normal, and by extending our legs and uncrouching mid air, we land on the box faster, saving the brief window of time that previously we had to fall down. This is simple enough, but still only half of the double jump tech.

One more point to note before getting into how the double jump is performed: there is not a lot of room to work with on the double jump boxes from the YT short I linked. The first jump -- the haybale ledge thing -- is very narrow, and we need to jump immediately after in order to get up to the second box. Simply landing on top of this haybale thing will not work. Because you don't have enough room, you will immediately bonk on the side of the second box, cutting your momentum. We need to maximize the space we have, so we need to start our second jump on the front edge of the first haybale ledge. But hold on, I said earlier that landing on the front edge cuts your momentum entirely. How are we able to land on that edge and keep moving forward?

This is where the tech comes in. While jumping to the first ledge, we need to crouch midair and tuck our legs in similar to how you would do a box jump in real life. By doing this, we can land as close to the front edge as possible while avoiding the issue of hitting/clipping into the side. Then, keep holding down crouch while you jump again immediately. If you are too slow, your momentum will carry you into the front of the second box and you will bonk, losing all your speed. By holding crouch as you jump immediately the second time, you are doing the crouch-into-uncrouch jump I mentioned earlier, which lets you get up that second box as fast as possible. Stringing these together allows for the instant double jump that you see from the short.

Method 1: The Far Approach

Since our goal is to clip the ledge on the first jump before chaining into the second double jump, we can use what I mentioned earlier which is to space out the start of the first jump far enough away from the box to perfectly land on the edge. This is an easier and more consistent method because of how forgiving the window to land is. For that same Grass double jump showcased in the short, the spacing is right about 1.5ish steps after crossing the archway (spawn barrier). This is clearly a farther jump than seen in the clip but will allow you to pop up the second jump instantly if done correctly exactly as shown in the short, preserving your forward momentum.

A couple things to note: doing this with your knife out is the hardest because of how fast you are moving. You will likely bonk onto the side of the second box unless you are very very precise with how you land your first jump -- at the very front edge as much as possible. Imgur link to illustrate this. With a gun in your hand, because you move slower, you are less likely to run into the front of the second box before you get your second jump off, making it easier. The second thing is that if you find yourself getting up the second box slower than what you see from the short, that means you are landing your first jump too far onto the first ledge and you are bonking on the second jump. Move back, time your first crouch jump better, or tap crouch before jump on your first jump (this cuts your horizontal speed significantly). The input timings do not need to be super precise, but it is easier to input the first jump with crouch at the same time, and then let go of crouch as soon as you input the second jump.

Method 2: The Close Approach

This is the one shown in the video and relies on clipping the edge on your way up during the first jump. The inputs are the same with a crouch jump into holding crouch while inputting a perfectly timed second jump and releasing crouch after, but the window you have to perform this is a lot harder.

First you should absolutely bind mousewheel to jump. It’s generally a good thing since it allows you to land consistent bunny hops as the mousewheel buffers a bunch of jump inputs saving you from worrying about timing, but specifically here due to how close in time the two jumps need to be performed, one single scroll on the mouse will perform both jumps needed. More importantly though, the difficulty of this “close approach” double jump comes from the fact that timing your first crouch jump even slightly too soon means you don’t clip into the ledge and land too far in the middle of the top of the first jump. Too late and you go too far forward and either bonk the first jump or bonk into the front of the second. There is a tight window where you are perfectly able to teleport up both jumps and in order to get it you simply have to play around. Keep in mind the spot you initiate the jump will be literally right up against the first jump while traveling at run speed.

You can also do this tech sideways. The timings are the same, it just becomes a little harder because you won't be able to see the boxes you are jumping towards. With a little practice, this is actually a lot easier than it seems.

Overall, the grass double jump specifically is easy due to the ample amount of room you have to build momentum and run up towards the boxes if you’re doing method 1, and the first jump has a wider-than-usual ledge which makes the timing requirements less precise. Contrastingly, the jumps up to Garage Window are incredibly narrow. Doing the jump from the front where ledge 1 is the narrowest is much much harder, but it’s still doable. Approaching from the side makes it easier here. The A lobby jump to fight an A long op is also hard because you have to do it sideways (so you can look towards A long) which means you can't look at the boxes you are jumping up and have to build intuition on when to time your inputs. The ledges outside of A lobby on the T side are easy to do sideways with a gun, but because of how narrow they are, doing it sideways with a knife is a lot more precise.

Tech 2: Bonus Silent Jump
The second movement tech is something som likes to showcase very often: first clip from this short. However, his explanation is quite unhelpful and no one likes a gatekeeper, so I'll break it down. It's a lot easier than it seems -- the core mechanic is something most players know. When bhopping/jumping, if you are traveling up elevation (where you start the jump is lower in elevation than where you end), you don't make noise when landing. Contrastingly, if you simply jump in place, you will hear a loud thump when you land (lay off the carbs bud). The second point is that when you initiate a jump while pressing your walk key, the start of the jump is silent. If you are jumping in place, you will still make a sound when you land, but the initial jump will not make noise. On the other hand, if you don't press your walk key, the start of the jump makes sound, and landing also makes sound. So with these two together, if you initiate a jump while tapping your walk key at the same time, then land in a spot higher than where you began, the entire thing will be silent. Putting this in action, if you find a staircase and spam jumps while holding walk or simply tapping walk every time you jump, you can go up the whole thing silently.

So how is som able to seemingly get silent jumps while on flat terrain? The secret is with crouching. When you start a jump while crouched and then uncrouch midair and land uncrouched, the game treats this as if you have traveled up elevation. This idea is what makes silent jump spots work too. If you are doing the silent jump bhops up a staircase, and on the last jump of the staircase, you land on the top level/flat ground while crouched, first of all you are still silent because where you landed is higher in elevation then where you began the jump (still on the stairs at that point), but more importantly, you can then jump again and uncrouch in midair to get another silent jump on flat ground. That's it. That's the tech. It is impossible to get any more silent jumps after this.

The reason som's clips make it seem like he is silent jumping forever is because he is taking advantage of map geometry. A lot of slight ramps and small uphill sections litter the maps, and you can chain one bonus silent jump into a new series of silent jumps if there is another uphill section. Take the first short I linked on pearl for example. We can count his jumps:

Jump 1: going from flat ground to a ramp

Jump 2: continuing up the ramp

Jump 3: landing on flat ground crouched (you can see him crouch if you pay attention to the perspective

Jump 4: still on flat ground but uncrouching midair this is the bonus jump

Jump 5: he just baaaaarely catches the next set of staircases (like literally the very first stair) which counts as uphill

Jump 6: going up that second staircase

Jump 7: landing on flat surface (jump started from the stairs though). He may have crouched here but it is unnecessary as the next jump leads straight into another uphill staircase

Jump 8: new staircase

Jump 9: accidentally made a step, choked harder than the cove incident.

While the theory behind this tech is very simple, chaining multiple in a row like he does is surprisingly hard. In order to preserve your momentum, you can't just hold walk. You need to time your walk presses with your jumps (or just bind walk and jump to one key), which means you are freely running 99% of the time, so one mistimed jump will result in an audible step. Also, sometimes if you jump from a staircase to flat ground while crouched, you might make a step simply because the game thinks you didn't go high enough (remember landing while crouched means you are lower than normal, so if you jumped from the very end of the stairs and landed crouched, you might have actually gone down from the game's perspective even though you went up the stairs)",Insight,
"With the state of the current ranked ladder, Valorant would significantly benefit from separating the ranked queues that allow for stacking and solo/duo as their own ladders (just how riot also does in League of Legends).

A ranked ladder that allows for solo/duo queue max gives a much better and more accurate representation of individual-skill than one that allows for 3 stacking, 5 stacking etc (especially when there are no rank limits to who you can actually 5stack with).

The stacking allows people to be placed in ranks they don't belong in a lot easier. For example if someone were naturally a silver player and got carried to plat by stacking with diamonds, ascendants, immortals etc. Their visible rank would show as plat, and then if that person decides to queue solo one day they're going to be in plat lobbies ruining the game for real plat players, despite only being a silver-level player themselves.

Separating ranked ladders and having a solo/duo limit would also help decrease smurfing and boosting would be less prevalent than it currently is.

Does anyone know if Riot has addressed why they don't have a solo/duo ladder and a flex ladder the same way they do in League?",Insight,
"Being a solo and getting squaded up with a premade is just straight bs. No one comms, stuck with throwers, and then the other team is just an in sync squad. To many matches go like this. Killing the fun",Vent,
"Guys, I also need help. I'm really stuck in Immortal 2. I've been mining DM and Aim labs lately, but I don't see any progress. Three to four days ago, I was frying in the same lobby, and now my consistency has dropped and I'm losing my duels Nightfury#Rocky tracker. Please help me to get better so i can reach radiant",Vent,
"Man it kinda sucks that as a new player you don't get gear and new agents but instead you have to give up on cosmetics for more characters, kinda wish the agent gear was gotten by playing specific agents rather then just having to buy both with the same reward",Insight,
"I was 20 RR from silver 3. I qeued one game, lose the game but it was close. I match MVP so I think that was a good game it was just unlucky. I qeue another, 2 instalock duelists who are absolutely petrified of site. Reyna dying every round with both blinds by herself in Narnia. Raze just ego peeking everything etc. The rest of my team tries hard as hell to win. Another close game with high frag kills for me. We lose and I lose 31 RR. I look at scoreboard after and my 2 duelists are plat. Why? How?

I continue to tilt qeue because I’m doing absolutely everything in my power to hit gold again before this act ends. 4 games in a row insta lock duelists who leave after pistol round or just don’t know how to play. Continous games where I’m trying my nuts off to win and going positive but 3/5 of my teammates are negative and for their own faults. What do you do on days like this? How do I get out of this? I know I should’ve stopped qeueing after the 2nd loss but I wasn’t playing bad. Idk just defeating I guess because I try not to blame my teammates but when they’re literally trolling or just throwing what else can I do?

The close games I went back and VoD reviewed and tried to figure out rounds I could’ve won but didn’t and yeah there were a few but I still feel like I shouldn’t have to go 40-10 on KJ to win in a silver lobby. I play with immortals and stay caught up with them in swifts/customs I too frag almost every game. I usually try to instalock duelist but I’ll play smokes sometimes if the team needs it. Idk man I’m losing it.",Vent,
"I have been a Valorant player for around 6 months now, not a long time but enough for me to experience the game. My peak rank is Bronze 3, and for anyone wondering, it is because I dont play that much. I usually only play 3 - 4 matches for every week.

I am not somebody who has played shooting games for a long time. I just got a good-enough laptop to play recently, that's when I started Valorant.

At first, it was good. Quite balanced game, I dont meet to many problems in the games. After I got to Bronze, things started to change. I got paired with smurfs, with stupid teammates, and being choked quite a few times. The RR gained when I played a good match is significantly lower than the RR I lost when I met a horrible game. I'm just stucked in Bronze 3 for a few weeks now. I just want to ask for everyone' opinion. How did you guys make this game less sufferable? I just want to chill and play a few games to have fun, but Valorant makes it so hard to even enjoy the game now.",Vent,
"VALORANT has become stale. After 6 years of gameplay the way you play maps in higher elo has become highly optimized. Before I knew how to play haven for example I used to be so much fun, trying out new things to outplay the enemy (I was also 2000 something elo below where I am now). Now it is just hold deep lines for info and stack the correct bomb sites. This invariance in gamplay has become boring and new agent releases don't change the way you play different maps either.

After playing VALORANT less actively I discovered TFT and what keeps me queuing is the high variance. Your augments and shops change every game introducing variance to each one. Sure this also makes some lowroll games unplayable but others incredibly fun where the stars align for you. And TFT keeps being fresh every two weeks where there are balance changes and a new set is introduced every couple months.

Now VALORANT can't change its fundamental gameplay mechanics and gimmicks every couple months the way TFT does but they could introduce variance between games. Make shields cost less money on pistol round, have random cheap guns make more money, or special effects on lower win rate champions. Bans would introduce variance but rather restrict gamplay than encourage alternative gamplay.

With Icebox supposedly coming back, it will in all likelihood just be viper, sova, killjoy plus two idiots locking reyna and jett. And if you change the change the core of those three agents you put yourself at a disadvantage. I am just tired of playing the same game for 6 years. idk how you guys feel about this but lately there has not been much of an incentive for me to play. Gun buddies and battlepasses just don't do it for me anymore",Vent,
"It's swiftplay, not competitive. I don't understand why most people try to curse out the other team after the game or a round is over, regardless of a win or lose, like what? Was a losing streak so bad on comp that they have to result in bullying people on a game mode meant for casual play or a game mode where people aren't even trying?? I bet if the people they're bullying actually tried, they might end up throwing their keyboards out the window in a fit of pure rage.",Vent,
"As soon as you win a couple of games you get put in games way above your rank. If I'm still in gold why am I put in plat/diamond lobbies?

Even if its the system ""testing"" me with higher MMR, why am I still gaining and losing the same amount of RR? It's ridiculously demotivating knowing you will only climb if you play hundreds of games.",Vent,
"I've been playing on and off for a year now and climbing steadily to my peak or Gold 2 and current Gold 1. I'm used to RR +/- in the range of 20 and playing with lobbies a bit above my rank, but a recent loss streak clearly destroyed my MMR. I'm regularly placed with mostly Silvers, even a couple Bronzes.

That's fine, but it continues to happen even though I get MVP most matches and do very well in others. I get bigger RR loss for a Team MVP than gain for a Match MVP. There's never a Great Performance bonus, and the game clearly doesn't consider me a great performer because it continues to place me in worse and worse lobbies.

I have little trust this will reverse through play unless I grind a shit ton of games. Anyone have stories of similar situations? Does coming into a new act reset this?",Vent,
"My rank just goes from diamond to plat here and there, but for some reason ive been dropping the same kills in every lobby.

Like i literally drop about the same kills in a full plat, dia and asc lobby. And yeah its usually a negative kd lol i always drop around 14-15 kills. Even in full asc lobbies i have the exact same kd i seriously don't know what the issue is. I was d2 on my account but rn im p3 and been getting the same kills, i mean sometimes i do carry and get 20+ kills but its not that often.

Apart from this i have an alt account and somehow im p1 on it without even trying. But on my main account i just dont know why I'm getting the same kills even in full asc lobbies",Vent,
"I have a terrible K/D (day avg - 0.5)and tracker score (300) at silver, what to do..... My aim is highly inconsistent with 13% headshot, I have okayish Game-sense I'd say, but I lose when caught in utils, reyna blinds, cypher traps, etc etc....... pls upper lobby ppl help me .....I have heard every generic advice about aim training, and they don't seem to work for me in actual matches....",Vent,
"Now that we've seen Summit in the Masters London showmatch, what does everyone think? The 3-lane, 2-site layout seems pretty standard, but those droppable walls on A, B, and Mid look like they could completely change how we play post-plant and cut off rotations. Are you excited about the new wall mechanic, or do you think it's going to be a nightmare in solo queue?",Insight,
"I wanna enjoy a full unrated match and half of the matches either my team or enemies ff as soon as 5th round or a little later. Can't yall just stop whining and play? riot should make ff system same as ranked, if 5 agree then surrender but not 4 because if ur whole team is a quitter the match is over, and its annoying.

theres too many ffs lately",Vent,
"I was alaways wondering what if valorant added an in-game or extern market where players could sell their skins for valorant points so they can get rid of their unused or unwanted anymore skins that some users might want a bit cheaper(lets say a 10% off), or buy old exclusive skins at a high price. Since this will not give players real money, only vp and it will be made in-game or an external site made by the valorant team, riot wont lose any money practically. What do you guys think about this?",Insight,
"I am playing VALORANT from two years, but was inconsistent so I started playing once again this past week and I don’t know how my moment and my aim is improved and I’ve got compliment like I am playing like a silver player, but the main problem is I somehow manage to rank up till bronze three after reach three, my teammates got worse like minding their own business, not on site, not helping me. I was alone, pushing and dying when I focus while playing the game. I play good. I play incredible shots, but when my focus is distorted, I cannot play good. I played death match with D2 to G1 players and manage to get third with 32 kills any tips and tricks that might improve my game. Please help me.",Vent,
"Sheriff is the most seen gun in splash arts
Classic | Miks, Veto, Clove
Shorty | Viper
Frenzy | Killjoy, Neon
Ghost | Cypher
Bandit |
Sheriff | Phoenix, Gekko, Iso, Vyse, Tejo, Waylay
Stinger | Sage
Spectre | Reyna, Yoru, Fade
Bucky | Skye
Judge | Raze, Breach, KAY/O
Bulldog | Astra, Harbor
Guardian | Omen
Phantom | Jett, Deadlock
Vandal |
Marshal |
Outlaw |
Operator | Sova
Ares |
Odin | Brimstone
Tour de Force | Chamber

We need some more sniper and assault rifle representation in the splash arts. Literally over half the agents are holding a pistol, the Sheriff looks cool but snipers always look so good (example: Sova).

Waylay’s gun was hard to identify but from the hammer and iron sight I’m like 95% sure it’s a Sheriff. Not sure why they drew it so small though when it’s huge in every other splash.",Insight,
i told everyone to surrender and instead of surrendering this guy called me a crybaby,Vent,
"KAY/O only existing on Alpha Earth makes no sense. I’ll fix that
There can be two possible options for an “Omega KAY/O”

Option #1: Omega‘s Clone

During a cross-dimensional mission, they find a deactivated version of KAY/O. Omega scientists could reverse-engineer that model of KAY/O and build a brand new, functional KAY/O whose motives are programmed to align with the Valorant Legion. This would work best gameplay-wise, as it is just, well…, an exact clone of KAY/O. As for KAY/O‘s iconic wear and tear, it could be easily explained as incidents during experiments.

Option #2: Sister Unit

During the Radiant War in KAY/O’s timeline, he couldve been built alongside a sister model. I’ll invent smth uh…. Ok, EM/A “Eliminate Malicious Assailants”. I don’t know that’s all i could think of ANYWAYS. This sister unit couldve been built with the same utility, just with slightly different goals than KAY/O’s. Instead of aggressively hunting opponents down she could be a sneakier machine. Valorant Legion could have found and brainwashed EM/A into a machine that aligns with them, causing heartbreak for KAY/O and giving Riot MASSIVE potential to build on KAY/O and EM/A’s characters, their shared history, etc etc…, basically a really good lore expansion if they do decide to do something like that.

Ok Im don listing my idea lmk if this has any flaws kBaiii",Insight,
"I took a break from Valorant and came back to seemingly an uptick in racist/misogynistic players in vc. I've tried reporting them after muting them, but it seems that a lot of my reports either don't end up going anywhere or in the rare case, they're penalized a few days later. Correct me if I'm wrong, but I thought they implemented (or was going to) a system that would monitor what players say live (?). I'm just trying to vibe out, make friends, and not hear hateful rhetoric, but I'm curious whether it's even worth it to report or if I should just mute and block.",Vent,
"Valorant has access to enormous amounts of telemetry data—scans, utility value, space creation, information gained, damage prevented, and trade setups—yet much of the visible performance evaluation still appears heavily correlated with kills. This encourages selfish play patterns and undervalues many of the actions that actually win rounds.I do not know exactly what goes into ACS and rr gain/ loss but I do know a large part of it comes down to K/D and clutches. However, that is such a bad representation of your value to the match. Here are the following most glaring issues that has led this misrepresentaion to inflating the rr of undeserving players and suppressing good support agents.

1) Putting too much value on K/D has led to so many players just playing for kills and exits that it's a problem. This can be seen in Diamond- Ascendant (and even low immortal) where we often get duelists who just play for kills and have no regard of risking their lives in crucial moments of the match. conversely, it has led to selfless duelists who hard entry and often end up with bad kds both gain less and lose more rr than they deserve. In my opinion, if someone is on the duelist role and they die first, it should have little to no regard on how it contributes ( or takes away from) the ACS. For support agents the acs calculation should stay the same but due to the nature of the duelist role, KD shouldn't be a main determining factor of ACS.

Conversely, exit frags should contribute little to no contribution to the final ACS. Everyone in every rank has had people who give up on the game and just play for exits to minimise the rr they lose. that actually works and ideally shouldn't. If that strategy is effective, the system is rewarding the wrong behavior.

2) Assists from support agents should contribute more to the final ACS and rr. I've had so many games on sova with 15+ assists and a large margin win to only get +19 because of less kills. In my opinion, Initiator scans that lead to kills, smoke assists, flash assists, kayo suppression, vulnerables etc should all lead to a greater contribution to the ACS and rr especially when they come at crucial moments of the game like post plants and retakes.

3) Utility usage that does not lead to an assist but nonetheless contribute to massive impact must be evaluated. Some examples include:

Sova drone clears an entire site but nobody gets a kill.

Omen smoke denies an Operator angle for 20 seconds.

Viper wall forces a rotation.

Cypher cam spots a lurk.

KAY/O knife reveals four players.

These can completely win rounds without generating assists.

4) Ultimately, there should be role-specific evaluations. the ideal playstyle of each role differs so much that judging them all under the same framework is stupid and does not work for a tactical shooter with agent variance. Different roles create value in different ways, and the performance system should reflect that.",Insight,
Its not a biggie but I really cannot play more than one comp game at a time as the adrenaline from top fragging or winning causes me to shake enough to knock off my aim. I really want to play more as my hidden mmr is predicting such a higher rank than I am but if I can't play consistently I may not be able to reach it before the ranks reset. Has anyone else had a problem like this??,Vent,
"The reason I am posting this, is to share a mindset tip that I have used to help others in their ranked journey that may also benefit some people here on this subreddit. After having coached thousands of players I have noticed a very prevalent pattern and error that people make in their mental-game and approach to Valorant ranked. People often have the tendency to focus on and hyper fixate on the RESULT of their comp games rather than having a performance-based mindset. This is also something that happens particularly in games where they may perform well but still lost (for whatever the reason may be, even if they had horrendous teammates, etc). Focusing on these sort of games won't do anything positive for you and will just lead to a negative mindset and possibly tilt.

Something I like to tell my students all the time is that you can ""win"" even when you lose. What I mean by that is, when you lose a game you basically have 2 options in your mind. You can either just accept the loss and move on without thinking about it (only focusing on the result of the game) or, you can switch your mindset to focus on your own gameplay rather than the result of the match itself. Your ""win"" is that even if you technically lost the match, you still gained something from it that you can immediately implement in your next game and increase your chances of winning your next game/s because you have IMMEDIATELY noticed something that you can improve upon right away. This leads to consistent fast-tracked improvement.

Focus 100% on your own performance ALWAYS, don't go into ranked games with your main focus before you queue up being ""I want to win X amount of games, win X amount of RR, get to this rank by X amount of time, etc"". This way of thinking leads many people to approach ranked with a sort of ""gambling"" mindset. When you focus too much on the OUTCOME of the game itself, people often find themselves queueing up again for the sole purpose of trying to gain their RR back or just getting the win back etc. You have to approach comp with the mindset that your rank will simply be the result of your individual performance over time.

By switching your mindset every time you queue and whenever you're in a match, to focus entirely on your performance, any mistakes you make as they happen, things you could've done better, just analyzing your gameplay as a whole, that allows you to identify areas of your own game to work on which you can then implement in your future games much faster. By implementing them in your future games, you will perform better consistently because you are actively improving and will inevitably rank up.

You should try to remember that your rank is simply a byproduct of your performance over time. Don't think about whether you're winning a game, losing a game, how much RR you're winning or losing etc. Focus fully on your performance and let the results just be a byproduct of that. And remember that even if you lose, you can still take your ""wins"" from it.",Insight,
"I have returned to Valorant this act after a longer break. Generally I have been having fun, and I ranked up from Gold 1 to Gold 3. I play duelist, mainly Jett. I play duelist, because I am having the most fun on this role and I can't stand playing passive. I enjoy being the first to go in and open a site. I enjoy taking a first pick on defense. But a good game feels rare. Usually I am on the lower half of the scoreboard. I just feel like I don't belong in the rank I am in right now. In a game my performance is often variable. I have some terrible rounds, and some good rounds. But I rarely have a game where after I feel like I did well. While other people are hardstuck, I feel like the opposite is happening to me. I am ranking up, even though I should probably be hardstuck. Don't get me wrong, I am not complaining that I am ranking up, but I really want to improve, and not just get a slightly higher rank. And also having this many bad games just feels unfun. usually if you are in the rank you belong, you should not be bottom fragging every other game, right? Is there any advice, that could help me?",Vent,
"I have a question about the matchmaking system in this game. Most of my games have smurfs almost always exclusively on enemy team and when it isn't a smurf its just blatantly someone like a full rank higher (like silver 1 playing an enemy gold 1 or 2 and the rest of my team is like silver and bronze) and they'll go like 28/4. I'm not good at the game but I want to get better and it's difficult when I'm matched against people who I, and my entire team for that matter, clearly cannot compete with yet and its 99% of the time on the enemy team.",Vent,
"Heyyoo help ya girl out~~ Just got to lv20 and can now play comp! Got to Iron II but immediately ranked down after 5 LS lmaooo. Send tips and tricks, please! Aim's still shtty and sometimes dying w/out even seeing the enemy dangg",Vent,
"Dont know if anyone needs this, but here is how to start Valorant from another Launcher:

In this example i will use Steam, but it should work more or less the same on other launchers which have these options:

Adding games from other sources

Adding launch parameters

# Adding the Game

Click on ""Add a Game"" on the bottom left in your Library on Steam

Click on ""Add a Non-Steam Game""

In the opened window, click on the ""Browse"" button

Navigate to ""C:/Riot Games/Riot Client""

Select RiotClientServices.exe

Click ""Add Selected Programs"" in the Steam Window

# Configuration

Search for RiotClientServices in your Library and select it.

Click on the gear icon under the bottom right of the game banner.

Click on ""Properties""

Make sure the ""Target"" Fieldcontains ""C:\Riot Games\Riot Client\RiotClientServices.exe""

Make sure the ""Start In"" Field contains ""C:\Riot Games\Riot Client""

Now set ""Launch Options"" to ""--launch-product=valorant --launch-patchline=live""

Make sure the name field says VALORANT

(I guess launch product tells riot the game to launch and launch-patchline the branch to start the game, most will probably only have live as option, you can check in your riot client under Settings -> Valorant -> Current Patch)
7. Youre done, you can test it by simply launching the game from steam
# Additional Game Images (REQUIRES BOOP INSTALLED, OR DOWNLOAD BY YOURSELF)
If you want to have the artworks of valorant shown on Steam, you can either download ones yourself from the internet (Customize in Properties -> Customization) or follow the instructions:

Go to Steamgriddb

Search ""Valorant""

You will need 4 images: Grid, Hero, Logo and Icon

For each category, hove over the blue dot, it should say ""Apply with Boop (non-steam)"" or something

A window should open from Boop. In there select Valorant. Do this for each image category.

# DONE
It should now look like this:
",Insight,
"Hi, my name is Soul. Been playing valorant for about 3 years now and I wanna improve to a higher level. But I'm hard stuck plat and i really wanna put the effort into going pro no matter how long it takes. I need guidance. Its easy for me to keep a cool head majority of the time but I beat myself up on making simple mistakes. I wanna take my skill cap to a high level, and improve efficiently. If anyone can help me that would be forever appriciated. Maybe by someone who used to be an asc or immortal player.",Vent,
"Sort of like League, but to me is a but too simple and allowing to give it to people in your party kind of beats the point.


I wanted to know if you'll like something like that and what/how. I think at the very least it adds to the game.


Riot take my feature request (lmao):

— At the end of a competitive game, on the stats screen with the player cards you have 4 ""honor"" buttons.

— You can give honor to only 2 non-party teammates and you can only honor the same teammate once.

— Those four buttons or categories to honor represent:

+ Role mastery

+ Communication

+ Ideas/game plan

+ Vibes/positivity

— The honors received stack during the Act but get cleared after the Act is over.


Just with that and being able to see it in my rank screen or in the lobby banner (or even the chat one) I think it's cool.


But I'm sure they could play/test with showing it in agent select maybe or some rewards at the end of the act or after getting the same honor consecutive acts, idk.
",Insight,
"The purpose of this post is to help people who may be grinding out or spending time on aim trainers before they have become very good or have mastered the fundamental mechanics of the game. Hopefully this may help some of you see faster improvement in your own games and ranked journeys.

A lot of players spend far too much time playing aim trainers thinking it will make a significant impact to their performance and improvement in Valorant. This post isn't to say aim trainers are ""bad"", but there are much more efficient warm ups, drills, and forms of practice you could be doing that will cause you to see visible improvements in-game a lot faster than grinding out aim trainers will. This also isn't to say you won't see ANY improvement in your mechanics from using aim trainers, but just that the improvement will be slower and in smaller amounts compared to the improvement you would see if you mastered the fundamentals.

When you're below Immortal (and even many players who are still in low-mid immortal) you still haven't mastered the basic fundamentals of the game, so you should be drilling and focusing on these before adding aim trainers to your warmup routine. Once you have a very good grasp on the fundamentals, this is when you want to start thinking about adding aim trainers to your routine.

Most good players use them as a warmup rather than for actual improvement. Pretty much all of your kills in val will come from a combination of your movement and crosshair placement. Raw aim does matter, but significantly less than every other mechanic related to aim/gunfights.

A much more efficient approach to improvement would be to master the more crucial mechanics in-game, and once you have a very good grasp on them you THEN start adding aim trainers for that extra buffer.",Insight,
"Literally every single game, and I 100% mean it when i say every single game has like a Jett or a Pheonix or a Reyna that goes something like 39/6/12 and gets 1-2 aces. At this point even cs2 is better, not literally every game has a cheater there at least, maybe u get to enjoy something.

Halfway through the game I lose all motivation to play, no matter which team gets the smurf.

League does not have the same issue, same developer tho. I dont think its really that hard to take care of it

Edit : holy fk this is not about loosing games. I am climbing at the moment, I am just not having fun seeing my jett or the enemy jett anihilate the opposing team all the time. I had a few of them be named something like ""totally new player"" and some of you come here at tell me that this is just in my head. holy cope",Vent,
"I recently reached platinum 1 and ever since, I feel like I'm just terrible at the game. In gold I used to have a positive KD almost every game but in platinum I very rarely play good anymore. It feels like I'm consistently get 1-tapped but I can't 1-tap back. I usually play sentinels or controllers, rarely initiator. Seems like counter-strafing and raw aim is a big factor in platinum from the videos I have watched. I play on Frankfurt and London servers (I'm Estonian). Any tips would be welcome!",Vent,
i'm immotral 1. but the thing is i'm so frickin bad at this game and i dont know what happened my first bullet accuracy is terrible and my aim just has degraded ever since i ranked up. i used to be good at this game how do i get better again please help. keep in mind i am immortal so i do know a lot about this game and technique so some more specific and critical advice would be useful.,Vent,
"The past 2 weeks I’ve lost ~300 elo. I keep getting games with teamates that leave, tilt after round 3, are just completely horrible, throwers, people that genuinely have 0 care if they win, horrible alt accounts who don’t care to win on my team, and so much more to give me horrible uncontrollable variables. I’ve legit averaged 20-25 the past 10 games and have lost 9. It’s not a once in a day thing either, it’s like every other game I’m getting this. Its horrible. I’m guessing this is due to the act almost ending for the hard rank reset. But seriously, it’s genuinely insane. I wanted to make my push to hit immo (I hit it back in ep9) and I was asc3 yet dropped to asc1 0rr in 3-4 days. It’s almost unplayable. I may just stick to swifts till next act, bc it’s kinda tilting tbh",Vent,
Im trying hard to not get mad at myself for sucking balls at the game but im just wondering when you started playing did you get better over time at aiming and positioning or did you have to actually train yourself,Vent,
"I honestly hope that it’s not only my delusions even though it’s most likely not happening, although I know I’m not the only one who noticed Sage’s outfit in recent trailers. I’m not talking about the dark one but the one that looks like current outfit but way more fresh, elegant and light. We know that Sage is getting a change, a buff or not but she is but what if they would change her current look as well? I feel like the camera was way too much focused on details technically we shouldn’t care about, I mean crystals on her body but in places you can’t even see in her current outfit in game (arms, forearms etc.) Everyone knows that Sage is hurting because she was overusing her powers so why would they still focus on that? There are multiple shots where you can see her from head to toe, it’s almost screaming „LOOK AT THIS NEW OUTFIT”. The outfit itself is way more detailed than outfits on other agents from different clips and honestly it looks so much alike her current outfit, no drastic changes and it’s still screaming SAGE but it just looks cleaner and honestly it looks so good it makes me think „it HAS to be in the game”. I’m not a sage main or whatsoever and I do personally think that Sage is the weakest sentinel looking at her abilities (nothing to gain information from flank with) but honestly if they spent months for building up the tension, focusing everyone’s attention on one agent and their story just to drop „+10hp for heal” type of „buff” I’m going to be genuinely disappointed lol. I know that it never happened before where RIOT changed appearance or outfit of any agent before but they already made an exception for Sage by adding lore-accurate crystals to her in game model no? Other agents only went through some little touch ups but Sage looks different now even in game because of her lore. I think the new outfit, the fact that Sage is in the center of upcoming act alongside mentioned changes to her utilities would be a great combination of a „reborn sage”.
Also I don’t know why Riot didn’t think of that yet, maybe they did but decided it’s a bad idea for some reason but honestly what if Sage would have 2 slow orbs but she could be able to either throw them like she does right now or when get close to a wall place an orb on the wall (something like Deadlock’s sensor), that would be visible to allies when placed and it would have a range as well. The second someone would approach the area of it the slow orbs would detonate and slow but at the same time give a voice notification same as vyse wall, chamber’s trap etc. It doesn’t sound like a major change and makes Sage an actual sentinel, what do you think?",Insight,
"I placed iron and bronze everytime I do competitive games, and I can realize how bad I'm doing. Yet in skirmish, I'm perfectly relaxed and easily do instant one tap headshot flicks like I'm tenz. I placed gold and then reached platinum, and just comparing how I'm flicking and getting headshots to my actual game is sad. I don't get how I'm so good at skirmish, and obviously have great aim, but when I go in a real game, that aim just leaves? I can't get out of iron and bronze, and new act is coming up, so I won't get a chance to fix my rank for another act if I mess this one up.",Vent,
"I am bronze 1, but today I was put in a silver 2 to gold 1 lobby. Im not sure quite why but I thought I would try and learn from it, but I rapidly realised that util is used way more in gold ranks.


I was playing chamber as it had helped me get out of iron and I was consistently doing well with him as I play only snipers because I can't see heads due to my small monitor. But as I was playing, I was left on my own on B site breeze, I noticed its really difficult to work against the amount of util that was dropped on me as I lost all of mt range due to flashes and smokes.


They may have been smurfs as they were very strong and consistently so but I want to prepare for this before it happens. Do I need to begin changing to more defensive sentinels if I am to take up the sentinel slot? I play veto in swifts, should I maybe start using him in ranked again?


I really want to reach gold. Its the goal I have for this game but im not so sure if i can do it, if that lobby is average gold
",Vent,
"I have recently seen quite an influx of posts about how you get so little RR rewarded for wins and loose so much when losing. I also wanted to share my experience. I have had to hit Ascendant 3 Times this act, maintaining a positive Winrate, using all Ranked Shields, I have dropped to diamond 2 two times. And those RR gains while doing so were so minimal that it was just no fun. Solo Queue only btw.",Vent,
"I really don’t understand how or why but while I’m at least decent headshotter with the sheriff or headhunter I can only pray to have half of that aim with vand or phantom?!

Honestly I don’t understand why and I don’t even know how to investigate or identify the issue to work on fixing it. Any tips or anyone faced something similar?",Vent,
"I get discouraged so bad every day I get on that I either play too many games while tilt-queueing or I just immediately Alt-F4 every time I can’t make a play. My crosshair placement is pretty good but every time I spray and try to pull my shots down, I still end up plugging like 8-9 rounds into the sky or just paint a picture around someone’s noggin. I feel like all I’m ever good at is using whichever agent I’m using’s abilities to set up my teammates for a good play. But even then, 9/10 my teammates can’t win a gunfight or get the plant down on sight. Nor can they hold a post-plant. So any tips for me to get better would be greatly appreciated, thanks.",Vent,
"I've played the game for quite awhile and have accumulated tons of cool and unique cards, and while I have an option to favorite cards, I have no option to randomize it. I feel like this is a feature that should be added, I want to use different cards more often without having to do it manually. ",Insight,Labeled as insight because it provides a solid suggestion to the game. 
"There's been a lot of talk about how Sage could possibly be reworked fitting her more to a role of ""Battle Sage"". And it got me thinking, how would Agent variations change the game? Like some Agents having other versions of themselves that slightly alter how they play.

What I noticed about Valorant is about how Agent never really changes. It's not like League where you can have different builds and runes every game, sometimes altering your champion's gameplay a lot. Valorant agents are just kinda static, not saying it as a bad thing though! The only system that seems to alter the Agent itself is the map. Then again, there is also the skill ceiling of the agent itself.

But what if there was another system. What if Agents had tiny ability variations that alters how they play? Like Sage's healing could be changed to minimal healing but with an added damage boost. Or being able to play Harbor's old kit back.

To be honest, I'm not super on board with this idea but it gives depth and new experiences to Agents we already know and love instead of frequently adding new members to the cast which ends up being forgettable sometimes.

Simply hypothetical but I wanna know what you guys think.",Insight,
"I've been getting back into r6 lately and the pro scene has been completely new to me as I have always kept up with the Val pro scene since the beginning of franchising basically. I noticed how r6 rewards players with exclusive character skins/gun skins/etc. They are all really cool and I spend myself watching it more too. With Masters London going on. All we get is a 30 minute watch reward of the ""gutted"" title. Like we used to get a cool gun buddy watching or even a spray, that will be used more than titles lets be honest. idk I feel like the twitch rewards have been soooo mid as of lately for us. lmk what ur guys thoughts",Vent,"Classified as ""Vent"" because even though the user does point out a specific problem (""gun buddies have been 'mid' lately""), they do not provide a specific solution. "
"In around last 15 games i had in ranked at least 1-3 people who were trolling the match, how is that fair?",Vent,
"Question
Hi! I am currently hovering everywhere in ascendant but cannot for the life of me get the last bit of rr to get immo.

I peaked asc3 this act but rn im sitting in asc1, and I’m really wondering what is differentiating me as an asc and low imm. I really feel like I am in a massive slump this act despite it being my peak, sitting at a 0.97 kd, making this the first time I have a kd of less than 1.03/1.04 kd since pretty much forever. This is mostly because I changed sens for fun tho, but I changed back and I feel more comfortable than ever.

Tbh ive given up on imm this act cuz there’s 5 days left and I need a mental reset, but I still wanna finish as high as possible so that I place high next episode as well. So I need advice on how to improve to get immo and I plan on staying there",Vent,
"I've been playing val since it came out of beta, I've slowly climbed my way to diamond and I would say I'm pretty good. I mostly play swift now and every single one of my lobbies it's the worst people, level 20-30 accounts or teammates who are just terrible and have no brain. Every once in awhile I get a good lobby but it's just not consistent. I wouldn't think my hidden mmr is bad if I consistently do good in swifts, comp, unrated whatever it is so I just don't understand why. Has val just become a game where all the people who play swift suck or are new?",Vent,
"I just lost my 16th game in a row (mix of tdm, dm, swift, and ranked). I don’t understand how I’m still getting put against people that are so much better than me. For the ranked matches where I queue with my silver friend I understand, but my last win I went like 29/6 vs bronze and silver as iron 3. Every once in awhile I might have a good round/match, but in the end it’s still a loss. It’s also annoying getting huge rr drops from losing in higher rank matches…like of course I’m going to do worse",Vent,
I started this game 2 months ago after 3 years and.. just.. what is that...? A plat againsts bronze full team? Iv'e been told its bad but this is worst than I've expected.,Vent,
"My rank is b2, level 32 (I don't play much ranked). I started playing this game almost a month ago maybe 3 weeks with default settings, now the thing is I'm left handed and this is my first fps game (I only play story games) so my aim has been very shaky, initially I thought it was because of me being new but then I tried using my left hand to practice in aim and I did so much better despite being unfamiliar of using mouse w my left hand, I think this kinda also explain why my movement's decent but my aim's always shaky.


I played one swiftplay match with left hand settings(ijkl) although my movements were absolutely horrible, I did have a decent aim throughout but missed a lot because of slow and confused movements (the match ended 5-0, I had around 5 kills... middle fragging).


I also tried shooting those bots in range w vandal, I consistently had 25+ score using my left hand and 15-25 with my right hand despite being more familiar with it.

Now I'm wondering if it's worth it to switch to my lefthand for better aim or should I stick to my right hand, the switch is probably gonna take a week or more (to get familiar with the movement and everything).

I play on my gaming laptop, so I'm also considering getting an external keyboard so I can continue playing using wasd but with my left hand.",Vent,
"Hello. For reference, I am a fairly new player and I started in about the middle of February with about 70 hours in CS2. I am not very good at the game as my peak rank was Iron 2 while playing against silvers. The agents i play are in the categories of anything but duelist as my aim is at best has been like 25% headshot percentage.

Now, I have played a lot of different agents but I especially enjoy controllers. But as I get more experienced with the agents I choose to play(Currently Viper, Harbor, and Astra) I feel like I am getting worse with them. Like im not as creative with utility and I can't play like I used too. This is especially the case when I played a ton of omen. Now, when I play him fairly regularly he doesn't give me the same or similar results and just feels weird compared too when I first started. The only agent this doesn't apply to is Chamber.

And if you guys talk about how my agent pool is bad, I spend half my time.setting up my duo who plays the more ""normal"" ranked agents like Reyna and Clove",Vent,
"I've been playing Valorant since 8th grade. I'm now a junior in high school and I'm still silver. Valorant isn't a game I play too often (I usually go through 3-month-longish phases with it) but after 4 years of playing, I really shouldn't be silver still. I know its totally my fault that I haven't made any progress in my skill but I guess the question is, how do I progress in skill? I guess I always assumed it'd be a 'naturally get better as you go' type of thing and while yes, to a certain extent that is accurate, game sense can only take you so far without skill. I was just thinking about how crazy it is to show no improvement after 4 entire years and I want to do something about it. Any advice on how to lock tf in?",Vent,
"Hi, i come from CS, and i am enjoying valorant alot more. Thst being said o think o hit a plateau, gold 3 for 2 weeks now... How can i break the barrier and move foward? I feel inconsistent, and sloppy, even after watching proplay",Vent,
"I don't want to play CS2 because its just too vanilla and I'm tired of going mother to mother with russians.


Valorant used to be the perfect candidate for me, simple and helpful UI's, has good lore, cinematics, aesthetically superior, had decent gameplay with mechanics taken/inspired from different games and you'd have fun even while playing with randoms.

Now its just a shithole. Not to mention ranked system is just too exploiting, designed solely to increase playtimes and manipulate people into playing more by forcefully matchmaking them with bad teams and better enemies, ruining their day in the process. Not to mention having a kernel level access anti-cheat, resulting in privacy concerns and lots of users never even downloading the game because of it, and still somehow managing to be worse at keeping away cheaters than CS2.


But I also know I can't do shit myself because a whole ass greedy company owns the game and does whatever tf they want with it, usually making -not so spoiler alert- the worst decisions, ending up with losing more and more players by each day.


So what could be done, like really. Is the community already pressuring riot (which from what I know it does) but it seems like they dont gaf.",Vent,"The user states valid, concrete points that have been brought up by other community members. However, the post was labeled ""Vent"" because it does not provide any real solutions or ways forward. "
"Idk, this style of ""upgrading"" guns with another currency is just so TEDIOUS and ANNOYING. I just spent $100 on your charity bundle, the least you could do is spare me the headache of grinding the battlepass to make your already expensive cosmetics usable. Plus, I just FINISHED THE CURRENT ONE. How do you expect us to pay another $50 just to give the guns the animations I BOUGHT them for?? I've been playing valorant for years, and now that I'm finally really getting back into it this just seems like a big F U from riot. I understand upgrading the cosmetics you buy from your daily shop, but expensive ass bundles should come upgraded.",Vent,
"I was super close to Silver 1 (literally 1 RR away), then had a bad streak and went all the way down to Bronze 1. I have played 160 matches in Bronze 3 up until that point in this act. No throwers, very few smurfs, no bot accounts, etc. As soon as I dropped to Bronze 1 6 games ago, I have had 2 games with throwers on my team, 1 game with a smurf on the enemy team (42-7 KDA), and 2 games with bots on my team. Only 1 normal game.


I looked at the trackers for the throwers. 1 had a peak of Gold 2 and had been throwing for 2 weeks. The other was a new account, and had started that day. The smurf seemed to be a bought account. The bots were brand new accounts and appeared to have a macro set to prevent going AFK.


My question is why did this suddenly start happening when I dropped? Surely just 2 divisions isn't THAT bad. This is making it infinitely more difficult to climb back to where I was.",Vent,
Because of the shotgun nerf i fell from gold to silver its just impossible to use a shotgun if you have to be stationary when my strat is to jump like a rabbit getting unreal kills but thats all over now i cant use long range weapons so they fucked me.,Vent,
"Am I insane or have queue times never been this long.

I’m currently at 10 minutes for a standard Quick Play match.

I did turn off cross platform which I makes sense for longer queue times but you are telling me there are not 9 other similarly rated Xbox players in the middle of the US?",Vent,
"I started playing Val bout a month ago, and I started at bronze 2. I felt like I got past the stage of getting tilted off of defenders rushing, but today I had a particularly annoying game. This was my Gold rank-up game, and we were playing Fracture. We started off 0-4 and immediately our KJ starts egoing Astra about K/D after they rightfully called him out for baiting. With my help, we manage to pull it back to a 5-7 half. We end up only winning 1 round on attacker side because of the premise of this post. at around a 6-8 score, we are setting up to rush A. I'm playing Reyna, so naturally they expect me to entry. While Astra is setting up util, KJ runs in first with spike, no comms, and dies to A stack. Obviously, we lose the round off of this. KJ then proceeds to cry for the rest of the game about me ""playing like a pussy"" while doing the same bullshit every round. How do I combat this? This happens too often and makes me not want to play the game. Before that game, I had a 32-kill game with a 983 TRS score, and I don't feel like playing despite my form.",Vent,
"I am a Gold Viper main who loves her playstyle and kit. Ik my aim could use some work, and my game sense is appropriate for my rank. But I genuinely don't know what to do anymore. I team MVP for 3 games in a row and lose. People don't understand how eco works, not buying after winning pistol. Duelists are more worried about their K/D ratio instead of entering site, making me have to solo enter and get railed because I have no blind or movement. And let's say I get 1-2 kills and we're on the site; KJ is lurking mid WITH THE SPIKE. AFTER I said, I was going to ult after I plant. So if ANYONE is hosting coaching on how to get out of these bum ahh ranks, where people don't listen to comms, argue about you hard comming, instalock Reyna, and tell the CYPHER to enter site. Or sell games after you get a 4k in 3 consecutive rounds. I am well aware I deserve my rank. I am GARBO, but HOLY, it can't be that hard to want to win. Don't even get me started on people throwing the second you ask why you would lock Reyna after we have 2 duelists already. I used to have a duo who was Gold 3- Plat 1, but his MMR was too high, and he complained about these baiting idiots. I just de-ranked from Gold, and I'm actually losing it. But yeah, I'm actually open to tips and tricks because I do want to improve, but god, is it difficult on Viper/",Vent,
"Reason why im asking is because this statement oversimplifies mechanics. For context I was in a game with the map Pearl and But whatever they have their own reasons to not rotate immediately. Keep in mind all I have is a sheriff bc we r on a save and enemies r on full buys. Now I do admit that I kind of made a mistake by holding a bad angle and I got triple swung and died but what im upset abt is my friend say ""just headshot the enemies""

That just oversimplifies everything. If the solution to every disadvantage is ""headshotting the enemies"" then why aren't u pushing the enemies and getting a 5k? I mean following that logic I guess u r a noob if u r solo anchoring a site and enemies push u and u die bc u failed to ""headshot the enemies""

I wanna clarify one thing again. I am not upset abt my teammates not rotating despite the callout I do admit its partially my fault for not holding a safer angle and getting triple swung and die so yes that's on me what im upset is the ""just headshot them"" statement. Sure it can THEORETICALLY happen but can you realistically expect 3 headshots from 3 different angles every single time? No right? And before yall also say ""oh why r u friends with that friend of urs who treats u badly"" or ""just mute him"" thats not the point. I am asking on how to deal with the ""just headshot them"" statement and telling me to do that is a dismissive solution instead of a valid point. Just bc of one statement im not gonna end a friendship just like that im asking how to respond with the ""just headshot the enemies"" statement and not ""how can I stop hearing that"".",Vent,
"this isn’t even a balancing issue, they are literally only good if you shoot them up. if you try and let the flash go up by sending it into the ground, ur basically flipping a coin on if it’ll go through the ground or not, if it doesn’t, you better hope they haven’t pushed you by the time it has been activated, because if they are like 4 feet away from you ur blind isn’t being used at all. I get that I shouldn’t be blinding behind the box but I wanna learn that by the enemy killing me, not the floor.

am I just incredibly unlucky or is this an issue everyone’s facing.",Vent,
"Cause like, why am I going against a solo queued gold player in my rank lobbies? My MMR is so weird I don't understand it, because even my friend group is confused if riot views my true rank to be bronze 3, then when is my MMR placing me into higher rank lobbies?
Since I did my placement these have been the lobby averages. 4 average rank bronze lobbies, 9 average silver rank, 3 average rank gold. Like if losing is supposed to help balance my MMR out then I think it's on life support for silver right now lol.",Vent,
"Currently, Gekko's 4 Globule variants all limited QoL for where they land after their respective ability ends.

For Wingman and Thrash this is rarely an issue, as both abilities are ground-level for the most part... you kind of have to intentionally go out of your way to land them on an inaccessible high-ground by their very nature.

But for Dizzy, and in particular high flying Mosh Globule...

They can inconsistently get stuck on random geometry or more often just normal high-ground boxes, and become inaccessible to Gekko through normal gameplay.

Unlike other projectile utility agents like Kayo for whom weird clipping is annoying but only ruins one ability cast, Gekko needs to make use of his pickup mechanic to get full value from his kit.

A substantial chunk of his value comes from being able to pick up his abilities and go again. Can't do that if you hit some random geometry outside the play space and that time it sticks instead of bouncing back to playable space as intended.
3 different examples of the QoL problems on live right now.

Very similar utility throws result in very different outcomes. One thrown Dizzy behaves properly and falls back into the play space so Gekko is able to pick it up again. The other instead clips onto inaccessible geometry outside the play space and forms the globule there, even though its not a surface other interactables can land or be placed on [think Killjoy turret, Veto teleport, Chamber teleport, etc].

The spike however correctly checks if the surface is a ""ground level"" surface, and falls back into the playspace. My suggestion is to simply have Gekko's globules run the same logic, such that they are always put back into the play space when hitting inaccessible [or movement ability only, see #3] geometry. Best case scenario it does nothing, and the current tumble mechanics work as intended. Worst case scenario, now at least the globule is within the playspace even if it might not be the closest spot to fall to... after all that is far better than you being completely incapable of doing so due to inconsistent geometry clipping.

2. Currently when picking up Globules, the game keeps checking if you maintain line of sight to the centre of the globule. However Gekko always crouches down when picking up Globules, regardless of what height they are located at. So often with head level boxes you can reach the globule, but when you interact with it, you are forced to crouch, which then breaks line of sight to the center thus interrupting itself. My suggestion is to only check for line of sight to start picking up a globule, to avoid this issue entirely.

3. Like I talked about with the first point, Dizzy and Mosh can often get stuck on ability required high-ground [otherwise inaccessible via normal movement]. In practice this is the same problem, but its also resolved using the existing spike mechanics. If you drop a spike onto somewhere you can't access without using an ability, then it automatically falls back into the play-space. Same mechanic should apply to Globules. No complex changes required.

These two proposed changes will easily and efficiently improve quality of life without changing ability balance, and avoid a common pain point when using Gekko's utility on the fly.",Insight,
"Veto is my main and I feel he is overhyped, if you summarize him he would sound op and unfair to fight, ""Oh he can delete abilities and his ult makes him immune to abilities"" but if you actually play him he is really weak, his interceptor is balanced, his tp takes way too long and is way too loud, his chokehold should get another charge and his ult is the only thing going for him ngl

Even in the lore they just brush him off, he's merged with a radivore octopus due to an explosion incident and might be able to talk to Gekko's creatures and that's it",Vent,
"The Give Back Bundle is a joke! Riot padding the price of the bundle with 2425 VP worth of useless cosmetics making the bundle almost 85€ is a joke, let's be honest, they should be either free or not included at all. What is this? Totally ridiculous",Vent,
"I have been playing valorant for 4 years now, but I genuinely cannot see myself getting any better. The worst part isnt even being hardstuck. Its the “bad games.” You know the ones, where everything goes wrong, you make dumb mistakes, and your team flames you. And in the back of my head, I hear all those comments about “girls can’t game” and I think… what if they are right? What if I’m literally proving the stereotype every time I underperform?

It hurts so much more than just losing. It feels like I’m letting down every girl who plays this game.

Some days the frustration outweighs the fun. But then I look at my skins. I love my skins. Stupid, I know. But I spent time and money on them, and they make me happy just loading into a match.",Vent,
"As the title suggests, been playing for about almost a year now and I wanna rank up to a higher elo. Struggling a lot with game sense, sometimes I’m not sure what to do so I just go with the flow or just wander aimlessly. My aim is pretty inconsistent.",Vent,
"Playing this game is one of the most frustrating experiences ever. People seem to one click kill me everywhere I go. They always know where I am, they always kill me faster than my brain cells can comprehend what the image on the screen is supposed to be, and this might not seem too fast to experienced players and I'm not saying it's the game's fault.

I've been playing this game since the beta nonstop but I stopped taking it seriously because no matter what I do or what game, even outside this one, my brain is just too slow for it. People keep telling me to slow down and take my time to aim at the head, to not get nervous but what time do I have? 24 frames? Half of half a second? What time are they talking about? How am I not going to get nervous when I know that an encounter is a guaranteed one shot faster than flash kill?

I wish this game had no weapons at all that could kill you in one shot like this.",Vent,
"I was by no means a pro, but I did achieve high ranks on both games, reaching radiant on valorant and faceit 10 (around 2.7k elo) on cs2

First off I enjoyed the fact I don't have to download a third part client to play ranked. Native 128 tick, and a good AC on valorant makes CS2's premier mode a joke.

Second off, I feel like the average players aim in valorant is better than the average cs player. I feel like this is because you are able to compensate for bad first bullet accuarcy on cs2 by spraying, where as valorant you don't have that luxary. Spraying is still possible, just no where as consistent.

As for if it was harder reaching radiant or faceit 10, i believe reaching radiant is significantly harder than hitting 2k elo faceit level 10, but hitting high elo faceit (around 3-4K) is harder than hitting radiant on valorant.

Valorant feels in my opinion, significantly better after the utlity nerf update, it makes the game cleaner and easier to process, and makes ultimates not a round winning ability, valorant was always intended to be gunplay first, ability second. I like the direction the game is headed (meta wise) and hope it keeps up.

Cs2's gameplay and meta is like chess, every play has been studied and executed over millions of times, there is no new evolving meta (that i know of) unlike valorant.

I think overall i enjoyed the ranked experience on valorant way more than cs2, but i enjoyed the core gameplay and simplicity of cs2 more.

It will be really interesting to see how riot plans to balance valorant as more agents come out, i think it'll get to a point where it's best for the game to halt agent releases. As for cs2, mostly just interested where valve is headed with the skins economy lol.

If you have any qustions lmk",Insight,
"Easiest agents to climb with until Immortal 1. Never play any other agents and ask your team to pick from this list too. Ideally, force a Jett, Reyna, Gekko, Clove, and Sage comp. If you are nice when asking, people will usually flex. They love having someone else to blame if they play poorly, so you offer them the right to blame you in exchange for getting the strongest agents on your team. This is always better than letting someone struggle on their ""main.""

Jett is mandatory because she has to entry. That's it, it ends there.

Reyna and Iso are for forcing 1v1s. Reyna has more 1v5 potential, while Iso’s shield ensures he doesn't insta die. And no, you don't entry with Reyna, you wait and kill people. Also, learn how to win duels inside Iso's ult, it is not as easy as it seems. Pheonix has a little bit of everything.

Gekko is the only viable initiator below Ascendant since he is basic and doesn't require lineups. Don't dare to think you're good enough to pick Sova and be useful with it.

Sage consistently holds a top winrate across all ranks because she is straightforward (right after Clove). You don’t need tricky walls or slow lineups to be useful with her.

Clove is the queen of competitive queue and still has the highest winrate in the game despite recent nerfs. She is essentially a duelist with smokes.

Brimstone is a true team player with strong, long lasting smokes and full utility. He is more team oriented and can win games by being consistently annoying. While basic lineups help, they are not mandatory to be effective.

I’ve been Immortal since EP6 and have smurfed through every rank below it. Players often get lost in their own abilities because most agents are too complex and require game knowledge that can’t be learned by just spamming games. However, you can spam simple agents mindlessly and master their basic mechanics easily.

Another thing you can see here: self heal. Reyna, Sage, Clove, Pheonix. They are very forgiving as in lobbies below Immortal you don't get too many hs going around.

Pick them no matter the map, they don't have to be optimal. They have to allow you to think about the game, and not their abilities.",Insight,
"So, it played Valorant 2 years ago and I was gold/plat but i quit playing it because i was focused on Rainbow six. 2 months ago i started playing it again but i had to create another account because i lost my first one. Now, I wasn't hard to get used to it again and finding my old setting but i dont understand how i got down to bronze 3 and I'm stuck in it. I'm a tejo main ending my games with 20+ average kills but sometimes i feel like I'm playing alone with 1 win one lost every time. did the game changed in those 2 years? I lost my skills? Should i find i decent team to play ranked now? I really need help to get back to plat.",Vent,
"ranked help (im on a generational loss streak)
so im on a 2W 8L rn
i top frag or sometimes play very good but i always lose
and in the few matches that i win i ALWAYS bottom frag and it gives me a slither of RR
why is this happening??
my tracker score is very bad so i think its my fault but everytime im on raze i get a lot of kills and play well",Vent,
"I have peaked immo 1 30-40 rr almost every act , and then fall down to asc 2-3 within the same act , what I’ve noticed is that I get aim diffed very easily because of my movement , micro adjustment, and probably very slow reaction time (avg 200ms) , I’m tired of being hardstuck , I want to climb to radiant just once so k can be done with this game and it is going to give me a sense of completion ,

The problem is I just don’t know what to do , my sensitivity is 0.125 on 1600 dpi , which is very low sense most of my gameplay is pre aiming , crosshair placement and timing , however that’s not enough when the opponent has better movement , I find it hard to track enemies , like I can track them but cannot instantly accurately shoot them when they are still moving I wait for them to stop first but whenever I reach immo 30-40 rr the enemies become very hard for me to kill since their movement , tracking and reaction time just seems to be better , I mostly play initiator and sentinels , for duelists I play pheonix , and sometimes jett however I stay away from dash/movement duelists cause of my low sensitivity

Do I change my sensitivity and get used to a faster sens , like 0.3 on 1600 dpi ? What sort of aiming routine do I follow ? I can’t spend too much time doing the aim training since I also work , I come back and hop on the game because most of my college friends play this and it’s the only place I can hang out with them , how do I get better ? I just can’t seem to be able to get better

Many times I’m just looking at the minimal that I don’t pay attention to my crosshair and get caught off guard when I play sentinel or initiator , as for the agents I mostly play , sova (main) cypher , KJ , chamber , pheonix , jett (depends on map) , omen

What can i do to improve ? Just playing the game doesn’t help its like I’m missing something like I’m insanely stupid and can’t figure a simple thing out , I used to be faceit level 8 and LEM when I used to play csgo and here I cannot go beyond immo 1 , hell I can’t even maintain it ,

Also I’m a little addicted to the game , I’ve spent a considerable amount of money in this game now , and I don’t even have a sense of accomplishment that I can stop playing this",Vent,
"As an Odin user:
Just learn to aim and don't peek into an already spraying Odin. 90% of my Odin kills are just because people are stupid or have shit aim.

""it has no place in a tactical shooter""

In fact, I'll even argue that the Odin is one of the most tactical weapons of Valorant alongside the Op (way more than rifles):
If you're not ADSing, the recoil is monstruous. That means that in most occasions, you have to ADS to hit anything. And the ADS speed is low (the animation before you can shoot after ADSing, it takes a long time). That means the kind of 180° flick one-taps you see with Vandals is impossible (a headshot doesn't instakill anyway), so if you made a mistake and someone is behind you: you are dead.
The speed with an Odin is... slow, especially if you're ADSing (and as I said, you ADS most of the time), so you can't just walk back to safety if you whiff, you are too slow: when you commit to a fight, it's until you're dead or the enemy is dead.
Then, catch me when I'm reloading? I'm dead, it takes too long to reload
Same if I have my knife out, the Oding pull-up time is longer than most other weapons

I don't get kills because I'm super good at clicking on things. I get kills because I know where to aim at, what fight to engage in, when to spray and when to save bullets
Vandal rewards mechanics
Odin and Operator reward strategy",Insight,
"So I just started playing this game like 2 or 3 days ago and I am absolute dog water. Besides the fact I am a noob, I also suffer from chronic controller user-itis. Does a girl have any hope in this game? Do I just give it up now?",Vent,
"Comprehensive Systematic Analysis of Tactical Performance and Aim Optimization in Competitive First-Person Shooters: A 2026 Perspective
The evolution of tactical gunplay within high-stakes digital environments has shifted from a reliance on raw reflexes to a multi-dimensional discipline involving biometric efficiency, hardware synchronization, and geometric awareness. In the competitive landscape of 2026, the distinction between elite performers and standard participants is defined by the integration of technical calibration with psychological stability and kinetic mastery. This report provides an exhaustive investigation into the mechanisms of aim optimization, drawing upon professional standards, hardware advancements, and the tactical shifts observed in the current competitive meta.

Foundations of Technical Input and Signal Integrity
The pursuit of consistent aim begins with the fidelity of the interface between the human operator and the digital simulation. As sensor technology has matured in 2026, the focus has shifted from high sensitivity to the integrity of input signals and the reduction of micro-latency within the system.

Effective Dots Per Inch and Sensitivity Standardizations
The core metric of sensitivity remains the effective Dots Per Inch (eDPI), calculated by the product of mouse DPI and in-game sensitivity. While historical trends suggested a wide variance, the professional circuit of 2026 has seen a convergence toward a moderate eDPI range that facilitates both large-scale tracking and minute pixel-level adjustments.High DPI settings, specifically 1600 DPI, have become the standard due to their ability to provide higher-frequency updates to the sensor, which, when coupled with high polling rates, significantly smooths the input curve.

Player Profile	Mouse DPI	In-Game Sensitivity	eDPI	Polling Rate (Hz)
TenZ	1600	0.24	384.00	1000
something	800	0.425	340.00	8000
Aspas	800	0.4	320.00	1000
Demon1	1600	0.1	160.00	1000
f0rsakeN	800	0.712	569.60	4000
Alfajer	1600	0.1125	180.00	4000
primmie	800	0.45	360.00	1000
The variance in eDPI among top-tier players, ranging from Demon1’s 160 to f0rsakeN’s 569, underscores a critical insight: there is no universal ""holy grail"" sensitivity.Instead, the ideal setting is a byproduct of a player’s unique neural adaptation and physical setup. High-sensitivity outliers like something and f0rsakeN often utilize the speed of their wrists for rapid-target acquisition, while low-sensitivity experts like Demon1 and Alfajer rely on broader arm movements to ensure clinical precision during micro-adjustments.

Input Buffer and Hardware Synchronization
Signal latency remains a primary adversary in competitive shooting. The implementation of the Raw Input Buffer is a universal requirement among professionals, as it bypasses Windows-level processing to deliver mouse data directly to the game engine.This is increasingly combined with high polling rate hardware. Sensors like the Focus Pro 30K and the PAW3950, found in devices such as the Razer Viper V2 Pro and the Lamzu Maya X, offer up to 8000Hz polling rates, which minimizes the delay between physical movement and the digital update of the crosshair.

Biomechanics of Control and Ergonomic Interaction
The physical interaction with the mouse is governed by three primary grip styles, each offering distinct advantages in stability and agility. Professional performance in 2026 is often predicated on matching a player's hand dimensions and muscle structure to the appropriate grip architecture.

Comparative Analysis of Grip Architectures
Grip Style	Contact Points	Primary Movement Muscle Groups	Strategic Advantage
Palm Grip	Full hand contact with mouse shell	Forearm, elbow, and shoulder	Maximum stability for long-range precision
Claw Grip	Heel of palm and fingertips contact	Wrist and fingers	Balance of flick speed and micro-adjustment
Fingertip Grip	Only fingertips contact the mouse	Fingers and micro-wrist movements	Extreme agility and rapid target switching
The palm grip remains favored by those who prioritize clinical consistency and heavy arm movement. By utilizing larger muscle groups, players can maintain steadier aim during tracking exercises, though they may sacrifice the raw speed required for reactive flicking.The claw grip has emerged as the most versatile and common style among professionals, providing a ""locked-in"" feeling that supports repetitive movements during high-pressure engagements.

The fingertip grip, while offering the highest range of motion, is the most physically demanding and can lead to muscle fatigue during extended sessions.In the 2026 meta, where utility has been reduced and pure gunfights have become more frequent, the ability to make rapid micro-corrections with the fingers has seen a resurgence in popularity among entry-fragging specialists.

Ergonomic Posture and Sensory Alignment
Maintaining a neutral ergonomic posture is a prerequisite for long-term skill development. Professional guidelines emphasize a sitting position where the feet are flat on the floor, knees and elbows are bent at approximately 90 degrees, and the spine remains in a poised, upright state.The monitor should be positioned at arm's length, with the top of the screen at or slightly below eye level to minimize neck strain and maintain optimal visual depth perception.

A critical but often overlooked aspect of performance is eye dominance. Approximately 70% of participants are right-eye dominant. Research suggests that right-eye dominant players may benefit from using a left-handed viewmodel to clear the dominant visual field, potentially improving reaction times and situational awareness during chaotic engagements.

Geometric Principles of Engagement and Kinetic Discipline
The synergy between movement and aim is the defining characteristic of elite tactical shooting. In 2026, the ability to manipulate character velocity to achieve instantaneous accuracy has become highly sophisticated.

Movement Accuracy and Counter-Strafing
The accuracy system in modern tactical shooters heavily punishes movement during fire. Achieving a complete stop is necessary for the first-bullet accuracy of weapons like the Vandal or Phantom to take effect.While letting go of movement keys eventually results in stability, the technique of counter-strafing—tapping the opposite direction key to arrest momentum—remains a staple for high-level players.On 128-tick servers, this technique provides a marginal but critical timing advantage, allowing the player to fire sooner than a player who merely releases their keys.

Advanced Techniques: Dead Zoning and Burst Strafing
Dead zoning is a high-level mechanic where a player fires during the infinitesimal window of zero velocity that occurs when changing directions. This allows the player to remain a moving target at almost all times, significantly complicating the enemy's tracking requirements.

Burst strafing serves as an extension of this logic, particularly effective at medium ranges. The player strafes in one direction, counter-strafes, and fires a two-to-three-round burst during the brief pause before instantly switching directions again.This cycle of movement and fire minimizes the window of vulnerability while maximizing damage output.

Tactical Geometry: Slicing the Pie and Angle Advantage
The concept of ""slicing the pie"" involves clearing an angle incrementally by dividing the corner into segments. By pre-aiming each potential enemy location before it is fully exposed, a player can isolate duels and ensure they only face one opponent at a time.

Engagement Type	Movement Strategy	Primary Benefit
Short Peek	Minimum strafe length	Minimizes exposure to off-angles
Wide Swing	Maximum strafe length	Breaks opponent's crosshair placement
Jiggle Peek	Rapid back-and-forth movement	Information gathering and baiting utility
Crouch Peek	Peeking from a crouched state	Avoids head-level crosshairs in close quarters
Perspective plays a fundamental role in these engagements. The player further away from the corner being cleared enjoys an ""angle advantage,"" seeing the opponent’s shoulder before the opponent can see them.This geometric reality necessitates careful positioning and space management when approaching contested chokepoints.

Ballistic Analysis and the 2026 Weapon Meta
The arsenal available in 2026 has been refined to reward specific firing disciplines. Understanding the ballistic profiles of these weapons is essential for selecting the correct tool for a given tactical scenario.

The Rifle Standard: Vandal vs. Phantom
The choice between the Vandal and the Phantom remains a cornerstone of tactical decision-making. The Vandal is characterized by its uniform damage profile, providing a one-tap headshot at any range.However, it possesses a slower fire rate and more challenging recoil patterns, making it less forgiving in multi-target scenarios.

The Phantom excels in close-to-medium-range engagements with a higher fire rate and more manageable recoil. Its suppressed operation hides bullet tracers, making it the superior choice for spraying through smoke.The primary drawback of the Phantom is its damage falloff, which prevents one-tap headshots beyond 20 meters.

The Emergence of the Bandit
A significant shift in the 2026 meta is the introduction of the Bandit, a high-precision sidearm priced at 600 credits. Designed to fill the niche between the Ghost and the Sheriff, the Bandit is capable of a one-tap headshot against targets wearing light armor.

Weapon	Cost (Credits)	Magazine Size	Damage (Head/Body)	Specialized Role
Classic	0	12	78 / 26	Universal sidearm, burst fire up close
Ghost	500	15	105 / 30	Stealth and accuracy in pistol rounds
Bandit	600	8	125+ / 35	Eco-round precision against light armor
Sheriff	800	6	159 / 55	High damage, long-range ""thrifty"" potential
Vandal	2900	25	160 / 40	Long-range precision, 1-tap potential
Phantom	2900	30	156 / 39	Close-range fire rate and smoke spam
The introduction of the Bandit has altered the economy of the game, providing a more viable path for teams to win ""thrifty"" rounds through superior marksmanship rather than just utility usage. Its limited magazine capacity (8 rounds) requires high aim discipline, rewarding players who can hit headshots consistently.

Systematic Training Methodologies and Neural Conditioning
Elite aim is not an inherent trait but a developed skill maintained through rigorous and structured practice. The training philosophy of 2026 emphasizes the distinction between a warm-up and a skill-development session.

Professional Warm-up Routines
A warm-up is designed to achieve neural readiness and physical elasticity without inducing fatigue. These sessions are generally 10-15 minutes in length and focus on basic mechanical movements.

Neural Activation: 5 minutes of practice bots in ""The Range,"" focusing on clean horizontal movements and headshot precision.

Tracking and Mouse Control: 5 minutes of moving alongside bots while keeping the crosshair centered on their heads, improving synchronization between movement and aim.

Engagement Simulation: 1-2 rounds of Deathmatch or Team Deathmatch to acclimate to human movement patterns and the pacing of real duels.

Intensive Aim Development (Post-Session Training)
In contrast to the warm-up, skill-development training is often conducted after the day's primary gaming session to prevent performance degradation during competitive matches.The current standard involves specialized routines in software like Kovaak’s or Aimlabs, focusing on micro-adjustments and target acquisition speed.

Charlatan’s ""Ultimate Kovaak Training"" is a 20-task routine that has become a benchmark for high-level players. It utilizes a ""Two-Step Approach"" for each task: the first run is done slowly with a focus on 100% accuracy, while the second run is performed at a rapid ""reflex"" pace to stretch the player's mechanical limits.

Key scenarios in the 2026 training meta include:

Static Clicking: 1wall 6targets small, focusing on precision micro-flicks.

Dynamic Clicking: Pasu-style tasks that require predicting moving targets and timing shots.

Smoothness Training: Smoothbot and Thin Aiming Long scenarios, which refine tracking and eliminate jittery mouse movements.

The Visual Interface: Contrast and Map-Specific Visibility
Information processing is the precursor to accurate aim. The ability to distinguish a target from the background environment is heavily influenced by crosshair configuration and the game's visual settings.

Crosshair Customization and Environmental Contrast
In 2026, the use of static crosshairs is near-universal among professionals, as dynamic crosshairs introduce visual noise that can distract from crosshair placement.The choice of color is increasingly dictated by map-specific palettes to ensure maximum contrast.

Map	Dominant Colors	Recommended Crosshair Color	Hex Code
Ascent	Warm earth tones, terracotta	Light Blue	#00E0FF
Icebox	White snow, blue ice	Light Green	#2AFF00
Lotus	Golden light, stone ruins	Sunset Orange	#FF6347
Abyss	Dark, cool shadows	Neon Green	#00FF00
Sunset	Deep orange sunset hues	White / Cyan	#FFFFFF
Breeze	Blue skies, green foliage	Cyan	#00FFDF
Furthermore, the use of digital vibrance (70% standard) and specific enemy highlight colors (Yellow/Purple) is used to improve target acquisition in visually ""noisy"" environments.

Viewmodel and Peripheral Optimization
To maximize the visible screen area, many players utilize the maximum Field of View (FOV) and adjust viewmodel offsets to minimize the visual footprint of their own weapon.High refresh rate monitors (240Hz and 360Hz) have become the baseline, with OLED technology gaining ground due to its superior motion clarity and instantaneous response times.

Tactical Adaptation and the 2026 Competitive Ecosystem
The meta-environment of 2026 has been defined by a significant reduction in the impact of utility, shifting the focus back to individual gunfighting prowess.

Utility Nerfs and the ""Gunfight Meta""
Recent balance updates have significantly nerfed sentinel and initiator utility. Vyse and Cypher have seen reductions in their area-denial capabilities, and the overall volume of flashes and stuns has been decreased across the board.This has led to a meta where ""get-out"" duelists like Yoru and Jett are highly valued for their ability to take aggressive duels and escape if they fail to secure the kill.

The emergence of the ""AR1S"" game mode—a high-chaos 5v5 mode featuring random agents and condensed maps—has also influenced professional practice, encouraging a more reactive and aggressive approach to aim-based duels.

Strategic Map Rotations
The map pool for 2026 includes the return of Fracture and Lotus, alongside the rework of Breeze.The Breeze rework, in particular, has adjusted several key sightlines to favor more consistent gunplay and reduce the reliance on long-range ""pixel-peeking."" In these environments, mastering crosshair placement at common head-height levels is the single most effective way to reduce the amount of flicking required during a duel.

Psychological Performance and Mental Conditioning
Aim is as much a cognitive function as it is a physical one. Maintaining ""calm aim"" during high-stress moments is a hallmark of elite performance.

Focus and Consistency
Professional players emphasize the importance of aiming instead of just shooting. This involves a conscious focus on the target rather than the crosshair, allowing the brain to process information more effectively and deliver a smoother, more accurate response.

Health and lifestyle factors also play a critical role in consistency. Proper sleep, a balanced diet, and regular physical exercise have been shown to improve reaction times, decision-making, and focus.Many professionals now incorporate hand and wrist warm-ups—such as soaking hands in warm water or performing clenching exercises—to prevent stiffness and ensure fluid mouse movement.

Confidence and Objective Evaluation
Confidence is often cited as the "" icing on top"" of mechanical skill. It is built through the knowledge that one has put in the necessary effort in training.To maintain this confidence without falling into the trap of overconfidence, professionals use objective metrics and VOD reviews to identify weak points in their mechanics, such as a tendency to over-flick or poor movement timing.

Conclusions and Practical Recommendations
The data and professional standards of 2026 indicate that the optimization of aim is an integrated process requiring attention to technical, physical, and tactical details. For players seeking to emulate professional performance, the following recommendations are suggested:

Standardize hardware to minimize input latency, prioritizing 1600 DPI with low in-game sensitivity and ensuring the use of a Raw Input Buffer. Select a mouse grip and ergonomic setup that supports long-term health and kinetic stability, specifically focusing on the claw grip for its versatile performance characteristics.

Commit to a movement-centric firing discipline, mastering the counter-strafe to achieve instantaneous stability and utilizing dead zoning to remain a difficult target. Selection of weaponry should be tailored to the engagement range, with the Vandal preferred for precision and the Phantom for situational stealth, while respecting the lethal precision of the new Bandit sidearm in economy rounds.

Establish a bifurcated training routine that separates neural warm-ups from intensive aim development. Practice should be map-specific, with crosshair colors and enemy outlines chosen to provide the highest possible contrast against the unique visual palettes of the current map rotation. By synthesizing these disciplines, participants can achieve the level of mechanical consistency and tactical awareness required to compete in the highly refined ecosystem of 2026.
",Insight,
"I collected all tips that actually worked for me after years of trial and error. This guide might help any player from Iron up to Radiant.

1. System Optimization
1.1 Close every unnecessary background program before playing.
1.2 Achieve a ""clean"" system. Tools like BoosterX will help without reinstalling Windows.
1.3 You can use ""custom Windows builds"", but only use trusted sources.
1.4 Disable GPU hardware acceleration in messengers, browsers, VPN software and so on. This can reduce latency on some GPUs but increases CPU load. Test individually.
1.5 Try MSI Utility V3. It sets peripheral signal processing to high priority. Especially useful for mice and keyboards polling above 1000 Hz.
1.6 Check your RAM frequency in BIOS. After installation, it often defaults to 2133-2400 MHz instead of the advertised speed. Overclocking to 3200 MHz or higher yields a noticeable FPS boost in Valorant.
1.7 Advanced: locking CPU and GPU to a fixed frequency (via overclocking or undervolting) stabilizes frametimes, which directly improves aiming smoothness.
1.8 Watch for thermal throttling. Overheating causes frequency drops, FPS fluctuations, and inconsistent aim. Clean your PC every year. Repaste CPU every 2 years. Add case fans if needed.

2. Hardware
2.1 Bad hardware doesn't remove skill, but eventually you hit a plateau that only an upgrade can break.
2.2 Monitor.

1440p genuinely makes small targets easier to read and track compared to 1080p. Only if your system can push stable FPS to match your refresh rate.

Smoothness gains: 60 → 144 Hz — massive. 144 → 240 Hz — noticeable. 240 → 540 Hz — real but diminishing returns for kill rate. Target 240 Hz as the sweet spot. 2.2.1 Calibrate your monitor's colors using reference images. Helps with faster enemy recognition. 2.2.2 Enable Overdrive in your monitor OSD. Max settings cause inverse ghosting (white trails), blurring moving targets. Optimal range is 50-70%. Verify with UFO Test. 2.3 Keyboard. Membrane to mechanical is night and day. Mechanical to magnetic (Rapid Trigger) is another night and day. Your character stops ""floating"". 2.4 Mouse. Shape that fits your grip matters more than sensor specs. 4000 Hz polling offers a real but subtle advantage. Main priority: sensor must never spin out at your swipe speed. 2.5 Disable ""Enhance Pointer Precision"" in Windows. Valorant uses raw input, but menus and aim trainers don't. The setting distorts sensor data. 2.6 If your crosshair drifts upward or downward during horizontal swipes, the issue is grip ergonomics. Fix it with sensor angle calibration (Angle snapping) or Raw Accel (software for trajectory correction). 2.7 Use DPI of at least 1600. Higher values (3200) further increase aim smoothness. 2.7.1 To keep desktop cursor comfortable at high DPI, adjust Windows pointer speed. This doesn't affect in-game sens in Valorant. Windows speed to in-game sens 1 to 1:

1/11 — 0.24

2/11 — 0.48

3/11 — 0.125

4/11 — 0.25

5/11 — 0.375

6/11 (default) — 0.5 2.8 Mousepad. Keep it clean. Lay it on a hard, flat surface. Size should allow a full 180° turn without lifting the mouse.

3. Posture and Setup
3.1 Straight back isn't just about health — it's about reaction time. Pinched nerves in your neck and shoulders make reaction time higher.
3.2 You need two points of contact for your mouse arm: wrist and elbow/forearm. Your arm should not float. Elbow should be level with or slightly above the desk. If your chair is too low, desk edge pressure kills micro-control.
3.3 Fresh air in the room. Obvious, but your brain needs oxygen.
3.4 Nothing in the way of your mouse movement. Use a mouse bungee/adhesive tape for the wire or better — go wireless.

4. GPU and In-Game Settings
4.1 The combination of NVIDIA Reflex / Anti-Lag + G-Sync / FreeSync is mandatory for smooth gameplay.
4.2 If FPS fluctuates above and below your refresh rate, cap it 3-5 frames below max refresh (e.g., 235 FPS on 240 Hz). This stabilizes frametimes.

5. Your Body
5.1 B-complex vitamins and magnesium directly affect nerve signal conduction and muscle relaxation.
5.2 Physical activity keeps your CNS sharp. Sedentary lifestyle is the enemy of fast reactions.
5.3 Sleep is important. Skill consolidation happens during sleep, not while playing. 30 minutes of practice + 8 hours of sleep > 2 hours of grinding + 5 hours of sleep.

6. Aim Training
6.1 Aim trainers (Aim Lab, KovaaK's) dramatically shorten the path to stable aim.
6.1.1 Use pre-made Valorant playlists. Not all scenarios are useful.
6.1.2 Don't grind the same scenario endlessly. Five repetitions per session is the ceiling. Beyond that, you're building false patterns.
6.1.3 The goal isn't a high score — it's proper technique. Your hand should be as relaxed as possible. Technique varies by scenario type — look up guides from the Voltaic community.
6.2 In-game bot training is non-negotiable. Aim trainers give you ""raw"" aim; bots teach weapon feel and recoil. Best scenario: strafing armored bots with Phantom. Even if your main weapon is Vandal.
6.3 Stop trying to flick faster than you can. Find the speed where you land the first bullet 90% of the time. In a real match, if you speed up 10% you will lose 50% accuracy. Play at your own pace.
6.4 Crosshair placement and movement are part of your aim. A Radiant doesn't aim twice as fast as an Immortal 1. They just put themselves in positions where the kill requires one micro-adjustment and click, not a panic flick.
6.5 Your aim has two components: moving the cursor and predicting when to click. Imagine you're not aiming — you're just pressing M1 the moment the enemy's head crosses your crosshair. If the enemy moves smoothly, prediction is easy. If they AD-spam randomly, prediction is hard. Your job as an aimer is to make your crosshair movement so smooth and predictable that the click timing becomes intuitive.
6.6 Your sensitivity matters less than you think. A good player adapts to almost anything. Pick the sens you can play on for hours without pain or discomfort. Fingers/wrist hurt? Raise sens. Forearm hurts? Lower it. I went from 360 eDPI down to 160 eDPI and eventually settled at 240 eDPI — which happens to be the average among all players.
6.7 The ""prediction"" part of aiming is handled by your Central Nervous System. The CNS fatigues and depletes. Symptoms: freezing on targets, forgetting to click, overshooting, shakiness. Solution: rest, sleep, food. Stop queueing.

7. In-Game Mentality
7.1 Keep yourself calm and don't tilt even when the enemy kills you through smoke 4 times in a row. Shit happens. Just accept it and move on.
7.2 Don't forget that this is just a game. And don't expect your teammates to put the same amount of effort into getting better and winning.

This is the first version of the guide. I'll update and expand it over time. Drop a comment if you disagree with something or want to add your own tips.",Insight,
"Someone that has Valorant as their first shooter game made a post asking for help and I made a wall of text.

Maybe this could help other people.

Yeah, veterans may disagree and talk about caveats, but I guess this text is a good start for a beginner:

“If you're a complete beginner and don't even play shooter games, you have to focus on two different things.

First, you have to focus on your aim.

Second, you have to focus on Valorant.

Training your aim will help you in literally any shooter game you ever play in your life, because having good aim is transferrable to other games that need aiming.

For training the aim part, use 1600 DPI on your mouse. Second, put the in-game sensitivity in a number that when you multiply it by 1600 the result is between 190 and 408.

For instance, I use 1600 and 0,2. This makes the final number be 320 when you multiply both, 320 is between 190 and 408.

You should download some aim trainer like Aim Labs, a really nice and free aim trainer.

The idea of playing Aim Labs is for you to get good at moving your mouse around to wherever you want.

Ok, now, for the Valorant part...

This is absurdly complex, because there's a fucking lot of things you need to learn.

There's game sense, learning how to read the game and what your enemies are gonna do.

There's economy, knowing when to buy, when to save and everything like that.

There's strategizing, deciding what to do.

There's learning your character, knowing what your character does and what you can use to get advantage over your enemies.

There's learning what the other player characters do, to know what your team can do to help you and also what the enemies can do to hurt you.

There's playing as a team, how you should play when you are cooperating with your team.

There's agent roles, what each character role does and what they should be doing in a match.

There's even simple things like learning what to say on voice chat to your team, learning call-outs, learning the names of each place on the map, learning the important info to give to your team and so on.

And we can go on and on about all of this and it's not important for a beginner.

Now, for you, my advice is this:

Do aim labs every day to train your muscle memory using your mouse.

Play a duelist like Phoenix or Raze, being a simple character, or an initiator like Kay/o or Sova, being also simple characters.

Don't play Sentinel or Controller, especially controller. Controller is a too important role to get right and if you get wrong, you can help the enemies too much and fuck your team.

Controllers should be played after you develop game sense, but if you want, Brimstone is good for a beginner.

If you want Sentinels... Sage or Killjoy.

Try each one of those, see who you enjoy most and then you should master this agent. Learn what each utility does so you don't second guess yourself and always know what each of them does.

For learning, I recommend you to search Woohoojin on YouTube. Especially watch this video.

This is the best content for beginners looking to improve. He doesn't post videos anymore after a lot of controversies he had, but that doesn't make his backlog bad.

His videos are amazing for a beginner even if some stuff is outdated, like character abilities and stuff, but a lot of game sense and stuff is really great.

This video above guarantees that you will get to Gold. He also has some videos about movement in the game, learning to get good at movement.

He also has videos about Gunfight Hygiene, which is knowing how to shoot with each weapon depending on the distance you are from the enemies. Like when you have a Vandal and you are shooting like a madman when they are less than 5 meters from you, or strafe tapping when they are far away.

There's a whole playlist with nice guides.

Also, you should learn the basics of economy and this is so basic I can tell you the basics:

If you have 2000 credits, this means no matter what happens, next round you will be able to buy Vandal/Phantom and full shields.

Buying Vandal/Phantom+full shields+full utilities is called a ""Full Buy"".

When you buy stuff, but try to have at least 2k creds, this is a half-buy.

If you don't have creds, your team may call an eco, or economic round, which means you will not buy anything, or at least have 2k to make a full buy next.

There's also a forced round, when you don't have money for a Full Buy, but you buy anyways, buying anything you can, even if you can't full buy and not caring to have 2k creds remaining.

There's also a round called a Full Eco. This is done when some people can buy and others can't. As a team you decide to literally not buy anything. Even if some could, you don't. You don't buy shields, you don't buy weapons or utils. You do this so you guys can have more money for the next rounds.

All of these things must be done together as a team. There's multiple strategies that can be done with all of those, but that's more advanced.

If people are Full Buying, you Full Buy. If they are Half Buying, you Half Buy. If they are on Eco, you also go on Eco or Half Buy if you have too much money. If people talk about a Full Eco, you forget about the shop.

Okay, the game starts, this is a beginners guide to the first three rounds of the game:

You win first round? You have to spend your money on the second round.

When you win the first round, the second round is anti-eco, because the enemies are in an eco round.

You should buy things like a Spectre, Marshall or Bucky along with Full Shields.

You win the second round? The third round is called a Bonus Round. In this round, you shouldn't buy guns or stuff like that. You should do at maximum a Half Buy. The best thing is for you and your teammates to get primary weapons and pistols to drop on the Bonus Round.

If you have a Spectre and a Ghost, drop the Ghost so your ally doesn't need to buy anything.

If you see a Sheriff on the ground TAKE IT! Even if you don't plan on using it, you can drop to your team and this is a really powerful weapon in a Bonus Round.

The idea of the Bonus is to use the weapons you already had and have money for a Full Buy in the fourth round no matter what happens.

You lost the second round? Tough. Now you have to do a Full Eco in the third round.

Okay, now the other side:

You lost the first round?

Full Eco in the second round, because no matter what happens you can full buy in the third.

You won the second?

Really nice! Now Full Buy because they are broken!

(""Broken"" is when you don't have money for a Full Buy)

You did a Full Buy and lost to their Bonus Round?

Oof, rough. Now you guys are broken. Better to do a Full Eco. Even if this means giving them another round, you guys can get more money for the next rounds.

OKAY, THAT'S A GOOD START!

There's a lot more variables and higher rank players may disagree with some of it, but this is basic for a beginner. Follow this and you're a lot better in every 3 first rounds of a half.

Well, I hope this wall of text may help.”

Also, I would add that it's nice for you to look at a guide for the specific agent you decide to play. Woohoojin's videos are good for a beginner in general, but some specifics would be nice to look at other content creators. There's a lot of good ones out there, Hooj was just the one that helped me a lot in general.",Insight,
"Dia 2 currently, chamber main i have decent kd and stats sometimes i play shit but most of the time in play well, i feel tho that even tho i do well most games i still lose the games eg, one of my games i match mvped, 2 aces 2 3ks, clucthed but still lost the game, my aim is pretty snappy like i hit shots i dont even think i can do sometimes, my gamesense is pretty good, i try to igl but still cant climb any tips",Vent,
"For the evaluation, I took one player of each rank with average stats (around 1.0–1.1 K/D) and their last 10 matches (excluding 5-stacks, games with obvious smurf, and matches with unrated players).

100 matches were fed into an AI, which calculated how an average player of a higher rank performs when placed in a match against a lobby one rank lower.

Improvement is calculated using the geometric mean of K/D, ACS, KAST, and ADR.

Rd → I3: 1.31x / number of such cases: 12
I3 → I2: 1.25x / 33
I2 → I1: 1.13x / 51
I1 → A3: 1.09x / 12
A3 → A2: 1.10x / 19
A2 → A1: 1.26x / 15
A1 → D3: 1.05x / 15
D3 → D2: 1.14x / 12
D2 → D1: 1.09x / 9

The three real walls in high elo are Radiant, Immortal 3, and Ascendant 2.
Ascendant 1 and Diamond 3 are nearly identical in performance.
Most other rank transitions show a steady 9–14% improvement per tier.

The sample is certainly small, but the trend is visible and corresponds to rank distribution.",Insight,
"If you are Iron - Silver, I suggest you listen to this.
1. Stop filling
I promise you that team comp does not matter in this elo at all. There are a lot of low elo players who play a wide variety of agents that they have little knowledge of. Stop doing this. You should ideally main 2 agents maximum that you like and are comfortable with.

2. Stop Playing too little or too many games a day
Many low elo players either play 2 games a day or 10+ games a day. Stop doing this. You ideally want you play 3 games minimum to 6 games maximum a day. Playing way too many games a day with make you susceptible to tilt queuing and you won't rank up significantly if you play too little games a day.

3. Improve your mechanics
I promise you that nothing else matters in low elo besides mechanics. The best way to improve your mechanics is to go in the range and try to hit bots on medium mode while counter strafing or play deathmatch and unbind your crouch button. Also if you are going to play deathmatch, use guns like the sheriff and guardian since they incentivize first shot accuracy and crosshair placement.

4. Have good coms
You don't even have to IGL. Telling your teammates where the enemies are, what utility they used and where, as well as how much damage you dealt to them will win you a lot more rounds than you think.

Anyways, These are the tips that got me out of low elo, if they worked for me they could work for you as well.",Insight,
I've been playing for about a year and I cannot seem to improve past my current skill level. I don't play comp very often and that might be part of the problem. All of my me mechanical skills are fine but everyone else seems to have them mastered a little more than I do at all times.,Vent,
"Im asking genuinely. I started my account mid February, got lv 20 (now 31), did my placement matches and got place Iron 1 (i dont mind it). Im now around the 100 Unrated/ranked match milestone, 85 swiftplays, and some knockout games. I'm mostly playing with friends at college and some solo q in the evening. I found myself liking controllers, due to the lesser risk of getting killed (im not duelist, i dont have to be as aggressive). Specifically Clove and Viper, now maybe Miks. I even got a 22/10/7 im super proud of!

Here's the problem. It feels fun to mess with the agents, develop strategies, play a good run and get a 4k. People are kind enough in VC. Until the last stretch of the game, when they start to blame me for going triple negative K/D and being lower in the scoreboard than the Raze that was throwing (yes, just happened 15 min ago on split, her and Reyna telling me to uninstall, they're Bronze 2). So naturally, supposedly ""being ass"" led me to have less fun playing. Guides dont really work on YouTube, it's all super specific things that works mostly in higher ranks (and besides, im done hearing coaching ads), they tell me to play Deathmatch, i get overwhelmed needing to check 4 corners ar once when its only 1 or 2 on ""classic"" gameplay, they tell me to get Aimlabs, etc.

I wonder how you higher guys keep playing even if you're in a bad period and actually reinforcing your skills. I just don't get how im supposed to keep having fun if im that bad and that month of playing dosent seem like it changed my consistency or my game sense...",Vent,
"Breakdown: How to Play Fracture

I see too many good players struggle to play this map so let's break it down.

DEFENCE

B arcade and A dish are really important, you need to fight for one of them. (Especially if you have a breach.) In a dish don't worry to push slightly deeper, and take some space with info. You can take b arcade with a breach stun from spawn. You can also ask for a smoke into the choke and push under or flash out and push into them.

This map is quite easy to play for an retake since we are taking so much space. So don't be scared to do so.

Unless you have a breach, op or a lot of numbers (3+) it's really difficult to take both mains. That's why it's so important to play for dish and arcade.

For smokes unless your playing an Astra. Play spawn for quick rotate. I see to many of you playing mains or towers and your players on the other site are screwed over.

ATTACK

Orbs are really strong in this game. Especially after the util nerf. Take them. B main and dish are especially easy to with bit of util. ALWAYS TAKE ORBS...

On a sand is everything... the main is too small to get through and drop is too akward to go out off. Sand is a must.

Have 2 players or a lurker go dish or arcade if you want to go trough mains. Especially if you don't have a Brimstone since you can't smoke everything off.

Don't be scared to push into spawn. If your sand pushes are working let your Jett waylay raze dash into tower and take fight in spawn. But don't do it every round.

Ecos are great doing something stupid. Go push into the spawn. 5 man push to tower and spawn or from b main into spawn and take some unexpected fights.

END",Insight,
"Recently, I got an XLR microphone with a Scarlet 4i4 audio interface. Ever since I set it up, I couldn't talk in game. It didn't make any sense, considering I had the correct input selected, as well as I was able to hear my voice when I used the loopback feature in-game. Needless to say, I fixed it for myself and I will give you the step-by-step on how I did so you can hopefully fix it if you have this same issue. 1. Go to settings 2. Go to sound 3. Scroll down till you find More Sound Settings under the advanced tab below inputs 4. Click the Recording tab 5. Right click your input correcet input device and go to Properties 6. Go to the advanced tab 7. Click the drop-down menu for the Quality and make sure you select the highest quality but ONLY 1 CHANNEL. Mine was set to 6 and this was causing the problem. Hope this works:)",Insight,
I have roughly 118 hours in val and i have experienced nothing but misery due to mistakes that I don't know I'm making. I'm looking for someone (ps4/5) who'd be willing to coach me and potentially get me out of being utter garbage at the game.,Vent,
"I've been playing a fair bit of Astra lately. Here are my tips for her:

Stunning agents before pull significantly helps the pull (increase post plant success)

If you're on a team against Astra and your teammate is defusing vs a suck, you can body block Astra's suck by body blocking your defusing teammate from the Astra's star

Pull her smokes to easily/quickly let you get out of trapped areas

Due to complete sound block, you can use her ult to effectively fake a site execute

She has the largest smokes at 14.25m and decent duration at 14.25s. They regen and you can pull smokes infinitively for micro-smokes

Well paired as the primary controller with Viper and Harbour

Strong maps are Pearl, Abyss, and Corrode due to the size of her smokes vs other options",Insight,
"Title pretty much sums it up. I'm about level 300 (>1000 hrs). I'm also Iron 3, peaking Bronze 2 a year ago. Couple hundred hours in other FPS games too, such as CS and OW, and on the lowest competitive rank respectively. Around 100 hrs I have put into aim trainer applications.

Not my teams' fault. It's completely due to my lack of ability to aim at the enemy. Coaching has been unable to assist. I'm being completely serious--is this like a disability or something? I love Valorant, I just cannot aim.",Vent,
"If someone says that Yoru is useless, they're wrong. His kit is still one of the strongest.

I got deranked to Iron 3 due to rank reset, and struggled to get out of Iron eventhough I peaked to Bronze 3 last act. It was hard especially cuz in Iron, they lack game sense a lot. So then I'd have to IGL and all that.

Even with basic stuff where usually when the spike falls down, it's better to hold it as a defender, because the end goal is to prevent attackers from planting it but instead defenders end up leaving the spike and getting greedy for kills, leading them to give the last attacker 1v1s.

I main Fade but it got harder to carry with her so I had to switch to a duelist and chose Yoru. This way I could rotate to the other site with a snap of a finger and not worry about my teammates not being able to hold site.

Only problem was that I wasn't used to playing Yoru, so teammates usually hated me at the beginning when I end up dying trying to entry, due to no info and no proper timing (Mastering this is essential for Yoru).

This caused me to jump back and forth between Iron 3 and Bronze 1 few times.

And lemme just say this, Yoru is not built for entry like your other usual duelists. He doesn't got a dash neither does he sprint in. It's all about timing and disruption. He thrives when things are chaotic.

Can't do the same tp's because then the enemies start holding those spots, leaving them predictable and unsafe.

And this is also kinda when I started to understand why a lot of duelist get afraid to entry.

One of the reasons they end up dying is cuz they don't got info and they aren't being set up for plays by the initiators. They're blind and teammates be like ""do entry bro"" and then blame them for dying. But it's also up to the duelist to request for util to set up their plays. If you have a Sova, request him to use his recon dart or his drone.

And Yoru as a solo duelist is pretty difficult to execute compared to other duelists when it comes to entry so I'd often request for another duelist, which allows me to initiate with them or lurk and tp back to the team (love to pair up with a neon cuz both agents thrive on chaos)

The thing with Yoru though is that you shouldn't be afraid. You need to be confident on the plays you make. And I mean the ""high risk, high reward."" kinda plays which makes people go, ""huh? How'd the enemy not notice?""

I still kept playing, but this time I asked for utils from my teammates and I was able to make some pretty decent plays. When I don't solo queue, I have a duo with me. (Omen and Yoru goes hard. Like what do you mean we both can TP to the other site and take a free site? Chaos unravel fr)

It helped me make a more coordinated play, as my duo was a controller so I was able to execute fake site hits and rotate immediately to gain free sites for a plant. I could even ask for early smokes to hide in them I wait with the judge, waiting for the attackers to push into site and then get some frags and TP away.

Was even able to Ace with the judge with this kinda playstyle.

I could even set my TP up inside a smoke, and just pop flash out of it, and clear site that way.

Often let my teammates know when I'm ulting to give info, and jumping on the vulnerable ones (reloading, melee) for the free kill and TP'ing away.

Learned some TP lineups (I recommend Maverick) and from then on, it was upto me and my timings to be unpredictable. They had nerfed Yoru and many people said he was useless now but he still felt broken due to how you could get behind enemies without them even noticing, and set up your TP's almost anywhere on the map.

Often let my teammates know when I'm ulting to give info, and jumping on the vulnerable ones (when they're reloading, holding melee) for the free kill and TP'ing away.

Finally hit Silver 1 with Yoru, recently. So, point is, you can rank up with Yoru. He's still good. And you don't got to have the best aim to rank up. But you definitely need that game sense. And obviously, the effort to learn.

I still got a long way to go though. But yeah, it's still fun.

(If you guys got any tips on some tricks or tips with Yoru, it would be great)",Insight,
"Below are some of the most common mistakes I have noticed across every single rank, through coaching players from all different ranks and servers. This won't be super in-depth or expanded upon, but i'm hoping somebody will be able to take something from this thread and apply it to their own games or mindset & approach to the game in future.

I am happy to expand on any of these concepts if people are interested or would like to ask me, but for now i'll just keep the main parts straight to the point and listed off.

Iron
Very little crosshair discipline (aiming at the floor/walls instead of head height)

Gun mechanics (not knowing when to burst, tap, spray etc).

Tunnel vision on shooting instead of positioning and/or moving.

Bronze
Utility dumped early with no follow-up (they think just using util in general automatically has value, so often is just completely misused. contrary to the middle-ranks who actually die without even using it which will be mentioned later)

Chasing kills while ignoring the objective

Silver
Inconsistent decision-making (good aim one round, tunnel vision on flashy plays)

Fighting without information or team presence

Gold
No awareness of enemy or team economy (buying without the team, or forcing at the wrong times etc)

Poor spacing with teammates (either stacked too close or too far to trade)

auto-pilot predictable playstyle every single round without adapting to what the enemies are doing.

Platinum
Overconfidence in mechanics leading to risky peeks/duels.

No focus on the objective of each round, just on how you feel like playing.

Mid-round indecision after the initial plan breaks down (e.g your rush to a site gets delayed or stopped, and you just lose all knowledge of what to do or how to play. whether it's rotate, re-hit, etc.)

Diamond
No discipline in man-advantage situations. (e.g if you have the spike down on defense and are in a 5v3, defenders will push and throw numbers. or in a post-plant scenario with numbers, etc).

Over-rotating on defense based on limited information

Predictable patterns (same defaults, same timings)

Forcing individual impact instead of letting rounds play out.

Ascendant
Playing too fast without fully processing round context.

Lack of team-play. A lot of Ascendant players are more focused on what they as an individual can do as opposed to how their role fits into the team and what they should be doing for the team each round, on both defense and attack.

Small communication gaps that snowball into lost rounds

Immortal
Overpeeking when holding an advantage

Taking early fights out of routine rather than intention

Underestimating how quickly momentum shifts
",Insight,
"I just wanted to share a thing I noticed today, watching replay from a game that went particularly well for me.

I onetrick Astra and of course I put succ and stun on spike, whenever I have stars left in postplant. With two stars this close, sometimes it can get tricky to not misclick those and if I'd I succ defuser with star directly on spike, well it's gg (pun intended). To avoid this, some time ago I started putting my stun star on the (player height) box above spike, if location was right.

In closing round of that last game of mine, I noticed that defuser was not stunned at all when I swinged him and atm I thought he dodged the stun, but acktchually after 3yrs of playing Astra I learned that stun hitbox doesn't reach below the star (even if animation of pulse suggests otherwise). I don't know if that was the case all the time, or maybe thats not intended behavior and got broken or maybe nerfed at some point, but that's how it is now.",Insight,
I am trying to learn this darn game but I suck. I have a twitch set up for anyone that can coach me. My name is m00nshinehero. I really suck at getting kills and any help is appreciated.,Vent,
"Hey everyone. Just wanted to vent a bit about something that’s been driving me crazy lately.

​Valorant was my first FPS. I’m completely hooked on the teamplay and coordination aspect, but I feel like all the hours I put in aren't paying off anymore. I play about 3 to 4 hours every single day and consume an insane amount of content to improve, but the results just aren't there.

​I hit Diamond 1 after a massive grind, but the fall-off was insane. Now I’m hardstuck Gold 2 and struggling to even stay there. Lobbies are a total mess—I’m getting one-tapped by Silver 2s, dealing with constant AFKs, trolls, and teammates who don’t seem to understand the absolute basics of the game.

​I recently switched from Raze to Jett to try and have more impact/carry potential, but my mental is just shot. I’ve started playing full mute just so I don’t lose it in chat with people who don't have a clue what they're doing.

​My real question is: for anyone who's been playing for a long time (5 years for me), have you ever managed to bounce back from a slump like this? Or did I just hit my technical peak and this is it for me?",Vent,
"I think that Jett's a pretty solid agent given how her util is very rarely ineffective or dampened by a given map. I tried Jett out for a bit when starting the game, and although she was fun, her gameplay style just wasn't for me; I mostly just found being the first one in and the centre of attention for enemies on site was stressful and my aim would mess up lol

Commenting on the Phantom point though, I'd say it's best to note when to pick either Phantom or Vandal and why. My general understanding is that the Phantom's better for suppressing fire and shooting through smokes (no tracers), whereas the Vandal is best with very straightforward encounters, clear line-of-sight and a steady aim for tapping heads. I'd assume that the Phantom is best for on-the-move shooting given that its spread isn't as sensitive as the Vandal's, but against longer sightlines it does suffer from the infamous 140 dink.

In any case, I think it'd be better to try practising with the Vandal just so that you're not caught out in larger areas. The time between 1 bullet and 2 bullets is short, but it's better to guarantee a kill if you know you're dealing with a larger space.

That being said, I am by no means experienced with ranked, so do take my word with a grain of salt. However, given you're an entry duelist and drawing a lot of attention to yourself, I do think it'd be better to secure a kill and die rather than leave someone on 10 HP and die, especially if they have a healer on their team or the person you shot is someone who can recover that health, like Reyna, Clove, Phoenix, or Veto.",Insight,
"Hi guys, I'm an ex-Radiant player and active coach.

In some of my previous posts, I got asked quite frequently what to train in deathmatches. Since it seems like a pretty common question, I decided to make a post about it so other people can benefit from it.

Valorant is a hard game but not that complex when it comes to mechanical skills (compared to games like CS2, for example).

The main things someone needs to master are:

How to clear angles

How to peek

How to hold angles

If you can master all of the above, you're basically a Radiant player... worst case scenario, a really good Immortal 3 player.

This is mainly because those are the most impactful skills when it comes to Valorant (yep, aim isn't there, so you can be a really good player without having insane raw aim. I've personally coached an Immortal 3 14-year-old who had a 1.4 KD in Ranked, 59% win rate in deathmatches, yet he scored only Gold in Voltaic benches).

So, let's quickly start explaining how to perform each one.

How to clear angles: This is easier said than done. Most people, even in Immortal, have no idea how to do it. You always want to keep your crosshair in a place where enemies can come from and track that position while moving. The crosshair should stay slightly away from the wall (although it can work even if you have it slightly inside the wall as long as you track it) and should stay in the same position while you keep scaling up (advancing/moving). You can stop tracking only when you're close to clearing a common angle position. In this case, when you're about to approach a common angle, you should pre-aim that angle and peek. So... always track the corner until you approach a common angle (a position where players are likely to hold you from). When you approach the angle, pre-aim it and peek.

How to peek: Peeking is pretty straightforward. You get close (horizontally, not vertically... so not close to the wall in front of you, but close to the position you want to peek), and then press either A or D to go out and peek. The movement is pretty easy (standard peek), but you gotta pay attention to one thing... make sure you peek only one angle at a time. You don't want to peek and get yourself exposed to multiple angles at once because you'll reduce the chances of winning the fight since you might face multiple enemies at once. Other than the standard peek, there are other forms of peeking. You have the wide swing, jiggle peek, jump peek, and crouch peek. They all have their advantages and disadvantages, and I suggest you watch a quick video on YouTube about this because it will take me a while to list them all in this post xD

How to hold angles: When it comes to holding angles, the main things you want to keep in mind are the following. Keep your crosshair away from the wall when you're playing in a common spot because people will most likely clear your angle by peeking or swinging. Since they will be faster on screen, keeping the crosshair wider will give you more time to react, making the shots way easier. Also, make sure to account for the distance... if you're holding a close angle, you want to have the crosshair even wider (the closer you are, the faster enemies will feel), while if you're holding a far away angle, you want to have the crosshair a bit tighter (the further you are, the slower enemies will feel). Also, keep your crosshair wider when you know someone will peek you by running (for example, let's say an enemy Sova has spotted you in site and the enemy team is rushing. As you get scanned, you can expect enemies to try and kill you ASAP, so they will peek you while full running). On the other side, keep your crosshair tight when you're playing in an off-angle because people will most likely be shift-walking while clearing off-angles. This way, you'll be able to kill them as soon as you see them because, by shift-walking, they will give you more time to react since they are slower. As previously mentioned, adjust the tightness based on distance.

So yeah, when you play your death matches focus on improving this things because those are the things that will make the greatest impact in your skill level and rank.

I know the post is a bit long, but I really hope it clears things up for a lot of players.

If you guys have any questions, feel free to drop them in the comments.",Insight,
"The new pistol is BAD and you shouldn't listen to anyone hyping it for content
Look, I get it, everyone is excited about the new toy, everyone wants to like it and play with it. But as time goes on and the hype dies out, the community will come to terms with the fact that the bandit is almost never a good buy.

Let's start by looking at the niche this weapon is supposed to fill. It's a slightly clunkier ghost that trades magazine, rate of fire and recoil for the ability to one shot light shield enemies at mid range. Yes, it also one shots heavy shields at close range, but we'll get into that later.

So let's compare it to another light shield punishing weapon, the outlaw. The outlaw is a very powerful gun for a very specific reason. It is as powerful as the op when your opponent is on low econ. When they can't afford heavy and a rifle so they'll get light, or are on an eco or half buy. You buy the outlaw when you have the advantage, and you buy it to punish greedy buys or bad economy. And it's very good at it's job. It has made it so when you're sitting at 3600 credits you think twice before getting light armour and a rifle, and maybe opt to full eco, or buy heavy and guardian/bulldog to punish the outlaw player. VCT teams often have a couple of full armour guys peek first in force buy rounds as well.

But that doesn't apply to the bandit, because the bandit is not punishing bad eco, it's a low economy weapon itself. And good players know that light armor meta is good in full buy Vs full buy rounds (except if there's the threat of an outlaw). Against low eco weapons, such as smgs, shotguns, and pistols, heavy armour is a lot more relevant, because almost every non-vandal (and less than 20 meter phantom) weapon in the game will take one more bullet to take out those extra 25 points. So against low eco rounds you should already prioritise heavy armour. Second round buys should always feature it and in force buys against low econ it's often better to get heavy + guardian/outlaw than a rifle because it'll match a lot better against the low buy. So there are very few scenarios where this light armor ""punishment"" actually happens.

Then we have to compare it to the other weapons the bandit is competing with. Mostly, other pistols. In pistol round, it's almost always a worse ghost except for the occasional light armor buy (now that walls are down to 300 creds, those buys are even less common). And in eco rounds, it has a very rough time against the already justified heavy armor, you'll find yourself wanting a sheriff that can headshot kill in a better range. But of course, let's not forget about the 152 headshot damage under 10 meters. The reality of that scenario is that LESS THAN 10 meters fights are not headshot fights. There's a lot of running and gunning, high movement action, specially against a rifle that has high rate of fire and magazine. That's why the sheriff struggles so much there. And more often than not, fighting in close quarters like that with a bandit is not going to feel that much better. Hell, the classic right click is probably as likely to win those fights.

So when do you buy this? NEVER in eco rounds. Sometimes, it may be optimal in pistol rounds, specially in VCT, this can punish some regen shield + teammate pistol buy some teams like to do for their duelists. Or for agents that already went with low or no util in pistol round, this is a similar alternative to the sheriff that will scale better than the ghost in rounds 2 and 3, as anti eco or bonus weapons. Other than that, this pistol shouldn't be bought and in a pistol round I'd never buy less until to afford this rather than a ghost. Contrary to that, I'd consider this to get an extra piece of util instead of a sheriff.

And for anyone arguing that not all fights are clean headshots and that the phantom is really good with body shot + headshot, the phantom is a very high rate of fire and easy to control recoil rifle. Pulling that off with a bandit is inconsistent. The other argument of ""but people are greedy and will buy light armor against eco"". You have no way to guarantee that, and game knowledge informs that they probably won't. And if we're evaluating how good weapons are based on how bad your opponents play, the Odin is the best weapon in the game and no one should ever buy a vandal. Yeah I'm talking about optimal gameplay and game theory here.

This is all to say, I don't hate the bandit and I don't think it's bad for it to be in the game. I expect it to get buffed a little over this season, maybe with better recoil/magazine, or extending the range to incetivice it as an eco weapon kind of like a closer range sheriff similar to how the phantom is a closer range vandal.",Insight,
"Hi everyone, I'm an ex Radiant player and active coach and, ""how to be consistent"" does always come up as one of the most frequent problems players are facing.

This is a recurring theme in the Valorant Reddit so I'm going to quickly tell you everything you can do to make sure you're as consistent as possible (some of the things will have higher impact than others).

Here is the list of the main things you need to do to stay consistent:

Sleep as much as your body wants. Don't wake up with alarms, sleep until your body wakes up alone. Try to go to sleep always at the same time, even in weekends and try also to not expose yourself to blu light 1h before going to sleep. I know this is not applicable to everyone but if you can, do it because sleep is the most important thing for a human being.

Drink water regularly. Make sure to drink enough water so your body can always function properly. This is simple to do, makes your brain and body work better and you'll also be healthier.

Do some form of physical exercise. A strong and functional body will help you from different aspects. Your body will be healthier, function better and your brain will also be more healthy and ready. Physical activity stimulates neurological activity so, if you can, do some form of physical training.

Try to eat healthy. As for the water and the physical exercise, eating healthy will basically improve everything. The difference in energy between a person eating junk food and someone eating healthy is massive and you can try it yourself.

Make sure your setup is always the same, same position for the mouspad, same position for the monitor, same position for the keyboard (although not as important as the previous) and most important of them all...make sure you sit in the same position every time you play.

Check if the mouspad and the mouse skates are in good shape. If they are too warned out make sure to replace (if you have the chance of doing so) them as it really hurts performance. Although not as crucial, this can still have some decent impact on your gameplay.

Play Valorant on a daily basis. Valorant is a very punitive game, as soon as you leave you need some time to get back in shape. This is a big reason why you see a lot of ""washed up"" players that cannot go back to their previous performance, Valorant punishes them for leaving and it is really hard to get back in shape.

Warm up before every ranked session. Make sure to have a long enough warm up before you play and make sure you feel yourself in shape before going ranked. The whole purpose of the warm up is to get you to the point where you say: ""ok, I'm hitting shots like I usually do, I'm ready"". Don't make it too long though as it might be fatiguing and you won't be fresh once you jump into ranked games.

Bonus - Consider taking some supplements. Won't really affect how consistent you are but it will slightly improve your brain capabilities so might be something you can consider taking. I would say that unless you're looking to go pro, you don't really need to take it so don't bother much. I'm including it just so you guys get a complete post with all the information needed.

If you do all of this I promise you will always feel like you are in shape. This doesn't mean that you will drop 30 bombs every game as there are other things to account for when it comes to pure performance. For example, you might feel in shape but once you go in ranked you get matched with stronger players and you get destroyed.

That's fine though, this is not under your control and things like that will happen. We need to focus only on variables that are under our control. This way we lower the amount of variables that can make us lose a game.

Hope this was helpful and if you have any questions feel free to ask.",Insight,
"Hi guys, I'm en ex Radiant player and active Valorant coach.

It took me almost 3 years to get to Radiant the firs time.

The thing that helped me the most was playing a shitload of death matches.

I managed to play 800 death matches in a single act and I have done more than 7000+ death matches in my entire Valorant ""career"".

I'm making this post to tell you guys that if you are in a position where you don't know what to do and you don't have someone that can help you, the best thing you can do is play death match.

Focus on improving your weaknesses and if you don't know what they are focus on trying to win the death match as hard as you can.

Don't shift, don't hold the same spot for more than 3-5s.

Try to take as many fights as you can, sheer repetition will do his magic with time.

Is this the smartest way? Nope.

But if you don't know better, it's definitely better than nothing or some random BS.

I've seen players completely transform once they start playing 7-10 death match daily.

So yeah, if you have some time, want to improve and don't know what to do...start with doing 7-10 death matches every day. Even better if you can divide them in 2 session, so for example 5 and 5.

Hope this can help, if you have any other question regarding Valorant feel free to ask in the comments",Insight,
"Hi guys, I'm an ex Radiant and active Valorant coach.

I recently saw a few people complaining about aim trainers not working for them and I thought it might be useful to do a post about it to help other players in the same situation.

A lot of times people hop on aim trainers thinking that they will magically make them better in game but they are missing something...

To be able to get real results from aim trainers you need to be good mechanically inside the game.

Why is that? If you don't know how to move inside the game (strafe, counter strafe, crosshair positioning and spacing, angle clearing, peeking, fight IQ and general ability to use the keyboard) you will never be able to express the full potential of your aim.

You might be an insane aimer but if your mechanics are awful you won't be able to get value from your insane aim (or at least, not as much).

Does this mean aim trainers are bad? No, not at all. Aim trainers are super useful.

The best thing to do is to train in game mechanics and your aim together instead of doing just aim training.

One example of a good routine might look like this:

Before you play ranked:

12-15m of aim training

5m of free warm up in the practice range

2 death matches

After ranked: 4 death matches

As you can see, we spend the majority of our training time inside Valorant and use aim trainers as an additional help, not as the main focus.

Hope this can help someone that might be stuck in this situation.

If you have any questions about the topic or anything else (regarding Valorant) feel free to ask in the comments
",Insight,
"background info: i'm a plat 1 flex player but usually play smokes. I usually play 2-3 games before getting a bad game and hopping off. I'm 16 and to me 6 hours+ is already considered enough sleep because of school (sleep 12 to wake up at 6). I've just come back from a 2 week trip to Japan as well as a mission trip to Manila with 2 days' rest in between. In Japan i didnt get ample sleep at night BUT i did sleep in the car while we were driving around but in Manila i didn't get ample sleep at all. I landed on 22nd at around 12 but have been sleeping around 4 for the past 2 days because of church activities and just playing around and waking up around 1-2pm. i also upgraded to a new mouse for Christmas but ive been having these problems since before i changed my mouse. I usually 2nd frag and i'm almost always positive with the only reason why my tracker score not being S tier due to low round win % at around 44%. I played perfectly fine on 15th and 16th and 23rd when i came back.

On 24th I woke up at 10am while sleeping around 4 the night before. I queued 3-4 games and I played pretty well except for 1 game where i barely went positive. Heck, I even got an ace game 1 and a pretty good hs% another game (i think, i dont remember but i know i was playing well). But in the afternoon, I played with my friend in Gold 1 who's and suddenly i was playing like shit. I was playing like usual but every aspect of my gameplay seemed to have declined. Not just mechanics but game sense as well. Suddenly i was making bad decisions and I couldn't land a shot. I thought that maybe it may have been the lobbies since I had a pretty high MMR, so I hopped on my smurf in gold which had low MMR to see if that was the case, but i was still going negative in a GOLD lobby as a PLAT. That night i went for midnight mass at church since I'm a catholic, so i stayed the night at my friend's house, played a game, similar results. I didn't play for the rest of Christmas because of family dinner and since i thought i was having an off day and got enough sleep waking up at 1:30 after sleeping at 4. I slept at 4 again last night but I woke up at 12 and I decided to hop on to play, but I just had similar results and problems again. I have absolutely no clue what i'm doing wrong since it's not like i've woken up 1 day and just been horrible. Please help.",Vent,
"ust started Valo and I think that I’m the teammate I always swear at in every other game
I started playing today and I have played 10 matches (first to 5 wins) me and my team won most of them ( 7-8 ) but I feel like I’m just a weight for my team…

First of all I don’t know how to use the abilities and many times I’m flashbanging my teammates while on a fight or do crucial mistakes like standing somewhere without a cover and get killed.

I have decent aim and I have some pretty crucial kills, I’m also pretty good at peaking some times but that’s it

What can I do to improve (other than just playing the game) to get better, I hate being this noob guy who gets carried by the rest of the team…

I also bought Veto with a free agent ticket I had somehow and just realised that he is being used by better players than me and he is mainly focusing on tricking the opps by disabling their abilities and it looks like the most difficult thing in the game for me",Vent,
I have been playing valorant for like 3 Months and at first my movement felt weird then It felt good and now all of the sudden my movement feels weird again. I saw vids on how to move only with a and d or like use only use w when u really need it. And now i js dont now how to move when. Should i slow walk when i am defender and i am holding site and i want to reposition. Is there any vids where someone plays with theyr keys shown. Pls help guys,Vent,
"Valorant is a 5v5 team-based shooter, meaning all five players must contribute to win. However, many players—consciously or not—tend to bait.

In tac-FPS games, baiting means using a teammate to reveal enemy positions or draw fire so you can trade the kill more easily. Conscious baiting can be good—like waiting for your duelist to entry before swinging through a smoke, or having a low-HP teammate swing first so you can trade (using them as bait). These are good plays and when done intentionally.

But in ranked, especially lower ranks, subconscious baiting is common. Often it happens because players are scared to die or don’t know how to follow up. The simplest fix: copy your teammate. If they swing, swing; if they shift-walk, you do the same; if they call a 5-man push, braveheart with them. Teaming up wins rounds.

There are times when holding back is fine (e.g., shotgun trap plays or smart lurking), but if you’re always last alive and getting called a baiter, it’s a fair shout. Try pushing with your team after a couple rounds to get them more firepower, might help in the site push.

If you’re afraid of dying, play DM/TDM for a few hours to get used to it. Hiding while your teammates die helps no one. Even if you’re consistently clutching 1v3s or better (20%+ rate), relying on clutches isn’t sustainable. Trading and fighting with your team is.

To practice not baiting, play TDM and copy your teammates’ movements or throw utility for them. Build those habits in practice and they'll subconciously carry over to ranked, where you'll more easily find a way to help your teammates.",Insight,
"Some tips and tricks I would like to share for people who are stuggling to reach Gold/Platinum
Educational
Hey, so i have seen people asking everyone for suggestions on how to play better in the game. As a player who plays daily, here are my tips on how to master the game.

Start with a deathmatch everyday. Wasting 10 minutes for a 4 hour competitive is all the worth.

Never pick duelist on the first match of the day. Might sound crazy, but overconfidence is not the key.

Play the same agent for the next 'n' matches you play (The more the 'n', the better). This will make you more associated with the agent and helps you gain new insights and ideas on how to utilize your utils more efficiently.

If you always play good in silver lobby, dont assume that you are excellent. You can be another average player in gold or plat lobby.

Playing dashing duelist (like Jett, Neon, Raze, Waylay) helps you put in hard situations where you need to flick instantly. This will later help you later when you play as any other agent when you come in the same situation and improves your flicking skills.

Never be comfortable with playing Reyna. Main reason is because you always push while thinking you can heal. In reality you will be dependent on Reyna and cannot play any other agent which cannot get healed. Or maybe be dependent on sage/skye to heal you. Another situation arise when you cannot decide when to push when you are not at max health (For example, you are at 57 HP but you are unsure whether you can push or not dependending on the situation. This happens because you always play Reyna with the thought that you can get healed.) This also helps you focus less on health and more on combat.

The main place where every player has got hardstuck is on gold lobby. We might reach Gold 3 and suddenly come back to Silver 3 and it keeps on repeating. Once you get out of gold, you will have developed some gamesense and learn more tactics. Gold lobby is learning all about how to outrun your enemies, not combat.

Remember, the goal of the game is all about the spike. For defence, dont let the spike be planted. If its planted, then the goal is to defuse. For attacking, the goal is to plant the spike and waste the enemy's time. We all know this but we always decide to play combat and try to get more kills. Trust me its not worth it.

Never bait your teammates in higher lobbies. The team is on the support of 'mutual understanding' ('If you die, then I might die aswell', or 'we always have each others backs').

We might think we must be always aware of our enemies so that we can understand their plan. But what we dont think about is about our teammates. We should be aware of our teammates too, so that we can also know what each teammate's strategy is.

Trading a teammates death is also important. If you see a teammate lurking, make sure that teammate safely reaches the other site to backstab. If you are not confident that the lurking teammate doesnt get the kill and dies, go with that teammate. You can trade that teammates death

Follow the string rule. 3 seconds before your round starts, look at the map and see your teammates location. Now consider each teammate as a dot (including you), and connect an imaginary line through all these dots. Anything behind the line is safe most of the time, and anything after it has all the enemies. This 'string' has to stay connected all the time. If a teammate dies, the string becomes more volatile. This sting can be used to cover a location and clear areas. Plus, this string gives more advantage when a player lurks and tries to backstab, which makes more area behind the string and less area after the string.

One duelist is enough for large maps. 2 sentinels in a large map is a way better advantage. 2 smokes is also good. Anything to do NOT let the enemies into the site is an advantage more than combat.

If the team has 2 duelist, make sure one is dashing duelist (mentioned before), and other is blinding duelist (Pheonix, Reyna, Yoru).

The more you play, the more you realize that each agent can play hybrid role. (Ex. Deadlock is a sentinel but can use her ult to push people back, making her a Sentinel - Initator hybrid). This is useful because as said before, the more times you play an agent continously, the more ideas you will get to master that agent.

Comms is a must. Without communication, we never get to understand the enemy's motives. Plus also make sure not to whine/critizise right after you die because your teammates are alive and are also trying to play the game while you might be screaming.

If the team goes without comms, make sure that you are aware of what your teammates are doing by checking the map. For example, Raze/Neon mains mostly wait right outside A or B main with a shotgun. So if you are playing Omen, make sure to smoke that area for them so they can play in good advantage.

I will edit this message if I remember any other tips.
",Insight,
"Hardstuck silver since a Loooong Time

I had been playing this game since January 2024, and it was really easy for me to jump into silver like it took almost no time. But after that, it took me nearly 9-10 months to get out of silver and hit gold for the first time, Ever since that time, I had peaked a max rank of Gold 3 at the start of the year and I have never been able to reach that rank ever again. Can someone please guide me and tell me what mistakes do I make? I feel my teammates are holding me back.",Vent,
"i don't know what happened this act i was high plat and now i'm gold one i haven't won a single game this act and i'm either pos close to winning or high pos and i have an enemy player going 40/9 and a teammate going 3/20 as i'm trying to hold my own and play for my team it's js hard
",Vent,
"I was looking up ways to use Sova’s recon more effectively and ended up finding a lineup that scans nearly the whole A site.
Some of you might already know this one, but I thought I’d share it for anyone who doesn’t!

Map: Ascent
From the spot shown in the image, if you fully charge your recon and shoot it at the wall, it scans most of A site and with the right angle, it can even reveal parts of mid. I’ve been getting great results using this lineup in my matches.

How to do it:

From attacker spawn, walk down mid and stop just before the A main entrance. Hug the right-side wall.

Aim around the middle of the second window on the building in front of you.

Fully charge your recon and shoot.

Advantages:

Reveals most of A site, especially under/above Heaven and around the link area.

The shooting spot is far enough from enemy spawn to stay safe.

Depending on your angle, it can even reveal the mid entrance.

If anyone knows similar recon spots on other maps that cover a large area like this, please share them. I’d love to try them out!",Insight,
"why is bronze is prison?
i like bronze 1-2 and i feel i need to be on gold or pls silver

I think that we have the same ranks and even this has conversation 5 yo ago. because I either get matched with smurfs and annoying idiots who have skill but are lazy, or with people who are playing FPS games for the first time.",Vent,
"Gold: Reyna 8.83% > Phoenix 7.39% | Immortal: Phoenix 9.2% > Reyna 7.61% | What's Behind the Shift?
I would've thought Reyna stayed more popular than Phoenix at pretty much every rank.

Gold
In Gold, Reyna's picked more than Phoenix (8.83% vs 7.39%) and their winrates are basically the same.

Immortal
By Immortal though, Phoenix is ahead in both pick rate (9.2% vs 7.61%) and win rate (50.08% vs 48.10%).

Why do you think that is??",Insight,
"kingdom credits SUCK
i feel like the only good thing kingdom credits have for them is unlocking agents, but once you’ve played the game for more than a month. they are useless. no one is thinking “oh i needa grind my weekly’s so i can get the next spray in the accessories shop!” here’s my idea

make kingdom credits able to purchase radianite (i think that’s how it’s spelled im too lazy to fact check it)

the amount of times i, and my friends have avoided buying skins is purely because we have nothing to upgrade them. even if it’s ridiculously expensive. i don’t care, you can make it 5000 kingdom credits for 5 radianite. just make kingdom credits useful PLEASE.

the only reason i can’t see riot doing this is because they make money off of people buying radianite, but there has to be such a small majority of people that buy it, they would probably make more money if people bought skins they liked because they could upgrade them.",Insight,"Although the user uses language that makes them seem very frustrated and upset, they do point out a specific problem as well as a solution, which is why I labeled this ""Insight""."
"Is Breeze over-represented in comp? I keep getting it every other game.
Remove this dogshit, cancerous map, please Riot for the love of god. I will keep dodging as many times as I have to until you guys get it through your skulls that NOBODY LIKES THIS MAP.",Vent,
Anyone else just tired of the new Valorant MMR it’s so garbage. Theirs games where I match mvp and win 13-7 for example and gain 14+ rr and win another game 13-7 where I do horrible and gain +13 so performance doesn’t matter at all. Seems like I get penalized for performance on a loss. All my losses are minimum -22 and if I perform bad in the loss it’ll go upwards of -25 to -27 so idk it just seems so shit. Back then wins and losses were way better terms of RR gains/ losses. Also the lobbies I get into are so unbalanced at times. One game everyone in the lobby is 1 to 2 ranks apart and in other games it’ll be 4-5 ranks apart it just makes 0 sense,Vent,
"Harbor Rework
Ability Rework
Deployment functions the same, even in Astral Form!
New signature ability
[E] High Tide (line wall): Activating lets Harbor enter Astral Form (similar to Astra), but with a travel range limit, allowing him to deploy the wall from a long distance while keeping the ability to control its trajectory. The slowing effect is removed, the wall length is reduced to ~50m, and it has a cooldown of X seconds.

What does this change fix?
Replaces Cove, which is an overtuned ability with a possible downtime of only 10s. That's too short for a tac shooter and offers very little counterplay. It's an overcompensation within Harbor's kit that sacrifices healthy gameplay design.

This version of High Tide fixes the current ability's design flaws. It can now be deployed without revealing Harbor's position, while still allowing him to provide smokes for teammates across the map.

Solidifies his identity as a line smoker by bringing back the wall as his signature ability.

Breaks Harbor out of being effective only as a secondary controller.

Possible misconceptions
""This version of High Tide is much slower to deploy than the current one.""
This version simply replaces the equip animation with Harbor entering Astral Form, allowing him to deploy the wall right away upon entering.

""It's a long wall that can be deployed from long distance and is also rechargeable. Wouldn't that be too OP?""
Not necessarily. It simply has its own strengths and limitations compared to traditional smokes (see image). Also, I either didn't specify certain details or only gave rough approximations cus I want to leave some room for interpretation regarding balance.

Conclusion
Just because you think an agent is considered ""good"" or ""viable"" atm doesn't automatically mean their design is objectively healthy. What's stopping Riot from reducing Breach's ult cost to 6 points just to make him more viable?

The goal of a rework should be to make an agent both viable and balanced, while also promoting healthy gameplay design.",Insight,
"Riot should start a recreation of older skins for the same guns. 
An example of what I mean is the Prime Vandal. It's an old skin that has definitely aged very well, but I feel that Prime is a skinline that still can be worked upon. Much like how the Champions Vandal and Phantoms are different, a new Prime Vandal would look the part while being distinct from the original.

As a Prime 3.0 bundle, I'm imagining a new Vandal, an Operator, a Judge, and Sheriff. And for the knife, since they made an axe and karambit, they could do a butterfly, a kunai, a gauntlet, or they could even do a spear (something we haven't really seen yet)

They could also do so for other skins such as Glitchpop or Sovereign.

A new Elderflame bundle would also go hard.

This entire post was prompted by a random guy in my deathmatch going ""Prime Sheriff when?""",Insight,
"Hot take: 90% of people using streamer mode aren't streamers, it's just an accountability-off switch at this point
Every time I run into someone obviously trolling, smurfing, throwing, or acting sus, they're hidden behind streamer mode. No name, no profile, no history. Just vibes and chaos.

I get why the feature exists. Real streamers deal with stream snipers, harassment, targeted griefing it's a legitimate problem. But somewhere along the way it became the go-to shield for people who just don't want to be reported effectively or looked up.

Think about it: if you're not streaming, why do you need your name hidden? ""Privacy"" is a stretch when you're in a 10-person match with randos. The only thing anonymity really protects in that context is your ability to behave badly without consequence.

Maybe Riot should add some friction — require a linked channel, a follower threshold, something. Or at minimum, don't let streamer mode hide you from post-game reports.

Am I missing a legitimate use case here, or has this feature just been quietly hijacked?",Insight,
"One thing Valorant players need to understand is that not everyone experiences tilt the same way.

Some players can get criticized, bottom-frag, lose five games in a row, and move on because their chemical makeup allows them to.

OTHERS CAN’T!!

When I’m playing well, I don’t care what anyone says. When I’m having a bad game, I become emotionally reactive and it gets super hard to focus on anything BUT tilting, because I want my emotions acknowledged and validated.

For years I’ve listened to Valorant and CS players saying “just fix your mental” as if it’s just a switch you can turn ofd. What I’ve found is that my ability to learn and improve is directly tied to my negative life experiences (and the uncontrollable mental consequences they’ve had on me).

Once I started addressing the things that were stressing me outside the game (high cortisol), having tilt became a complete non-issue. I’m calm, self-aware, and willing to look at my mistakes objectively instead of getting stuck in my emotions, because the cortisol isn’t pushing voices into my head.

That’s why I think a lot of advice about tilt misses the point, and is the fault of players that have no empathy. The issue isn’t Valorant itself, but the fact that a competitive environment where communication is key exposes some people’s mental issues.

If you’re struggling with tilt, don’t beat yourself up over it. Figure out what’s actually causing the stress, because fixing that will probably do more for your rank than any aim routine or VOD review ever could.",Insight,
"There are some things in Valorant that I just cannot explain no matter how much I think about it

One of the biggest ones for me is how certain Vandal skins completely affect my aim. I swear I can play well with one skin and then suddenly feel like I am missing everything with another. It is not even about visuals only. It feels like if the shooting sound does not feel right my aim gets worse. Almost like my brain is tied to the audio feedback of the gun and depending on that I either play really well or really badly.

Another weird thing that happens to me quite often is performance that completely flips between halves. For example I was playing Fade on Pearl and I had twenty kills on attack and everything felt perfect. Then the moment defense starts I suddenly cannot get a single kill the entire half. Same player, same match, same focus, but completely different result and I do not understand why that happens.

Do you guys have anything similar that you just cannot explain in Valorant?",Vent,
"am i the problem or is it just cause i don't have the right Sens for me
so I'm peak gold 1 de ranked and got back to it in a day im always switching my Sens after 2 days cause one day it dose good then the next bad and idk if its cause that first day my movement is amazing or what. But i did the psa method and landed on 0.12 1600 dpi but idk if im going to stick to it my mouse pad is a artisan fx soft xl and my mouse is a Logitech pro x superlight 2 and my keyboard is the aula 68 he and my monitor is like 240 hz 2nd mon is 100 hz so if u wanna get a gold player to plat or diamond NOT BY BOOSTING then let me know and ill drop my discord NA time zone",Vent,
"Shitty teammates screw my attack rounds😭😭
How exactly are you supposed to climb out of low elo and win as a dualist if your teammates don't cooperate and everyone simply pushes mid instead of gathering any info for me to be able to push😭😭😭",Vent,
"What if you could sell your Radianite for Valorant Points? 
Valorant Point are at ridiculous price, and as F2P theres almost nothing you can get, even the free pistol skins take forever to get. Harder than before because Kingdom Points are necessary to unlock other agents so you can't spend it on agent contracts early on.

Radianite are also ridiculously priced, 80 Radianite costs 4,800 VP????? this is insane, so what if you could sell you Radianite for VP as well? This gives F2P a chance to buy skins or at least battlepass.",Insight,
"Shotgun nerfs were prefect

Finally I’m seeing people buy shotguns maybe 4-6 rounds a game or less as an economic tool and punishment of enemy patterns rather than buying them every single round with no downside. Shotguns are still incredibly effective in chokes/smokes and their price + ease of use make them incredibly strong for trading yourself off for a kill while boosting your economy. They should have never been that strong on full buy rounds and attack entries.

There’s finally more weapon versatility in the game and you need to put more thought and skill into using a shotgun,there are what like 15 other guns in the game other than shotguns? There is a reason for most of the other weapons existing. It’s your job to figure out which weapon is the best in your situation. Shotguns force utility,rotates or they die when you’ve positioned correctly. You can even counter their utility with your own leaving them with none or less info to work with,you can dodge utility like around smokes or have someone shoot utility for you. I don’t think people realise just how easy it can be for a shotgun player to completely lock down a part of a map,guns like that shouldn’t be versatile or as low risk as they were.",Insight,
"Deathmatch has been added almost 6 years ago. Ever since then, the community has repeatedly asked for the ability to pick maps you want to play in deathmatch, in other words, having your own personal map pool. For example, if you want to practice your crosshair placement on Corrode, you should be able to only queue Corrode. If you don't want to play Fracture, you should be able to remove it from your personal map pool. This shouldn't be based on luck, you're here to practice. Why is this still not a thing? There are countless issues with deathmatch, but this seems as one of the simple things to implement.",Insight,
"Immortal players should not be allowed to queue with ascendant players
In the lower ranks 2 people queuing 3 ranks apart doesn’t really make a difference in regard to matchmaking or match quality but in ascendant/immortal, an immo 1/2 queuing with an ascendant 1/2 completely destroys the match quality. Since there’s such a small of those specific rank of duos, the matchmaker has to balance the average of each teams by giving the duo players team lower ranked players compared to the other team so you can wind up with low diamonds in a mid ascendant lobby. It sucks for the lower ranked players because that immortal on average is not immortal skill level since they are playing in ascendant lobbies most of the time. On the other hand, if that immortal player is not a boosted one, it ruins it for the other team because they get to be server admin. The discrepancy between low/high ascendant is way bigger than other ranks and it’s already hard enough as it is getting balanced ascendant lobbies.

Side note: asc 3 doesn’t really factor into this since they tend to be exponentially better than asc 1 and 2s",Insight,
"Remove Neon from the game. 

Everybody hates this agent. Why is it still in the game? We had so much fun playing Valorant when Neon was disabled for a few days, remember?",Vent,
"Riot missed a massive opportunity by making ""My Card"" website-only. It should be in-game!

The new ""My Card"" website feature that came out is super cool for sharing stats and favorite agents on social media. But honestly, it feels like a missed opportunity to keep it web-only.Here is what I mean: https://imgur.com/a/PgIaa45

It would be a massive upgrade to the customization system if Riot integrated this tool straight into the game client. Every player could customize a dynamically updated card featuring their top weapon, favorite role, and actual competitive rank. It would give loading screens so much more variety instead of everyone running the same battle pass cards.Would you love to see this in-game? Let’s get some upvotes so the devs might see it!",Insight,
"The new ranking system is so bad lmao
Hard stuck silver and now You're telling me that for above average performance per match rn you only get 14 rr while losing -30 rr to put it to perspective thats like triple the amount of rrs if you do an average performance",Vent,
"Valorant doesn't feel rewarding
I'm currently silver 2 and I'm losing the same RR for match mvp and for placing almost dead last on games. This game just doesn't feel rewarding. Every game I feel like I have to carry the whole team otherwise I lose. Thinking of switching to another FPS at this point.

What is the point of getting better and actually wanting to improve if I get rewarded the same amount of points for playing like a bot or stomping the whole lobby?",Vent,
"Harbor Ability Changes Ideas (Will these changes help the only 3 Harbor mains in the world find companionship?)
Discussion
Harbor's main issue is his unreliable map control due to the limitations of his smoke and wall. He can only provide a single orb smoke for teammates across the map. Lurking has its drawbacks cus his wall is vital for site execs, yet it has a limited range and gives away his position when deployed. He also has limited playmaking potential that can be done with Storm Surge. So, here are my solutions to fix these issues:

[C] Storm Surge (nearsight): Functions the same, except it no longer produces a sound cue when it hits enemies. The ability now has 2 charges.

[Q] Cove (shield): Functions the same as the pre-rework version. It is a throwable that deploys as a smoke orb, and reactivating the ability adds a shield to it.

[E] High Tide (line wall): Activating lets Harbor enter Astral Form (similar to Astra), allowing him to place the wall anywhere on the map while keeping the ability to control its trajectory. It has a 45s CD.

[X] Reckoning (ult): Functions the same, except its width is increased from 21m to 32m. Additionally, the duration when stopped is increased from 7s to 10s.

My Thinking:
These changes help Harbor break out of being effective only as a secondary controller (random bs concept btw), which IMO, is a poor excuse for bad design (no offense :P). This also solidifies his identity as a line smoker which is plus aura points to his initiator pals.

The High Tide change borrows Astra's deployment mechanic instead of Omen's, allowing Harbor to place the wall anywhere on the map, making it more versatile while keeping its beloved and unique gimmick. I've given Storm Surge 2 charges to improve our friendo's offensive punch and also to compensate the fact I removed its sound cue.

I reverted Cove to its pre-rework version for the sake of simplicity and quickness. Reckoning is actually a good design, but it losses points in the menacing aura department of how an ult should have. With the ult change, players will have the option to effectively slice the site in half.

What do you all think? How would you rework Harbor?",Insight,
"Why am i facing so much better players? For context: i started playing like a week ago and reached level 24. Im not good ik that, havent played any games in legit ages so im super rusty. Recently i started facing level 200+ players who obviously stomp me in both swiftplay and unrated. Is there a reason like unrated mmr? Or something going on, i tried playing on different servers with the same outcome (facing players WAY above my skill).",Vent,
"Add a keybind to mute/unmute all game audio. 

With the relatively recent recent settings menu update, Riot patched it so pressing Escape remembers the last tab you were on. I assume part of the goal was making things like muting audio quicker and more convenient.

That got me thinking: why not add a dedicated keybind to mute/unmute all game audio?

We already have keybinds for muting teammates, so having one for game audio seems like a natural addition. It would be useful for sudden loud noises, audio bugs, protecting your ears, reducing noise pollution, or simply dealing with real-life interruptions without having to open menus.

The keybind could just toggle all game audio while preserving your previous volume settings.

Small QoL feature, but one I'd use all the time.",Insight,
"am i the only one who thinks ascendant ruined ranked? (APAC) 

I’ve been consistently immortal before ascendant was added to the game, but since then I’ve had significantly less time to play (which played a big role as well) but it’s starting to feel like they’re just letting anyone get ascendant these days. The comms are bad, the team mechanics and strats and calls are bad, and the ego is the worst. I’m still able to get immortal sometimes but only when I have lots of time to grind and climb ranks, but otherwise, val ranked doesnt seem all that fun to play anymore",Vent,
"Aftershock (damage burst) and Faultline (concussion) swap places with some minor differences, making Aftershock Breach's new signature ability. Additionally, Flashpoint gains an option to be charged.

[C] Faultline (Aftershock): FIRE the charge to set a concussion blast through the wall. The concussion has a 6m, 180-degree cone (semicircle) radius with a 0.8s windup. How you deploy it is similar to the current Aftershock in game.

[Q] Flashpoint: Gain an option to charge the ability by HOLDING FIRE, which creates an audible cue (at Breach's location) within a 35m radius. Charging this ability shaves off some of the flash’s windup duration. It will automatically fire once it reaches the max charge and it can't be cancelled.

[E] Aftershock (Faultline): HOLD FIRE to increase the distance. RELEASE to set a slow-acting dual burst. It will have a maximum distance of 30m with a width of 5m (50s cooldown). How you deploy it is similar to the current Faultline in game.

This swap change helps Breach become more effective at clearing and weakening multiple key positions or angles for his teammates while scaling. The reason for the swap is simply that, in my opinion, the concussion effect is inconsistent, ineffective, and unreliable.

The flash change adds skill expression through good positioning, map knowledge, and game sense (gauging enemies' positions). It then rewards players by making the flash harder to dodge (similar to Skye's flash). The maximum amount of windup duration that can be shaved off is open to interpretation.",Insight,
"WTF Valorant why I'm against a diamond ? 😭

I'm plat (now gold after that 😭) in 1vs1 skirmish. BUT WHY 😭",Vent,
"My ideas on changes to Brim and Cypher
I been thinking for a while about how to buff brim to bring him back in to the meta and thought it would be good to change his Incendiary (molly) or stim beacon would regen with kills, much like a Phoenix flash. personally i think buffing his molly would make him a more fun character to play.

Also i like playing cypher but the thing that annoys me the most is that his spy cam has a set range. this means that you have to jump on boxes to be able to place his spy cam at a higher location. the change i suggest is that the range is removed from the cam but a height limit set on the arena. For example, on Haven A site, you are able to place spy cams quite high up around the site from window. What i am suggesting is that you should be able to place the same cam from the floor",Insight,
"Can I please play the game without the fear of losing 30RR per game?
It's been a while since the RR rework and it's been rough. I can only manage to win 12RR if I team or match MVP. Whereas if I dare to lose I lose 25 to 30 RR per game depending on how the enemy silver jett was feeling and how much they wiped the floor with me.

I mainly play sentinels and controllers and even with the added amount of assists I cannot get around the low RR intake.
I've stopped playing for a while and started again these few days to see if thing would improve and they did not.
This drained me and my friends so much that we collectively stopped playing valo without even speaking to each other about the state of rated. Everyone's just burnt out from it. Am i getting something wrong here?",Vent,
"Why doesn't Riot buff Chamber's TP the same way they buffed Waylay's Refract?

Waylay's Refract was changed from 100ms to 50ms, which made the ability feel significantly smoother and less clunky to use. Chamber's Rendezvous is still 100ms, even though Waylay's teleport was clearly designed around the same concept (they're the only two instant teleport abilities in the game).

I'm not even convinced this would be a major balance buff. The biggest impact would just be reducing those frustrating moments where you die even though your body is already across the map. It feels even worse once ping and server delay are factored in.

If Riot already determined that 50ms was healthier and felt better for Waylay, why not make the same change for Chamber? At the very least it would make the ability feel more responsive and remove some unnecessary frustration.
",Insight,
"Deathmatch and the Range still have the same issues they've had for years.
Discussion
Deathmatch STILL has both a time limit AND a win condition AND no backfill.

Its supposed to be a warmup, but if someone has a better warmup than you, your own ends sooner. On the flip side, if you perform really well, you also still end the dm sooner.

If someone leaves (majority of the time its like 3-4 who do), there is still no system to replace them mid game. When a lot of people leave, it gets harder to find gunfights. I frequently find myself running around for a whole minute trying to find fights some times.

The time limit makes it so you cant just stay continuously warming up for however long you want. You HAVE to go back to requeue.

Remove time limit, let people join mid match, and remove the win condition. Maybe let people CHOOSE the map they wanna warm up on too.

Now for the Range, the only changes nowadays are in the basement for lore stuff, with the last notable changes being the REMOVALS of spike trainings and adding a giant floating target that, when shot, spawns the 4 floating drone targets that were already there before the change.

The range needs both those minimodes back, and the options to:

- Change how many bots spawn in ""practice""

- Change the angle the bots spawn

- Change the distances the bots spawn

- Change from bots to agent models

Deathmatch and the Range have been neglected for YEARS. Please riot",Insight,
"Guys, I keep getting matched with a bunch of cheaters. I can prove they’re using them. Players with iron-clad movement, firing off shots that even Radiant can’t pull off in-game.

They’re using smoke grenades, knowing exactly where you are, and landing a single shot to kill you, no matter where you are.

Today I proved beyond a shadow of a doubt that two players were cheating. Way below their Elo, but always guessing everything.

This is so discouraging. The game is fun, but RIOT isn’t doing a damn thing to get rid of these shitty cheaters.

Why does nothing happen when we report them? Is RIOT colluding with the hackers? Is all this due to a shortage? A lack of players in the community?

Can someone explain this to me?",Vent,
"Constant de-rank since Gold 3, should I uninstall?
I don't know what changed since last 'Act' but I want from consistently Gold 2 - 3 to now struggling to keep Silver at all. I typically do have a positive K/D, do comms, eco decently well (to my understanding of good practices) and it feels like the MMR system is against me. Not sure if I should just switch games or what at this point.",Vent,
"What do you think about the idea of ​​being able to buy a second classic? For example, for 200 credits, you could buy extra firepower and dual-wield like the dual-barreled rifle in CS:GO. The accuracy would naturally be less.",Insight,
"Repost: Why your CS2 to Valorant sensitivity conversion ""feels"" wrong (and the exact projection math to fix it)
Discussion
Hey everyone, I am sorry for the clumsy post before without checking it if it was grammatically correct and not with bugs and blank logic so here is a full updated post.

If you’ve ever converted your sensitivity from CS2 to Valorant using a standard online calculator, you were almost certainly told to divide your CS2 sens by 3.18.

You open up Valorant, plug in the number, and instantly notice something is off. The mouse feels way too fast, twitchy, and ""slippery,"" even though a physical 360-degree spin on your mousepad takes the exact same distance.

I decided to skip the basic conversion tools and look at the actual math behind game engine cameras, perspective projection, and aspect ratio scaling.

Here is the deep-dive explanation of why your muscle memory feels lied to, and the exact constants you need to use for a perfect visual feel match—whether you play on 16:9 Native or 4:3 Stretched.

1. The Real Culprit: The Field of View (FOV) Illusion
Standard calculators use 360° Distance Matching. This forces your hand to move the exact same physical distance to spin in a full circle. While that sounds correct on paper, it completely ignores how your brain processes visual speed.

Your perception of sensitivity is heavily tied to your Field of View (FOV).

CS2 (16:9 Native) locks its vertical FOV, yielding a horizontal FOV of 106.26°.

Valorant locks its horizontal FOV at 103°.

Because Valorant’s FOV is slightly narrower, the image is more ""zoomed in."" When you rotate your camera, pixels pass across your monitor faster in Valorant than they do in CS2. Your 360° distance might be identical, but your visual tracking speed is completely mismatched, tricking your brain into thinking your sensitivity increased.

2. The Solution: 0% Monitor Distance Matching (Focal Length)
To fix the visual speed discrepancy, we have to match the sensitivity at 0% Monitor Distance. This means ensuring that tracking an enemy right at your crosshair (where you make 90% of your micro-adjustments and tracking movements) feels 1:1 identical between both games.

To achieve this, we have to scale your sensitivity by the ratio of the camera lenses' focal lengths rather than a physical 360° spin.

The 16:9 Native Divider: 3.375
If you play CS2 on native widescreen (16:9) and want Valorant to match its visual pacing perfectly at your crosshair, you must discard 3.18 and use 3.375.

The Formula: CS2 Native Sens / 3.375 = Valorant Sens

Example: If your CS2 sensitivity is 1.8009, then 1.8009 / 3.375 = 0.5336 in Valorant.

This slightly lowers your Valorant sensitivity, perfectly compensating for the tighter 103° FOV and stabilizing your micro-flicks.

3. The 4:3 Stretched Dilemma: Enter the 1.2566 Focal Factor
If you play CS2 on a 4:3 stretched resolution, the math gets significantly crazier.

Because CS2 utilizes a locked vertical FOV, dropping your aspect ratio to 4:3 narrows your horizontal FOV from 106.26° down to exactly 90°. When your monitor forces that 90° image to stretch out horizontally to fill a 16:9 panel, everything stretches out and visually moves 1.333x faster across your screen.

To deal with this, many players instinctively lower their sensitivity in CS2 when playing stretched. For example, a native sensitivity of 1.8009 feels visually identical to a stretched sensitivity of 1.433.

If you try to map this 3D-to-2D perspective distortion using a geometric arc-linear scaling factor to isolate horizontal pixel velocity at the crosshair, you get a universal Focal Factor of 1.2566:

1.8009 (Native) / 1.2566 (Focal Factor) = 1.433 (Stretched)

The Catch with Valorant
Valorant does not allow true 4:3 stretching. If you select 4:3 in Valorant, it only stretches your HUD/UI. The actual 3D game world stays rigidly locked at a 16:9 aspect ratio with a 103° FOV.

Because of this, you cannot use your raw 4:3 CS2 sensitivity with standard multipliers, or your mouse will feel like it's on ice. You must translate your stretched muscle memory back into Valorant's native projection matrix.

The 4:3 Stretched Divider: 2.6855
If you want to bring the exact visual feel of your 4:3 stretched CS2 sensitivity over to Valorant’s native environment, you must use the custom stretched divider:

The Formula: CS2 Stretched Sens / 2.6855 = Valorant Sens

Example: If your CS2 stretched sensitivity is 1.433, then 1.433 / 2.6855 = 0.5336 in Valorant.

4. The Pure Trigonometric Proof (The Nerd Stuff)
For anyone wondering where these exact constants come from, it boils down to calculus and perspective projection.

Game engines project a 3D space onto a flat 2D monitor using the tangent of the half-angle of your FOV. Because a screen is flat but a camera's rotation is spherical, pixel velocity is non-linear—objects move faster at the edges of your screen than at the center.

To find the velocity at the absolute center of your screen (where the angle is 0°), we take the mathematical derivative of the tangent function, which is sec^2. This means visual speed scaling at your crosshair is governed purely by the camera's focal length: f = 1 / tan(Horizontal FOV / 2).

Deriving the 1.2566 Focal Factor: By integrating the horizontal projection vector between a 106.26° native arc and a 90° stretched arc, the calculus yields: ln(sec(53.13) + tan(53.13)) / ln(sec(45) + tan(45)) = 1.0986 / 0.8814 = 1.2566.

Deriving the 3.375 Native Converter: The visual ratio between CS2 Native (106.26°) and Valorant (103°) is determined by their half-angle tangents: tan(53.13) / tan(51.5) = 1.3333 / 1.2572 = 1.06056. Multiplying this visual ratio by the standard physical 360° conversion constant (~3.1818) gives us: 3.1818 * 1.06056 = 3.375.

Deriving the 2.6855 Stretched Converter: To bridge the gap directly from CS2 Stretched to Valorant, we divide our visual Native converter by our internal CS2 aspect distortion factor: 3.3745 / 1.2566 = 2.6855.",Insight,
"Hello! A little theory to share this morning:
Following VALORANT's latest tweets, I've deduced that the next map will be in China, more precisely Hunan/Zhangjiajie. Let me explain: Sage came from China with her powers. Except she's currently crystallizing.
The best thing would be for her to return to her country of origin, to her roots in China. However, the Legion is anticipating her arrival in China because they're heading towards this destination: 29° 18' FC"" N, 110° 25' ZQ"" E. If we remove the strange letters ""FC"" and ""ZQ"", we end up in China near Zhangjiajie.
This area has mountains. It fits perfectly with VALORANT's teasing from a few weeks ago. Furthermore, the building we see perfectly matches Chinese architecture.

I think my theory is correct. The mountains are recognizable in the VALORANT teaser. I think Sage will want to seek help where she learned to control her powers.",Insight,
"Disabling SOCD made me better at DEADZONING (in Valorant).
Discussion
I practiced this in KovaaK's using b00n's 1:1 Valorant physics and movement inaccuracy threshold scenarios.

After disabling it, my deadzoning scores went to roughly the 80th percentile across most scenarios in the Valorant Strafe-aim Playlist (KovaaKsClickingTurquoiseForcebuy).

I didn't technically change anything. My M1 timing and deadzoning shots just felt more natural and automatic. I couldn’t believe the impact it made in Valorant.

If you use it, disable it yourself, and let me know if you notice anything different.",Insight,
"what are your opinions on the shotgun nerfs?
Discussion
all weapons reward different styles.
rifles reward you for crosshair placement, trigger discipline, etc.
snipers rewards you for positioning, patience, and map awareness.
shotguns however, rewarded you movement creativity, timing knowledge, and commitment.

coming from counter-strike, i became fascinated with shotguns. ive always been a rifler but when i began to play movement agents such as raze, waylay or neon, shotguns allowed me to express that creative aspect of mine in a way rifles could never.

a weapon that allowed me to use timing against my enemies, aggressive movement for entries, and ontop of that WAS DIRT CHEAP, something i fell inlove with.

when a shotgun play worked, it’s often because the player understood the map, utility, and timing well enough to get into the right position, not just because the shotgun did all the heavy lifting.

nowadays youre better off with a stinger. the shotgun has become a gamble. you either get the kill or deal 136 damage and lose the fight, which makes it hard to justify in comp.

like your favourite shoes as a kid that dont fit anymore, you look at them and cherish the memories you had.

whats your opinion on the shotgun nerfs?",Vent,
"alr ill be the first to say i suck at this game thats why im in bronze but being toxic in bronze and iron lobbies is crazy ngl i would get it in higher lobbies but not the lowest just keep it to yourself eh its whatever have a good day
",Vent,
"they need to stop making sage a free character
and they need to make you go through a healing tutorial before allowing you to buy the character. tired of people choosing the healer character and never healing anyone. go play CS if you don't want to use abilities.
",Vent,
"Premier on console
I understand that premier on PC is linked to pro play etc, however a console specific competitive mode with similar structure would be an amazing update.

How it would work

- Team based progression just like on PC

- Season based ranking

- Leaderboard visbility for top teams

- Potential for tournaments for the top teams for ingame cosmetics

- Same ruleset as PC premier",Insight,
"Calling the highest rank ""VALORANT"" is a bad idea - and terrible for content producers and consumers alike
How are people ever going to find gameplay of the top Valorant players?

""VALORANT VALORANT Game/tips""? I don't think so.

I believe that is going to be a problem.

Like how ridicolous would it be if the LoL challengers were called ""League Of Legends""? While we are at it let's also rename ""Global Elite"" to ""CSGO"" and ""Top 500"" to ""Overwatch"".
",Insight,
"Vanguards needs to ask permission to disable a program instead of disabling it silently itself.
Edit: We did it lads! https://twitter.com/arkem/status/1258493638318817280

---


I just spent the last 3 hours figuring out why I couldn't get into Windows because my keyboard and mouse wouldn't work. Just before that, I started smelling hot plastic - my graphics card was running +90°C because again, Vanguard disabled my cooling software (My PC case got very bad airflow, I have to decrease my GPU performance to keep it cool enough).

Vanguard really needs to prevent us from launching the game while X software is active -and asking us to close it, even if we need to reboot just after- instead of disabling everything silently.

EDIT regarding my GPU: the issue with my graphics card started few days ago but I wasn't able to link it to Vanguard. Since my case was made to hold a GT630, the airflow sucks hard and I made a profile which I always use with target performance at 75% for my GTX970. Less performance, but less heat and then less noise. Few days ago, Asus GPU Tweak gave me ""Error BIOS load failed"" when starting, and my GPU was spinning like crazy in a TFT game. I didn't fry my GPU (but others are claiming so), but it's not comfortable at all for me to have it blowing at fullspeed when playing a TFT game.


u/RiotArkem got downvoted into hell, so i'll copy/pasta what he said just in case

"" We're working on ways to make the experience better. Our current notification pop-ups aren't as good as they could be and we're looking for ways to give you more control over how Vanguard works.

We're happy to do anything we can to make this smoother for everyone as long as it doesn't give an opening for cheaters.

TL;DR: Expect improvements before launch.""
",Insight,
"I'd rather have more Maps than Agents
Just some guy's dumb opinion but, I would personally love to see more maps than agents in this game. I'd much prefer have one new map per episode or act or whatever than an agent. Because I feel like with the current 11 we have right now, they all already have unique abilities and playstyles to keep people busy without craving for a new one, whereas the maps however, at least for me, I'm getting so fricking tired of playing in Haven for the fifth time in a row. Plus, me personally I am REALLY interested in the lore of this game would love to see more of the world. It's not a complaint, more of a suggestion. Thanks 4 readin

P.S. I understand that creating maps is much more time consuming and challenging on the devs part, so to compensate, another solution would just be to let the community create maps and just pick the best one using like a contest or something and the winner gets to have a free dragon skin or something. Just a suggestion.

P.P.S I'm not saying that there should only be new maps and no new agents or That maps are more important, a balance between both we'll do. we dont want an overwatch situation now do we",Insight,
"The vandal's First bullet inaccuracy is ridiculous.
I was playing an unrated match yesterday using the vandal and this happened, as shown in the clip I started to tap-fire the enemy sova in the head while we were BOTH not moving and he was looking in a different direction while using the operator and the bullets just kept going to the sides of his head. Honestly, I don't know why first bullet inaccuracy with the vandal is so bad or why it's even a thing in the game in the first place.
",Vent,"There was no solution nor statistics provided, which is why this was classified as a ""vent""."
"Deathmatch made me realize how bad the sound is in Valorant
Compared to CSGO when playing deathmatch, here most of the time i just gotta use the sound of the floor to realize where the enemies are and even if i do that it's still pretty bad. For example on Bind i heard the metallic floor and i was hearing the footsteps like he was up in heaven but he was to my left on connector.

Also i wanna point out 2 things about Deathmatch, that minimap update every 5 secs or so was really not necessary, maybe show players who stay in the same spot for too long. Here i'm not sure but, is it just me or way too many people spawn behind you? Especially with this sound i don't even realize that they are behind me. I'm not gonna talk about the xp though.....OOF",Vent,
"I (20F) find valorant very hard to play sometimes. I find the sexism the worst. I'm forever being told to get into the kitchen, to unalive, that I'm the product of incest if I dare top frag. I can't retaliate because then I'm told in great detail how I'll be violated by these men. I do mute, I do but it is so fucking hard when all I want to do is have fun. I find people that are nice sure, of course there are those, and they're great. However, more often than not I find that sexism and misogyny prevails and I will be told for the 5th match today to get into the kitchen or else I face threats of s*xual assault or worse.

Moral of the story, does anyone know better ways to combat this other than muting and ignoring? Does anyone else deal with this? Thanks in advance",Vent,
"Isn't this like the definition of missleading marketing?
-20% of what?

how can the 20 Radianite Bundle be 20% off? 20 off what? the Radianite points? its the smallest bundle, its the default price. If i could buy 1 Radianite Point for 100 VP than yeah it would be 20% off but i can't buy 1 radianite for 100 RP. So for all for all intents and purposes, 20 RP = 1600VP, there is no 20% discount on them.

This is straight up predatory/missleading marketing. You want to make people think they are saving money when there is no way to even buy it for cheaper. And its not like this is a special offer that is only currently available either, these prices have been like this since the start of the game.

-20% should be removed and -30% and -40% should be changed to reflect the actual money saved. Your prices are high enough as it is for skins, such advertising strats are something i expect from a mobile game company or EA not from a respectable developer.",Insight,
"Valorant feels like the most inconsistent FPS I've ever played
I've played thousands of hours of FPS games. Sometimes I have bad days, bad games.

But NEVER in all those thousands of hours have I had games were I have felt as inconsistent as Valorant.

The main problem is not even with my performance or my aim.

It's that some games the Peeker's advantage feels 100x worse than others, with the same ping differences. Some games I don't even have a fighting chance, I just get one-tapped every round.

The weird thing is that this is MATCH specific. From round to round my performance is fairly consistent within each match. One match everything feels fine and I have a fighting chance, the next I literally die to what feels like 5 aimbots on the enemy team.

It's like some games I'm being put in a server that just says ""fuck your connection in particular"" and I die before even being able to fight back.

My main account is Immortal 2. I recently made a new one and am currently Plat. This inconsistency is so bad that some games I feed 5-20 on my Plat account, as an Immortal player. I have NEVER in my LIFE had such bad games on secondary accounts in thousands of hours of CS GO or Overwatch.

I refuse to believe that for some magical reason I'm only turning into a complete bot in certain selected matches only in Valorant and in no other game I've ever played and then I'm 100% completely fine the next match I play 5 minutes later.",Vent,
"Radianite System Should Be Abolished
The Radianite System is completely horrid. It's the most money grubby scheme I've ever seen in a video game to date. For those who aren't aware, I'll some it up real quick. When you buy a skin set, you are only paying for the model and the opportunity to upgrade the effects.

To put this in other terms, let's compare this to Riot's other game ""League of Legends"". This is like if in League, when you buy a skin. You only pay for the Model and you have to buy the Visual Effects for your Q, W, E, R, and passive separately. It's extremely scummy. If I buy your overpriced skin skin set, I should get all the effects; I shouldn't have to spend more.",Vent,"There were no specific statistics stated nor any solid line of reasoning provided as to why the radianite system should be abolished, which is why this was labeled as ""Vent"".  "
"The battle pass xp per level is somewhat absurd. w/ math
READ THE POST RATHER THAN COMMENTING BASED ON AN UNEDITABLE TITLE

So I was curious about just how long it would take to hit level 50 on the battle pass so I decided to do the math out. It's all documented on this excel sheet. It includes fields for how many games you play per week and what percentage of missions you complete among other variables. It can predict based on how many games you play what tier of the battle pass you will get.

Important Note: “...The battlepass will take ~100 hours to complete. Weekly XP's also scale up in every week to smooth out the experience curves. Just to give you an idea, the first set of weeklies offer 28,350 total XP and the last set of weeklies offer 60,750 total XP...” -Riot dev below .

This post and the calculator have been edited to account for the new info from Riot. Overall, with all the known sources of xp, it comes out to 138 hours through the calculator. Perhaps, there's additional unannounced content that will account for the 38 hour difference. Thank you riot for the clear communication, it really makes y’all stand out.

Here's the summary though:

1,372,000 XP is needed to get to level 50.

If you start today with a two month long battle pass, that's 171,500 XP per week.

Completing every weekly and daily mission yields ~75,000 XP per week. Riot has clarified that the weekly missions will increase from the 28,000 currently to 60,000. My math assumes it scales linearly over time.

With that in mind, it takes roughly 23 games of unrated per week in order to get to level 50. This assumes the average match is 13-8 and a 50% win/loss. This is also assuming you don't miss a single mission. Riot has stated weekly missions don't expire.

That represents 17 hrs of valorant per week from this calculator compared to the 16.3 from Riots numbers in order to fully complete it. Assuming you aren't going to grind hard, use the calculator to estimate which level you'd end up on.

Don't assume 50% of the time commitment means level 25, the xp/level and missions make it so you get much further than halfway for half the effort.

It’s confirmed ~two months here. “About every two months, an Act ends along with its associated battle pass.”

TL;DR: Riot has clarified that the weekly mission xp will increase over time. It's roughly 17 hr/week by my calculator if you min/max compared to the 16 per/week from what Riots stated. Use the calculator to see how far you'll get.

Edit 5:50 pm: This post has been edited heavily from the original for clarity and due to new information being provided from Riot. To the best of my knowledge, the calculator is correct and agrees with what Riot has stated about the battle pass. Obviously, if there are unannounced xp sources it'll go quicker. I chose to nuke all the old shit as clarity>record keeping.
",Insight,
"Can we make the enemy Reyna's flashes a different color?
OR make the teammate's Reyna's flashes a different color? It is quite hard to mentally program the reaction to shoot the flash when it is impossible to distinguish a team flash vs enemy flash.",Insight,
"The importance of crosshair placement, why you're doing it wrong, and how to fix it.
Valorant and the importance of crosshair placement.
=================================================================================



Introduction


Hey guys, I'm Twix, and I'm back with another informative post, this time concerning the aspect of crosshair placement. Through this post I will be discussing the importance of crosshair placement within the tac shooter genre, going over the most common mistakes I see people make in my experience as a coach, and offering structured routines to remedy the majority of these mistakes. If you haven't read through any of my posts before ( I wouldn't they're too long ) I am an FPS player which mainly played CS:GO competitively, with around 7k hours and multiple level 10 faceit accounts and LAN wins in the past 5 years, who transitioned towards the end of my CS:GO days into being an FPS coach, I mainly worked with people trying to gain a competitive edge in CS, but later moved to coaching Apex players, and following the closed beta release of Valorant, I have been coaching Valorant players for the past few months, with unanimously positive feedback. If you haven't read my first post which is a comprehensive general guide for players looking to improve in Valorant, I highly recommend you look at it here before continuing on to this post. In relation to other qualifications / achievements, I have hit top 30 as hitscan DPS in Overwatch, maintained top 500 ranking in Apex ( PC ) for a couple of seasons, and hold numerous 1% rankings on various Kovaak's FPS Aim Trainer maps. My main goal in creating these posts is to contribute to the Valorant community by sharing my knowledge gained over 10k collective hours of FPS experience ( mainly Tactical fps ) and hopefully help the people reading my posts improve and gain that competitive edge they need to progress into their desired ranking. For those of you interested in learning more about my coaching service, or looking for a community of Valorant players looking to improve, I will link my Discord server at the end of this post.


Why is crosshair placement important?

If I was asked about the importance of consistent crosshair placement in games such as PUBG, Apex, Overwatch, Fortnite, etc. I would probably answer by saying that while it's beneficial to maintain solid crosshair placement, it's by no means the most important aspect in relation to performing well in those games, in tactical shooters however, it's a whole different story. Tactical shooters are low TTK ( time to kill ) games, and for the most part, a single bullet to the head is enough to eliminate a player, this means that in contrast to AFPS games, or games like Overwatch or Apex, which have a much higher TTK, first shot accuracy is of extreme importance in Valorant, inevitably leading to the fact that crosshair placement is also extremely important. In a game with higher TTK, even if your first shot accuracy isn't perfect in an aim duel, you can win the fight if you land more shots on the opposing player over x amount of time that you trade with them, while in Valorant, whoever needs to make the least amount of adjustment to their crosshair when engaging in a 1v1 scenario wins the exchange. It doesn't matter if your raw aim is out of this world, even if you have the most precise flicks known to the FPS community, if your crosshair placement is sub-optimal, you will lose vs. someone with consistent crosshair placement, this is simply due to the fact that all they need to do, is click once your head moves into their crosshair, often without even needing to move their mouse. Crosshair placement may very well be the most important aspect in relation to gunplay and generally the mechanical aspect of tac shooters such as CS:GO or Valorant, as it's the deciding factor in the majority of aim duels.


Common mistakes

A large amount of players tend to underestimate the importance of crosshair placement in Valorant, and especially the underlying complexity of maintaining consistency in that context. People think that all you need to do to maintain solid crosshair placement is aim high enough to hit headshots, meaning that the only factor that affects crosshair placement is vertical positioning, others still stick to making their main source of information on game improvement being players who make statements as un-informative and vague as ""just click heads"", my main goal is to break down and explain the multiple factors that go into proper crosshair placement. Lets start with the basics:


Vertical Positioning:

As mentioned above, one of the elements which ties into crosshair placement is vertical positioning. this is the set distance that you need to position your crosshair at in relation to the ground to be able to align your crosshair's horizontal axis with player model head-level. The good thing about vertical positioning, is that you can get accustomed to the head level that the player models have in Valorant quite rapidly, as the hitbox sizes in this game are identical, meaning you can always use the ground as a point of reference to determine where the enemy player's head would be.

In Valorant, the head level always remains a set distance from the ground

In order to train your general ability to place your crosshair at the correct height, try to make a habit out of constantly reminding yourself to place your crosshair at head level, regardless of where you are or what you're doing on the map. What I mean by this, is that even if there isn't any imminent threat of enemy players peeking you, try to keep constantly keep your crosshair at head level, the more time you spend doing this, the faster it will become a habit and become something you do subconsciously, without having to actively focus on the action. This habit allows you to build muscle-memory during otherwise useless down-time, another way to do this is to track your teammate's heads with your crosshair while rotating, leaving spawn etc.

While vertical positioning is something that people get used to relatively easily, I have come across a recurring issue among the VODs of people I coach, and that is that people generally struggle with adapting the vertical component of their crosshair's position to varying points of elevation. Here's an image to help you visualize a scenario where this could be an issue:

Peeking C Long, Positions marked: Cubby ( right ), Platform ( left ), back-site ( back )

In the image above I am peeking into C back-site from C long on the map 'Haven', I have highlighted three different positions / angles where an enemy could potentially peak from in an in-game reenactment of this scenario, Platform, Cubby, and back-site. What you'll notice is that these positions all have different points of elevation, meaning that while using the ground as reference will allow me to maintain my crosshair at head-level if someone peeks my position from ground level on C site, in order to clear cubby and platform, I would need to adjust my crosshair accordingly, using their lower levels as a reference for where the head-level position would be in those angles.

Unfortunately, if you are struggling with this due to the fact that you aren't familiar with the map layout yet, the only thing that will remedy your situation is more time spent playing the game, if however, your issue stems from a mechanical inability, meaning that your mouse control isn't good enough to allow you to make such adjustments comfortably, the routine provided later in the guide may help you get past that issue.


Horizontal Positioning:

Just as with vertical positioning, horizontal positioning is pretty self-explanatory in terms of it's function. Knowing at what height to position your crosshair at in relation to the environment is far easier to do than knowing where to position it on a horizontal axis, the reasoning behind this is that with vertical placement you will always have the ground or lower level of the object the opponent is standing on as a point of reference which allows you to instantly know at what height head-level is. When focusing on the horizontal aspect of crosshair placement, there isn't a set point of reference at all times; Sometimes you need to hold wide angles, sometimes you need to move along with the object you're playing against, and sometimes you need to pre-aim to swing effectively, all this variability makes it much harder for a newer player to grasp crosshair placement and horizontal positioning is just as crucial as vertical positioning if not even more important.

A very common mistake which I see a lot of in the VODs I review as a coach, is newer players holding angles too tightly, meaning that they're playing in a position where they anticipate an enemy push and are waiting for the engagement, and their crosshair is a position where it's hugging the edge of the wall the enemy will peek from. Here is a visual representation of what I'm talking about:


Example of incorrect horizontal placement

In the image above, I'm holding an angle where if someone crosses moving parallel to the wall I'm looking at, I'll have under 50 ms to react, my crosshair is so close to the edge of the wall that I will need to click my LMB the milli-second I see the enemy. By holding this angle, chances are that by the time I click the enemy will have already crossed to the left of my crosshair resulting in a miss and most likely my death; It would take inhuman reaction times for anyone to hit a player while holding like this, especially if the enemy player is swinging. Instead, you should allow some distance from your crosshair to the edge of the angle you're holding, allowing yourself to spot the enemy's player model, and then time your click effectively. Here is a visual representation of correct crosshair placement while holding the same angle:


Example of correct horizontal placement

As you can see, in the image above I am allowing for some space between the wall and my crosshair, giving me a significantly longer time window to spot an enemy player and react. Holding an angle that's too ""tight"" would mean I need to make a larger adjustment to hit the enemy, and therefore I increase my margin of error due to vertical overshoot ( see below ). There are exceptions to the rule when it comes to the distance you need to hold at, if the angle you are holding only allows forward movement ( into your crosshair ) you can hold a narrow line of sight. If you are clearing an angle ( moving along it to check for enemies ) and you are the agressor, you can hold tight and move along with the wall / LOS to allow for a faster reaction if you spot an enemy during your movement. If you are the agressor and you want to swing into an angle that you believe / know an enemy is holding, it is sometimes optimal to pre-aim, meaning you position your crosshair in a way where without moving your mouse it will be aimed at the enemy's head once you swing out the angle.


Vertical Offset:

The final common issue I would like to bring up which ties into both crosshair placement and horizontal click-timing, is something I call ""vertical offset"" or ""vertical overshoot"", this is a player's inability to move his crosshair horizontally while maintaining the same vertical placement. Vertical offset is a big issue when it comes to switching angles or flicking horizontally, I have seen many scenarios where a player is holding an angle properly with their crosshair at a pixel-perfect vertical position in relation to head level, only to make a 30 degree turn to check a different angle and end up shooting at an enemy's chest and losing the duel. Usually, the larger the movement, the more the player's crosshair deviates vertically. Here is a depiction of what vertical offset / overshooting looks like in-game:


Example of margin of error caused by vertical offset / overshooting

In the image above the green dot is where the crosshair should end up in an ideal scenario while flicking from it's current position to the target dummy, while the green lines represent a theoretical margin of error for overshooting. Fortunately for people that face this issue, I have come up with multiple Kovaak's maps and firing range excercises to help combat it and largely reduce your margin of error when moving your crosshair / flicking horizontally.


Settings: What sensitivity / crosshair should I use?

This part of the post discusses a topic which is highly subjective, both the sensitivity you use and the crosshair you use are something preference-based that you should decide upon on your own, the reason I'm adding this section into the post is for players which are newer to the tac-shooter genre; There are a few guidelines that will help them narrow down the settings that work the best for them.

First off, don't by any means copy your favorite pro's config, just because something works for a professional player that has probably spent well above 10,000 hours playing FPS games and decided upon their ideal sensitivity and crosshair within that massive period of time, doesn't mean that it's going to work for you, use whatever you're most comfortable with. Other than individual preference, and having gotten used to their sensitivity, the Pros you watch may be using gear which feels different at their sensitivity setting. A lighter mouse, faster mouse-pad, and faster feet can feel very different in terms of mouse movement, even if you're playing on the same sensitivity value on paper. In relation to grip-styles and what mice are ideal for each hand size, make sure to check out my first post in this sub before moving forward with this guide, as playing on hardware that caters to your individual preferences plays an important role in increasing your mechanical potential.


Sensitivity:

As I stated in the paragraph above, sensitivity is something quite subjective and while there's no general rule as to which single sens value is superior, Valorant and CS:GO professionals tend to stick to e-dpi or cm/360 much lower than professional players in other titles and FPS subgenres. Your e-dpi is your in-game sensitivity value multiplied by your mouse's DPI setting. The average e-dpi used by Valorant professionals is around 250 e-dpi, which would be a value of 0.625 in-game @ 400 DPI, or around 50 cm/360.


Pro player & Streamer sensitivity settings (e-dpi)

cm/360 is a universal format for sensitivity measurement, it's the amount of centimeters you need to move your mouse in order to perform a full rotation. This is the format adopted within aimer communities due to the simple fact that you asking someone ""what sensitivity do you play on?"" And them responding with ""1.5 in CSGO"" is pretty useless information as they could be playing at any DPI range, and you don't necessarily know what each CSGO sens corresponds to in relation to physical movement, or even movement in other games. ""e-dpi"" solves the issue of different DPI x Sens measurements within the same game, but the cm/360 format is easily transferable from title to title.

The reason professional players in the tac shooter genre use lower sens on average, is due to the fact that in contrast with other FPS games, tac shooters don't require larger or extended movements, instead they require you to hold or clear angles while maintaining stable crosshair placement, the least adjustments you need to make to your crosshair's position on your screen, the better your ""aim"" will be. The majority of players I have coached report that it has been significantly easier for them to maintain consistent crosshair placement at lower sensitivities. For newer players that still haven't found a ""main"" sensitivity that they feel comfortable on, I would recommend for them to stick to the range of 200-300 e-dpi, while for more experienced players coming from CS or other similar games, I would recommend a similar range with a higher cap, at 200-400 e-dpi ( very few professional players play above 300 e-dpi ).


Crosshair settings:

This is something even more subjective and preference-based than sensitivity even, so what I will do in this section is simply post my own settings which I use for my in-game crosshair, and explain why I picked each value within the menu.


Crosshair Settings

So, lets break my crosshair down setting by settings:

Color: I use ""Cyan"" as it stands out quite well for me with my current color settings, any color that doesn't match your enemy outline color works perfectly fine here.

Inner Line Opacity: This setting basically determines how see through your crosshair will be, I like setting mine at ""1"" as It makes the crosshair stand out more.

Inner Line Thickness: I set this to ""1"" which is the lowest value, a lot of professional players like to use ""2"", I think setting the value to ""1"" makes it easier to align your crosshair with heads or with other objects in the environment, it is also less obstructive, so I highly recommend either this or ""2"" to newer players

Inner Line Offset: This setting determines how large the gap is in your crosshair, I like setting this to ""1"" as the gap is as small as possible without disappearing, larger gaps make it more difficult to determine where the exact center of your screen is, which can act as a hnderance in your first shot accuracy at longer range engagements.

Movement & Firing Error: These settings just turn your crosshair into a dynamic crosshair and make the gap widen significantly while moving or shooting respectively in order to give you a visual representation of how the innacuracy factor works. Useless and distracting, would highly suggest that you keep these both off unless you're very new and still don't understand how movement / spray accuracy works.

Outer Lines: Everything is off here, I don't think playing with outer lines provides any benefit whatsoever and it's an extra distraction.


Crosshair Placement Improvement Routine:
A large portion of improving your crosshair placement is based on simply playing the game more, crosshair placement is largely based on muscle memory, part of having good crosshair placement is simply based on having experience in-game allowing it to become a subconscious habit, and the rest is based on your ability to anticipate player model movement and learn to make horizontal movements without simultaneously your crosshair vertically. The routine I will provide is not only a great way to work on your crosshair placement, but also highly beneficial to the click-timing aspect of your aim, which is basically the only element of aiming required in Valorant, as good tracking is unecessary in such a low TTK game. If you are already training using a daily routine on Kovaak's ( as you should be ) you can just implement this into your daily scenarios.


Kovaaks:

( These are all maps which require you to make horizontal movements without overshooting vertically, thus good aim training for those struggling with crosshair placement, see my other posts for a larger variety of Kovaaks maps )


1 wall 2 targets horizontal - 10 minutes ( focus on your flicks, work on hitting both targets in the same movement, not pausing in between )

Valorant Small flicks - 10 minutes ( Great routine as head level is that of Valorant, and vertical deviation will cause you to miss, forcing you to maintain head level as you play through it )

PatTarget Switch small - 10 minutes ( Works on your ability to swap from one target to another while maintaining head level crosshair placement, keep LMB held while playing, only go for heads )


HSDM:


Valorant doesn't currently offer it's own deathmatch servers, therefore the next best thing is practicing in CS:GO. HSDM is a headshot only modifier for community FFA servers in CS:GO. To access these maps go to ""Community Server Browser"" and simply type in ""HSDM"", any server with decent population will do ( preferably 128 tick ). Playing FFA on headshot only forces you to maintain head-level crosshair placement as body shots don't count. I advise going for taps rather than spraying, as it limits the RNG, also spraying in CS:GO isn't transferable to Valorant as a mechanic. Make it a challenge for yourself to maintain positive K/D while playing. Use the AK in rifle servers, and the USP-S in pistol servers.


Firing Range:


Set the target dummy position to static, and practice your click timing by only going for the targets furthest to the left and furthest to the right interchangeably, do this for around 10 minutes.

Play Spike Rush and set it to hard. When set on ""Hard"" the AI will one shot you as soon as you peek if it has seen you, and one shot you after around half a second if you shift-peek it. Pretty decent warmup in relation to crosshair placement as you will die every single time if you aren't instantly headshotting the targets the moment you peek. Play this for another 10 minutes.

",Insight,
"Besides reporting there should also be a option to commend someone
this should create a group that has all the toxic, angry and saboteurs and a group with reputation. So players that are respectful will have a higher chance of playing with other people who are respectful and maybe for once people won't yell in my ear when they need a heal.",Insight,
"Servers in Africa! We too play Valorant!
We really need servers in Africa. I'm having to play with 150ms average ping on EU servers.

I was willing to stick with it but since the Icebox update, it's been hell. I started fluctuating between 150-300ms (as high as 1,100ms in extreme cases) during matches on Icebox but now it's happening in all maps, on all EU servers. I've had to give up on Ranked so as not to ruin the experience for others. I can only imagine what South African players are going through as they are twice as far away from the EU servers as I am.

Servers in any 3 of these cities will benefit the whole continent: Johannesburg (South Africa), Cape Town (South Africa), Lagos (Nigeria), Abuja (Nigeria), Accra (Ghana), Rabat (Morocco), Cairo (Egypt), Nairobi (Kenya), Mombasa (Kenya) and Kigali (Rwanda).",Insight,
"Ranked should NOT show your rank in the middle of a game.
People will begin the game with a mindset that they’re at a disadvantage and even belittle and be toxic towards lower ranked teammates. It should be like rainbow 6 where ranks aren’t shown until the end of the game.",Insight,
"I just played a game in a 4-stack where all of us were Silver 1-3 and our random was unranked, against a team of all silvers. We lost 13-1. I have no idea how the fuck it happened. We lost every single duel, every single peek, I think our top fragger had literally 6 total kills for 14 rounds.

Either we were all ranked WAY too high and we actually should be in Iron 1 or something (which seems unlikely) or the other team was a 5-stack that purposely threw all their placements so they could get ranked low and stomp low ranked players for a good long while on the way up. Or the placement system is such laughable bullshit that it looked at these two teams with utterly, dramatically different skill levels and still went ""yeah that seems about right this should be a fair game"".",Vent,
"Had multiple MVPs, tried filling, down to forcing duelist, every game has someone going 3/15 in my team or throwing. Deleted the game until next act, time for a break. Been immo2 last 5 acts don’t understand it.",Vent,
